i wanted to update to 12.04 and after this i reboot the system choose the new kernel
ok 1 sec
bekks, was, he said he is not running that kernel
Mulder911  type ps -e|less <-- which has number 88 ?
XiaolinDraconis, Is that what is on the usb, you want it clean to start with, no hidden trash with stuff in it either.
pepee: Then how can we investigate what is causing that error...?
I suppose it means, the PID will not necessarily be the same
bekks, reading the logs, it should say what process was this
wilee-nilee, no thats my home directory, but its not the problem as mini.iso loads just fine, i think its not mounting cause its on another partition that is mounted as well
bekks, at least that's what a bit of googling shows
on this kernel i don`t see pid88
google  "/proc/*/oom_adj is deprecated, please use /proc/*/oom_score_adj"
XiaolinDraconis, Drag it to your desktop and mount it there.
Mulder911, in a terminal, type:   grep -n "oom_adj is deprecated" /var/log/*
wilee-nilee, that was my thoughts as well
/var/log/kern.log:751:Oct 31 00:46:10 bt kernel: [    1.631658] udevd (92): /proc/92/oom_adj is deprecated, please use /proc/92/oom_score_adj instead.
wilee-nilee, that failed as well
XiaolinDraconis, I always reformat the usb as well each time to be sure it is clean, if I do a load this way.
wilee-nilee, the usb is freshly formatted
XiaolinDraconis, So what is the actual failure?
Mulder911: So which process is PID 92?
wilee-nilee, the iso wont mount
wilee-nilee, opening it with archive manager and can see the contents from there
Mulder911, in the terminal, type:   grep -n "Linux version" /var/log/kern.log
bekks, PID 92
XiaolinDraconis, Not even with a right click on it then clicking on open with archive mounter
bekks, PID 92 is udevd
4:Oct 31 00:46:10 bt kernel: [    0.000000] Linux version 3.2.6 (root@bt) (gcc version 4.4.3 (Ubuntu 4.4.3-4ubuntu5) ) #1 SMP Fri Feb 17 10:34:20 EST 2012
816:Oct 31 01:05:54 bt kernel: [    0.000000] Linux version 3.2.6 (root@bt) (gcc version 4.4.3 (Ubuntu 4.4.3-4ubuntu5) ) #1 SMP Fri Feb 17 10:34:20 EST 2012
1672:Oct 31 19:14:47 bt kernel: [    0.000000] Linux version 3.2.6 (root@bt) (gcc version 4.4.3 (Ubuntu 4.4.3-4ubuntu5) ) #1 SMP Fri Feb 17 10:34:20 EST 2012
2543:Nov  1 00:19:12 bt kernel: [    0.000000] Linux version 2.6.32-44-generic (buildd@allspice) (gcc version 4.4.3 (Ubuntu 4.4.3-4ubuntu5.1) ) #98-Ubuntu SMP Mon Sep 24 17:27:10 UTC 2012 (Ubuntu 2.6.32-44.98-generic 2.6.32.59+drm33.24)
wilee-nilee, thats how ive been trying to do it, atm i have it open in archive manager
XiaolinDraconis, Do you se all the files?
wilee-nilee, as far as i can tell i do, have had a problem opening any of the folders
XiaolinDraconis, If you see all the files like I posted, the the exstract should run it just takes a bit to do it I just ran it, about 8-1o min I think.
wilee-nilee, trying it again
Mulder911, try upgrating now and see it if installs a new kernel, I suppose this should solve it
so upgrade one more time
Mulder911, yes. AFAIK 3.2.6 is not the latest kernel in 12.04.1
ok
i`ll try
wilee-nilee, of course this time it finishes in 40 seconds
sudo apt-get update && sudo apt-get dist-upgrade
Which will not upgrade the kernel.
bekks, what's the current kernel in 12.04?
i`m upgrading with kpackagekit
pepee: No 12.04 handy here, maybe you can take alook at packages.ubuntu.com
bekks, why do you say it will not upgrade the kernel?
pepee: Because thats the truth. apt-get will keep back kernel packages. You have to update them explicitely.
XiaolinDraconis, What I have found with the W7 ISO is that it is locked unless mounted that is probably why, I'm not sure of other ways to mount it, I have been using the usb loader I posted for a coulple of years now and have not had to do it this way. I know it works though has everytime I did in the past. YOu might just install the multisystem loader and use it
wilee-nilee, i hope this works, ive got 2 hours to try and get my girls laptop back to working condition. i thought gparted was still simulating and hit cancel, man was i wrong
bekks, dist-upgrade does that for you
pepee: Yes, and we were talking about apt-get upgrade ;)
but... 3.2.6 is not from the repos, is it?
The 12.04 kernel version is 3.2.0-xyz
XiaolinDraconis, Hehe not the person to disappoint. ;)
pepee: Nope, it isnt.
bekks, I was talking about upgrade, generically. I always use dist-upgrade, so I don't know much about other package managers
wilee-nilee, yeah specially not after shes been at work most of the day while i get to sit around the house
XiaolinDraconis, hehe you are in deep dodo now. ;)
wilee-nilee, unless magic happens and the next 2 hours go flawlessly (never in my lifetime)
XiaolinDraconis, I clone all my installs, you might do this after you are setup with clonezilla.
wilee-nilee, clonezilla is what ruined my windows installation in the first place
XiaolinDraconis, If I remember you cloned it to a ext4 right?
how can i use a .htaccess for my phpmyadmin directory ?
i tried enabling override all in /etc/phpmyadmin/apache.conf
didnt help
wilee-nilee, and then did it again (hadnt deleted the original partition yet) on a fresh ntfs partition
i tried a bunch of other stuff which didn't help
and now i kindof gave up and figured i'd ask on IRC
wilee-nilee, which is when i was told to delete the original because it kept booting that instead of the new one
firefox version 16.0.2 always ask for zip code on google shop and ebay how to save my zip ????
wilee-nilee, only to find out the new one failed to boot cause it wasnt in the same location
hi i am trying to set up a dhcpd and i have become a little lost i think i have one running but no idea which one it is and no matter what i do the windows box on the other end of the wire seems to get an ip of 192.168.0.20 how can i work out where its getting it from ?
XiaolinDraconis, I have never had clonezilla fail, but I follow some rules, I have the windows fully defragged to the front of the disc and make sure in general it is good shape by running a chkdsk every so often on it
Hi, i need a little hand to help me get back system sound on ubuntu 11.10, can anyone help me? After i tried to install google gadgets, my sound device doesnt work correctly
XiaolinDraconis, Lots of other cloners though.
wilee-nilee, as far as i know windows checks to make sure the hardware hasnt changed and when it detects a major change it requires re-activation
wilee-nilee, all my old discs ended up getting trashed when i moved
how do i make ubuntu into its own proxy
hi, i use phpmyadmin on ubuntu 12.04, and i want to use a .htaccess in my phpmyadmin dir, but it doesn't seem to work, i set AllowOverride All for the dir in /etc/phpmyadmin/apache.conf
Why i cant access sound configuration on my Ubuntu 11.10?!?
XiaolinDraconis, That is in system changes if the update reading is really far off I have only seen that one time with a XP setup. I have W7 pro and it has unlimited images that can be made although it will overwrite the last one if saved in the same place. I don't really use windows much, but I keep it squeaky clean with bleachbit and defragging and some other apps to have it in good shape and I have no problem just throwing in a fresh install o
nce in awhile.
wilee-nilee, right but i was attempting to move it to a new hard drive, ive never been able to do that without having to use the rescue disc afterwards
anyone?
wilee-nilee, im seeing lots of topics online where several people have done it, sadly its not been my luck
XiaolinDraconis, You will need the recovery if the mbr is not saved, clonezilla saves the mbr, that is why I like it.
If the mbr has grub there though you will need to reload it if the linux install is not included.
wilee-nilee, it wasnt on the first partition, the mbr was over-written by grub.
wilee-nilee, and somehow i just ran out of space on a 4GB drive, told ya luck isnt in my bag of tricks
wilee-nilee, nautilus tells me i got 1GB left on the drive.... GRRRR
XiaolinDraconis, Did you show the hidden files and makes sure there was nothing there, if you were finally loading it with the ISO?
wilee-nilee, i was copying files from the extracted directory, one file said something about no space left on the disk, splicing error or something
wilee-nilee, im formating it to fat32 now and gonna try the multiboot tool
XiaolinDraconis, cool good luck the windows will be in the grub4 choice of the grub menu I believe, you have to look for it
any idea how to install create ubuntu on sofware raid and LVM
nobody that ever did this? :s
with that usb loader it does not just show in the main grub menu you will see. XiaolinDraconis
hi, i use phpmyadmin on ubuntu 12.04, and i want to use a .htaccess in my phpmyadmin dir, but it doesn't seem to work, i set AllowOverride All for the dir in /etc/phpmyadmin/apache.conf
i also tried to change /etc/apache2/sites-available/default
didn't work either
i wasted almost 2 hours on this idiotic little problem
pepee?
wilee-nilee, thanks for the heads up, and more bad luck coming my way, the device didnt show properly in gparted, so i chose to create a new msdos partition table, and its taking a long time
Mulder911,
is it possible that after upgrading ,starting system for the first time is going much slower?
what's the proper way to update apache to 2.2.23?  the newest in repos is 2.2.22.
Mulder911: did you change release?
d1gital: sudo apt-get update; sudo apt-get upgrade
d1gital: or you may find a PPA
i upgrade again but it was this same
but i found log
Mulder911: same release or did you change release (Precise to Quantal for example0?
Mulder911, could be, yes. by the way, where did you get that kernel, Mulder911 ?
i`m on the 2.6 at the moment which is working
Mulder911: what video chip  do you use?
radeon 6850
Mulder911: with proprietary video driver?
wait i tell you where is the problem again
Mulder911: did you upgrade from Lucid to Precise by any chance?
no response here and none in #phpmyadmin either :s
am i really going to have to remove phpmyadmin because of this annoying problem? :s
SillyTalker: what is the issue?
hi, i use phpmyadmin on ubuntu 12.04, and i want to use a .htaccess in my phpmyadmin dir, but it doesn't seem to work, i set AllowOverride All for the dir in /etc/phpmyadmin/apache.conf
ActionParsnip:
SillyTalker, ask in #apache ?
pepee: i'll try thanks
SillyTalker, there are lots of web-dev related channels
i had sys with 2.6.32.44 kernel and after upgrading system made me another 3.2.6
Mulder911: so you upgraded Lucid to Precise? yes?
Mulder911, that's strange, ubuntu doesn't have 3.2.6 as far as I know
it`s Backtrack distro
Mulder911: 3.2.6 is a BackTrack kernel, Backtrack isn't supported here
Mulder911: ask in #backtrack-linux
ok
thx
hi, I have ubuntu 12.04 and I installed wine 1.5 to use spss19, the application appears, but i can not open it with linux or wine
what can i do?
nothing
ana_: did you check the appdb for compatibility?
nope
what is that?
ana_: search, you'll find it
might want to learn winetricks as well
where can i find it?
google
ana_: https://duckduckgo.com/?q=appdb   too hard?
i'm just begging with ubuntu
ana_: even the simplest search gives the result
is there any way to tell apt-get to use just 1 download thread?
ana_: yes but II'm VERY sure you have used the web to find out new stuff, yes?
ah yeah
sorry
ana_: so why stop now?
i'll look for it
ana_: instead of immediately asking 'what's that' try a little searching using the advise given
is there way to clsoe off a session of a dvd+r burn that didn't get closed off originally
ok i'm getting rid of phpmyadmin
SillyTalker: what's the problem with it?
talk to you guys later
kisuke: think is apt-get download name
somsip: can't seem to protect it's dir that's all
with a .htaccess
SillyTalker: its hardly crucia
ActionParsnip: phpmyadmin in general is not crucial so
SillyTalker: what have you done to try to achieve that?
SillyTalker: or if you've decided to dump it...fair enough
somsip: nothing i jsut want it as an extra layer
yeah i've been messing with it for 2 hours
SillyTalker: you can connect via SSH and run SQL commands there :)
it's not worth that
thanks for tryign to help anyway
SillyTalker: ok
Q:  I have Ubuntu 12.04.  I installed KDE plasma desktop using software center.  When in KDE, my VPN doesn't work
ActionParsnip: i know lol
SillyTalker: is there no PPA for it?
Hello, I've got a 16gb usb drive, i'm trying to make a casper-rw partition that is ~15gig and use that for persistance, rather than the fat32 4gb allocation.. I managed to make a seperate partition that was 15gb, and i had lots of space during the instance, but nothing persisted, did i miss a flag?
not that i saw no
SillyTalker: the SSH will be secure too
SillyTalker: if you want help, just let me know. Probably OT so msg may be better
somsip, ok maybe later i'm just gonna take a break now
can any one help me set up dhcpd on 12.04 ?
thanks for the effort
SillyTalker: https://launchpad.net/ubuntu/+ppas?name_filter=phpmyadmin
talk to you guys later
oh
SillyTalker: seems there is a PPA
* SillyTalker clicks
ooooh
i thought you meant a post on it
about my prob
SillyTalker: that page is THE search ngine for PPAs........
it's not worth posting for this it's just me being stupid most likely
well i'm not going to add a ppa
it's just me beign stupid lol
anyway talk to you later
i really need a break
thanks for trying to help
Is there no 32 bit release of Ubuntu Server 12.10?
Gerowen: sure
ok
thank u for ur kind help
Gerowen, http://releases.ubuntu.com/12.10/
Gerowen: I'd go for Precise for a server, its LTS wheras Quantal isn't
+1 on precise
ana_, #winehq
ActionParsnip: I was considering that as well.  My old server desktop has kicked the bucket.  It will run for about 5 minutes, then the screen will go blank and the CPU fan will just start racing.  It was forgetting CMOS settings so I replaced the CMOS battery, but it's still doing it and the only other spare computer I have to turn into a replacement server only has a 32 bit processor.
Gerowen: have you tested RAM? Have you cleared the fans?
ActionParsnip: Haven't tested RAM, but it was fine before, I'll do that though.  The inside is emaculate though, I took it apart and did a good job cleaning it about once a month.
Gerowen: New Thermal grease?
Hello, i'm creating a Live USB drive on a 16gb drive, i'm trying to create a casper-rw partition (ext2) that is 15gb.  Is there anything I have to do to have the Ubuntu install use the casper-rw partition over the casper-rw file?
Gerowen, check temps, test memory, check disks, etc
Gerowen: thats good, check the RAM so you know its ok
vfw: Thought of that as well, especially since every couple of months I'd remove the heatsink and brush it out really good, and the thermal paste is wearing pretty thin.  It could any of a hundred things.
I have a problem with vsync/tearing. I'm using Ubuntu 12.10, nvidia-current-updates driver, unity, and have 2 monitors. Main monitor is in portrait mode 1920x1200, second monitor is in portrait mode 1080x1920. There is only tearing on my main monitor, not on second. I've tried portrait portrait, portrait landscape, and landscape landscape, no vsync issuse on any of those configs. The tearing is only when in landscape portrait m
ode, and only on main monitor. Any ideas?
Hi, I'm getting a low space warning and I haven't saved any big file afaik, help?
avelldiroll, I'd ask in ##linux too
It says that the device "Root filesystem" has only 800 MB free, then it said 500 something, now it says 20,5 kb
Elesa, df -h
now only 8,0 kb
._.
Elesa, could it be temporal files and browsers cache?
perhaps..
I'm going to delete everything in /tmp
Nope.
are you watching videos in youtube?
Gerowen: Thermal grease should be replaced each time the heat sink is taken off and put back on.
Elesa: Please pastebin the output of "df -h"
I am, I also recorded something with recordMyDesktop
http://paste.ubuntu.com/1322320/
what are the cpu hardware requirements for 12.10?  will a 3800+ 3gb do well?
anyone know anything about ubuntu on arm? got a gs3 i want to install into
what's 3800+
amd ahtlon64
instantp10neer: amd?
2.0ghz
yes
Elesa: run: sudo apt-get clean   and pastebin df -h again please
Ok.
it is very slow with 1gb and i want to know if a ram upgrade will fix the performance or will it require an alternate cpu?
Athlon 64 X2 3800+ would be fine
for x64?
instantp10neer, yes you have more than enough  to run 12.10~
Elesa: It's not your /home partition that is full, it is /
it is very slow at 1gb of ram
well, open a terminal, and type free -m, then paste to pastebin and link us
is that normal?
hi
yeah but I haven't installed any program that heavy besides recordMyDesktop and I had much more space some minutes ago
it could be several things instantp10neer, we need to quantify that
darmok and jalad at tanagra
Elesa: So what do you have installed?  Its 19G which SHOULD be enough.
recordmydesktop can keep going, and will take up lots of space if it does Elesa
instantp10neer, only 1GB ram?    might be just barely enough     do you have swap partition as well?
Elesa: Did you run recordmydesktop as root?
snark, ubuntu runs fine with far less; try 128-256MB
umm, nope
can any one help me set up dhcpd ?
http://paste.ubuntu.com/1322326/
u4and     maybe if your not using X :P
shaka when the walls fell
heh
no swap
Elspuddy-: cd / ; ls -lS |grep ^d   <will show directories sorted by size>
Elesa: sudo du -sch /tmp /var
er spose that worx too
instantp10neer: you could switch to LXDE and the desktop will use less RAM
i have a 2gb ram upgrade inc
no trouble if the cpu suffices
yeah i saw those poor ram dude in TRON
^
Elesa,   your root partition is completely full   ie   100%  full   according to your patbin info
Elesa: lsb_release -a
Elesa, try removing temporal files from your browsers
http://paste.ubuntu.com/1322332/
Elesa,   your root partition is completely full   ie   100%  full   according to your paste*bin info
pepee: That will not help at all, because / is full, not /home
Elesa: can you pastebin the output of:  uname -a; dpkg -l | grep linux-image
ah yeah bekks , didn't see that
That's the output of sudo du -sch /tmp /var
so /tmp is full, must be recordMyDesktop's fault?
Elesa, to pastebin :  ps axuf
it will show a large list
Anybody have any success getting cheese to even run?
Rootbrian: many do
Tried doing: apt-get clean ?
Danke Schoen
Downloaded debs get held onto a lot of the time.
For me, cheese doesn't run in 12.04 or 12.10.
will c u tomorrow am :)
Rootbrian: if you run it in terminal, the output will give clues
Rootbrian, are you using kde?
ActionParsnip, http://paste.ubuntu.com/1322337/
I'm at starbucks, away from my desktop and in here using jmirc.
Elspuddy-: That is quite possible.  cd /tmp/ ; ls -lS |grep ^d
Elesa: cd / ; ls -lS |grep ^d   <will show directories sorted by size>
It's the standard ubuntu with unity, but I run fluxbox or the 2D gnome panel.
save water, shower with your girlfriend
yeah /tmp is 9GB :c
Elesa: you may want to reboot to the newer kernel, then remove the other 2 kernels. You will get about 240Mb back
Elesa: cd /tmp/ ; du -s * | sort -n    <will list by file sizes, largest last>
Elesa, to pastebin, please :  ps axuf
cd /tmp/
oops lol
Once I arrive home, I'll get some pastes going for cheese in both, maybe then the developers can correct it, or canonical can issue a fix to get it working.
brb
That aside, I'm loving the fact that 12.10 actually works on my ages old compaq evo desktop.
So im having trouble resolving a host name of a different computer. if i ping <hostname> it wont resolve
Rootbrian: the required hardware isn't very dfferent between releases
krunal: How about it's IP address?
Krunal did you try connecting directly to the cable or dsl modem?
krunal: can you ping the IP?
vfw, IP address works
just not computer name
krunal: will the IP ever change?
krunal, checked /etc/resolv.conf ?
krunal: It's an issue with the router.
It's assigned by my router ...not static but it coud change
krunal: is the system's IP and name in the DHCP clients table?
let me check
It's funny how 12.04 will turn my screen into a colorful blockaide full of pixels when resuming from standby. Instant kernel panic. Haven't tried 12.10 yet and I'm anxious to see if it successfully "resumes" when I get home.
actionparsnip: it does show in my table
krunal: Just use IP addresses
Funny how ip addresses work instead of host names.
vfw, do i have to?
Yeah i know right
windows doesn't have this issue
btw windows 8 blows
Router issues do plague me sometimes. Had to reboot mine twice and then it locked up due to DSL actually being down, cold boot fixed it.
rootbrian: thats the lysergic expression of the inner heart from your computer, thats why its so colorful
Hitting that windows key + E will launch explorer, and clear that awful "start" screen menu.
lsd   yum yum!
DarmOk it's a great wallpaper. I'm going to snap a picture of it next time.
For those who suggested checking the RAM, I ran Memtest from the server install disc and after a few minutes I had a bunch of red on the screen, so I've re-seated my RAM and am running the test again.  Apparently the issue was bad RAM.
Though I'll need the tripod to ensure it's not blurry to get an amazing 16mp shot of it.
If I want to put /tmp into RAM do I use
none /tmp tmpfs defaults 0 0
or
tmpfs /tmp tmpfs defaults,noatime,mode=1777,nosuid 0 0
hai hai, FloodBot1
tmp in ram no
that SUCKS!
Why?
As if bad ram wasn't bad enough, another of my computers I set up for my parents (xubuntu on it), it has 1.5 GB and it's mismatched with different speeds, but it runs fine. BIOS always complains each time.
use graphics mem instead
Hemebond: like this - tmpfs 		/tmp		tmpfs 	defaults,mode=1777,size=2g 		0 	0
krunal: I use a DD-WRT routers.  I set all of the PCs I need to access to static IPs and with corresponding host names in the router's config.  I use host-names that are short and make sense to me. easy-peasy
Hemebond: weird chars are tabs...
somsip: Thanks. If the first line no longer accurate?
Hemebond: not sure what you mean?
It apparently worked fine, so I'm wondering why the difference.
tempfs in mem, thats insane, the system just uses more swap
The first line uses filesystem none
Hemebond: no idea. That's what's ion mine and it's fine
somsip: Cool, thank you.
Darm0k: Why?
Hemebond: np
Anybody good with wirless lan cards? I am having trouble getting mine to connect to WPA2 internet connections.. Im running xubuntu on a IBM ThinkPad T41
wilee-nilee, ur a genius, that multisystem is pretty powerful
use temp on another free disk or clean up disk space
tricks or treats ?
Darm0k, unless you don't have swap mem, and have lots of RAM
because you throw away memory
XiaolinDraconis, It is a keeper for sure. ;)
hfb: What seems to be the trouble?  NetworkManager not doing the job?
not anyone has 16 or 32gb machines
Darm0k: tmpfs grows to use what it needs. If there is 40MB in /tmp, only 40MB is used. And it depends a lot on how much RAM is in the PC
I have 16GiB of RAM.
i have 1.21 Jiggawatts of Power
for those of us that has 1GB of ram, that wouldn't work.
hfb: Why don't you start by telling us what wireless card it is?  (What does lspci say about it?)
Rootbrian: it isn't a recommendation for everyone
Darm0k, that doesn't translate to RAM
you need to download it
pepee: no clue, ask dr doolittle
somsip I know. :)
dr doolittle knows much about ram
hi all, im on 12.10 and empathy wont save nickserv password. how are you guys fixing that
nOStahl, By using hexchat
lspci?
Chatzilla is a firefox addon, it saves passwords. I recommend it.
nOStahl: That is an issue between IRC and your Client app.
vfw its an ubuntu issue as they chose to package it :)
I believe pidgin works with IRC.
that said, ive not had any issues with empathy for the years i've been using it.
nOStahl: If you use irssi, see http://irssi.org/documentation
i use xchat, but i don't know why
try irssi
Reasons being, I'm skipping 12.10. The LTS is better suited. ;)
bit of a wait for the next lts
I'm fine with waiting. As long as 12.04 is good and I can deal with a non-functioning cheese, I'm cool.
cheese works for me on 12.04
nOStahl: Yea, it's almost time to upgrade, but not yet.... IMHO
Mine gets the crash message from apport all the time and never runs.
Maybe it hates the 12 year old computer I love.
Rootbrian, 12 year old eh   what is a 386?
nOStahl: Rootbrian (...from 10.04 to 12.04 ...)
snark, he said his computer is 12 years old. You must be 12.
p4, 3.06 GHz, 533MHz FSB, 1GB SD DDR RAM @ 133 Mhz
jagginess, you must be unable to read
Rootbrian, that sure is quite outta date :).. upgrade!
snark: Amazing observation abilities
it's faster than most dual/quad cores. :D
snark, sarcasm double fails.. go take a hike punk.
jagginess, and snark thats enough
jagginess: Amazing lack of humor
vfw, you too
i'm not trying to be funny.. his computer is pretty old
lets move on please
it suits my needs.
Rootbrian, you definitely would bump into problems, what would help is if you have a good video card (but its not worth buying one for that machine)
very childish :d
Move on and have fun.
Mine is an ATI 4650 HD
Good video card, but ati hates it. :P
Rootbrian, that can help.. it's worth a shot i guess
1GB GDDR2, 400MHz GPU.
did they fix the freezing after sleep for laptops in 12.10 ?
now if graphics ram could be used to supplement system memory, that gives me 2GB.
fusk: Depends on how much RAM you have.
Fsck mine freezes after waking up.
*fusk
vfw, 1gb
graphic mem could be used for it
Same on my pc, 1GB.
fusk: *swap*  I meant to say swap nor RAM  1G of RAM is a bit low.
vesafb
I don't know where the heck I could get a 1GB SD DDR 133MHz memory module. PC2100 by the way.
vfw, don't know how much swap, default i guess. It is a netbook, that's why 1gb.
Rootbrian: ebay
rootbrian: emeow?
ameowzone?
Tigerdirect only has 512MB sticks. My system has two slots with 2x 512
fusk: sudo fdisk -l
anybody know how I can set 3-finger-tap as middle click? (Or even better, 2-finger and 3-finger for right-click)?
fusk: sudo fdisk -l |pastebinit #And send us the resulting URL, (if you want us to see).
Ebay only has compaq evo desktops. All sold out I believe.
txdgnhndkxhg
rode?
Rootbrian, it's not worth upgrading anything on a 12 year old computer.. It's better to buy a new system
Not worth buying another desktop of the same or less specs of mine and including the shipping costs. Yikes.
ok
Rootbrian, tigerdirect.com and click buy
I agree. I'm sticking it out until it blows out
jagginess, as long as you run linux on it it should be fine
That whole "secure boot" thing on newer windows 7/8 pc's, forget it. It won't work with linux.
secure boot / uefi works on linux
hfb: See my PM
Okay, good.
secure boot is not all enforced, it can be turned off, and linux can install on these new motherboards. nice assumption though, a couple of us are laughing.. linux has been installed on these systems.
Alright. That assured me more. The source and others say it won't work.
(and btw, canonical has a key for secure boot as well for ubuntu in case you didnt know, thanks canonical)
Oh man, that rocks!
oh get out Rootbrian.. you're trolling.
But disabling secure boot is a must.
I got this info from the free software foundation. I was only going by what I read.
secure boot / uefi works on linux, grub has support them
I guess they need to update their records?
Anyways, I gotta get out of this starbucks. waited for somebody to show up and they're a no-show.
what a starbucker
when using ubuntu my fans go crazy. Is there a solution
deihmos, why become crazy ?
ubuntu makes it go crazy
very loud
envy 17 with i7 processor
i7-2760qm 2.4ghz
probably something new in 12.10, there is a newer kernel 3.5, maybe a module needs to be loaded (speedstep maybe?)
deihmos, sorry, i can't reconfigure your crazineess .... You just told make crazy, but not was happen ...very subjective
is 12.04.1 different from 12.04 ?
vlanx, different with updates included
i said they are very loud. meaning they spin at max speed in ubuntu
blackshirt: 3.5 kernel?
anyone else have youtube videos end at around 90% on ubuntu 12.10?
my ubuntu just made one "bip" and I don't know why, ideas?
vlanx, the bare bone was same
vfw, http://pastebin.com/BSMNEehG
vlanx, maybe the updates new kernel ...
sorry, took a while
fusk: what command gives this output ?
blackshirt: maybe i can just try the 12.10 version too... do you happen to know the major differences between desktop and server?  Different packages installed?
vlanx, server was not needed gui/desktop to run ...
VlanX, sudo fdisk -l
oh so it's a major change
vlanx, commonly server version was ubuntu minimal with set of server service was installed
vlanx, but it was depends wwhen you install it service, included or not
What is the console and how do I find it?
blackshirt: got that :)
kyle_ whats you mean with console here ?
I'm...not sure...
I'm new to Ubuntu and Linux in general.
kyle__: usually: ctrl+alt+f2. it's the linux text mode
I was asked what the console said when a program crashed.
kyle__, it might be an icon called  Terminal
Does anyone know the difference between -3.5 dB and -7 dB on a modem coaxial splitter?
if you want a console, in unity type in terminal :P
wowowo, a console for what?
VlanX, what do you mean major change ?
For those interested in participating in Movember this year, there's now an Ubuntu network to be a part of http://ca.movember.com/mospace/network/Ubuntu
sorry xangua
xangua, is there a channel for community related discussion or is that lumped into 'off topic'?
can 12.10 server boot from lvm + raid?
stochastic, how long does it take to grow a mustache?
snark that depends on your heritage
hi every body
I've been fighting with my nvidia drivers.  None of the forums I've looked at have helped.  I'm trying to use the nvidia drivers, and I want to rotate my screen.  I just can't seem to get it to work.  I have nvidia-current-updates installed. I'm using TwinView to rotate the screen.
anyone know why compiz-fusion-plugins-extra was removed from the repository?
ubuntu 12.04 is very best.
stochastic, Iwould need a lot more than a month!
I use it for 2 years.
Can anyone point me in the right direction on how to get started with understanding linux?
aye, however it's not in the repository
snark, then you can just donate to others to help the cause or help spread the word to others
stochastic, I will head over to ca.movember.com and have a gander
snark http://ca.movember.com/mospace/network/Ubuntu  is the Ubuntu network link, movember.com is the main site
anybody know how I can set 3-finger-tap as middle click? (Or even better, 2-finger and 3-finger for right-click)?
@xangua :literally no software centre entry, have checked software sources
I just upgraded to Ubuntu 12.10 from 10.04 (upgraded through upgrade manager) and most things seem alright. The biggest problem though is pidgin now no longer appears in the tasktray, and will completely close when I close the 'buddy list' window. What is going on and how do I fix this?
hello everyone
hello rammy
hello
new to freenode
I do have 'pidgin-libnotify' installed, but I do not know if the plugin is enabled. I do not see it in the plugins list. (I had a similar issue long ago, and this was the fix, so just more troubleshooting information if related)
pcg: port to new messaging-menu API in 12.10 isn't complete for pidgin yet
trism: Thanks for the response. Is there a workaround?
pcg:the pidgin libnotify plugin doesn't support the new ondemand feature of the message indicator, but you can add pidgin to the system tray blacklist for it to show the system tray icon; use dconf for that...here is an example http://askubuntu.com/questions/39843/application-indicator-for-shutter
howdy
pcg, also check option "show system tray icon" under preference, if you choose always it should not close when closing buddy list
xektrum, It is set to 'always'. "Should" and reality in software differ. :P
pcg I've just tested on gnome-shell, if I set never and I close buddy, pidgin closes, but If I set always and I close pidgin, it goes to the tray icon
however it might be different on unity
anyone willing to help me setup dialup in lubuntu11
xangua: Thanks for the response. I looked into that askubuntu page and do not have desktop -> unit -> panel in dconf-editor. Possibly related to the fact it is from mid-2011.
desktop -> unity -> panel **
xektrum: I'm sure this is directly related to unity.
ahh I see, then disregard my suggestion :)
pcg: it is in the dconf-tools package
I don't use unity :P
is there a way to manually get what packages have been installed? I'm trying to restore a really borekd system and I only have /var that is not corupted
how can I check where an environment variable is being set other than bashrc ?
frankcox777, as in modem dialup or network connection?
trism: I have the tool. The entry in the tool is what is missing.
mobem -phone line using gnome-ppp
pcg: oh, com/canonical/unity/panel
snark -modem using gnome-ppp
frankcox777, is it a usb-modem?
trism: Thanks
pcg: was renamed to match the gsettings key
snark -no-externel serial modem -it is detected as such
snark -ols US Robotics serial modem flashed to 56k
old
trism: I've added pidgin to the whitelist. Do I need to restart to observe the effects?
snark http://pastebin.com/hJ3jz9TV
pcg: yeah you'll probably need to log out/back in
pcg: as you were told enable the pidgin icon in it's preferences
frankcox777, not really sure what it is (i understand its some sort of modem!)
xangua: Trust me, i did long long ago.
trism, xangua, xektrum: Thank you for your help. Hopefully you won't see me again after I relog.
snark -is is a serial modem , a hardware modem that hooks to the serial port and is automatically detected
snark- it dials through a phone line
I have mine as 'Pidgin' but I don't know that case matters, should probably check sometime
frankcox777, your pastebin says "no dial tone"   is the phone line attached to the modem?
snark http://compare.ebay.com/like/360503172554?var=lv&ltyp=AllFixedPriceItemTypes&var=sbar
snark -yes and the phone line is hot
frankcox777, as I recall from the good ole days, there were certain codes you could send the modem to manually make it do things like connect to test it.... should be a list on line
frankcox777: called AT commands (IIRC)
thats the ones
snark - the modem is fine- it is a software problem
snark I can connect w/ puppy linux
frankcox777, I think somsip is right with the AT command
what is somsip
A user in the #ubuntu IRC room.
the person in here called somsip!
frankcox777, in puppy linux did you have a file called wvdial.conf?
snark -it has the file but puppy is designed for dialup so you configure it likw windows
frankcox777: I was just trying to give you a hint on what to search for if you wanted to delve into testing with AT commands. That's all
Will there ever be as many options in Unity  as there were in Gnome2 panel? For example a user friendly menu system with add-ons and options?
snark - I appreciate the thought but it is a pain in the rear to use dialup with lubuntu
about compiz:  compiz-fusion-plugins-extra was apparently moved to compiz-plugins which is why i was unable to locate it earlier, just an FYI
Will there ever be as many options in Unity  as there were in Gnome2 panel? For example a user friendly menu system with add-ons and options?
frankcox777, if puppy linux dialed out for you then the needed AT commands would be in the wvdial.conf file
while we're on the subject of wvdial.........
having an issue with a gps device in this laptop
have used the minicom to spark the device into live and it seems to be returning an output on gpspipe -r
howeveri can't get any software to pick it up, gpsd is running but neither xgps or viking can read the device
snark -yes but I don't think that will change the fact if goes from modem initialized to no dialtone that quick
There is a permission problem somewhere- I think I will just use puppy on this one
Laice: gpsd is pointing at what device?
I'm running 12.04LTS -- What's the easiest way to have a process startup when the system boots up? The process should be run as root, and have various commandline parameters set.
almoxarife: /dev/ttyACM2
Laice: what type of gps is it?
frankcox777,  better still   get a usb modem if possible
f3507g , dell varient
variant*
snark -why?
Laice: if xgps does not see it then gpsd is either not up or not seeing the unit, verify gpsd is up, under what user also
frankcox777,  they can be a lot easier to setup
hello , how can i run unity-2d-panel standalone?
almoxarife: ooh that sounds promising, was it the user group dialer?
i have problems with logout or shutdown
it is slow 30 seconds
Anyone? Is there some package that Ican use or something? initd scripts are a pain to use :(
may be unity-2d-panel is waiting for unity-launcher close
almoxarife: aye gpsd running under nobody
Laice: i am not sure what usergroup would show up in your sys, but i would want to be part of that group
how can i simulate a unity-2d-launcher
The modem is setup - it found it automatically - I have used the same modems with a usb interface and it makes no difference
jerkface03: how about calling it from /etc/rc.local?
for bypass the comprobation of unity-2d-panel
skypce: login to unity/failsafe(something to that effect) ?
Happy HalloWeen (almost)
hi?=
what does the user nobody represent? not something i've come across before
mother of god
father actually
jerkface03: init scripts are not that bad
i though this chats are something old and no used
there should be a skeleton one you can copy and modify to suit your needs
Laice: maybe this will help http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nobody_(username)
ty
im lead to believe that if you didnt want to use an init script you'd use cron, but I have never bothered to learn how it works
Wug:  Even that's a bit iffy. I just wish there was some interface for it or something
it's curious because i started up gpsd with sudo service gpsd start, and it's running under the user nobody whensurely that would be root?
just copy /etc/init.d/skeleton to something else and play with the variables at the top, which should be sufficient to run a process as root without any special tricks
Laice: its not an issue with gpsd then, the device itself, how does it connect to the sys?
frankcox777, yes I understand    its an AT command problem   you can sent AT commands from the command line to the modem
frankcox777, yes I understand    its an AT command problem   you can send* AT commands from the command line to the modem
you then have to register it with whatever the command is
almoxarife: lsusb:vBus 002 Device 014: ID 413c:8147 Dell Computer Corp. F3507g Mobile Broadband Module
I don't remember, exactly what it is, but it will set up links to the init script in the correct places and it will start and stop itself automatically at boot and shutdown
hi
hi
jerkface03: I think its update-rc.d <yourinitscriptname> defaults
run it from /etc/init.d
have you had your portion of fear this night ?
Wug: so I created my script then I run that command and it should run everytime i boot, or will I have to specifically start it each time?
i fear waking up in the morning and having to go to work.
mostly because it's 3:19am
HalloWeen 20 Y.O. Later of John Carpenter
hi
hello evryboddy
hi
my ubuntu software center is not working
how so?
change distribution
it frozen
is it  in the middle of an update?
can u exit?
no
try the killall cmd from terminal?
exit ??
ubuntu software center <-- what is the system process name for it in ubuntu
xangua: it only supports the gtk2 indicators, I only see application and sound in the repo
alteratively if you want a gui to do it from open up "System monitor" and find it in the processes list
xangua: in 12.10 that is
called software-center for the record
i am a few months into linux and i have ubuntu 12.04 and have been trying to install and get the application f.lux to function properly and have been having trouble
abdobonna: do this, alt-f2 , type in it " pkill software-center "
does anyone use this application
lead0r, what's f.lux?
it adds a halogen effect to the monitor reducing eyestrain
is that the lighting program?
ah yes, only mac and windows from what i can see
what the name of ubuntu software center in system monitor??
software-centre @abdobonna
i got it onto the machine and running with the sudo-ap-get
one sec will try lead0r
what was the package name?
not found
http://stereopsis.com/flux/linux.html
ah that's a ppa, will see if it works in a sec will just finish helping abdobonna
preesh
abdobonna try opening a terminal and tryping "ps -e | grep software-center
ok
that should give you a process id
hello everybody
then you can kill that id with "sudo kill ######"
where the #####'s are the process id
not give me any thing
hmm
very strange ghost then lol, muse be haunted
no any programs look like software center ??
not that i'm aware
might be worth restarting
and seeing if the problem repeats itself
lead0r: getting the same problem trying to install it
Laice: you can kill a process by its name too. man killall
lead0r: looks like the repository is returning a 404
bad ubottu, no biscuit.
I not found it on system monitor
laice: yeah i couldnt get it to function
from apt-get update: W: Failed to fetch http://ppa.launchpad.net/kilian/f.lux/ubuntu/dists/quantal/main/binary-amd64/Packages  404  Not Found
yeah i got that too
likely not been ported to quantal yet
i am tempted to email the guy who wrote the linux version kilian and ask him
either that or try compiling from source
hmm well thanks
looks like there's a source on github
laice: what can be done with the source
i saw that there was a source on github but i figurred before i would try and do anything i would find a place to ask questions
i'm no master on sources im afraid
lead0r, if you have the source you can try building it.
lead0r, no guarantee it'll work, check the verison numbers though
lead0r, if the PPA you mentioned has the same version that the git has, then the issue'll likely recurr
"compile
Anyone know of an app in Ubuntu that will show what shell commands the gui software runs when you do stuff?
lead0r: I very strongly suggest you get the ubuntuizes sources for precise and compile them to a .deb package you can install. that way you can easily uninstall or upgrade it later when a quantal version of the software comes out
lead0r, given the version and the upload dates, i'm going to say this hasnt been updated for a while
juan_: pstree for example. depends how long those shell commands last
juan_ runn the program from the terminal
thanks wols
juan_, depends what you're running.  what're you looking for there?
yeah that is what i figured
cool cool cool
laterz
 sleep to me
Well, I downloaded BackBox Linux, and am familiar with Fedora. I would like to run Ubuntu Software Center, and actually see the shell command lines for the update.
Like usually I can use yum or rpm to get packages . ..just curious how ubuntu software does it ...
apt-get
juan_: system-monitor will give you the names, so will top and htop
juan_: you can't mix-match rpm with debs
you are right, top says software-center . ....got a man page to ...thanks, that works . ..
juan_: we don't support anything but ubuntu here. ask backbox people please
well, one can alien a deb to rpm, not sure what type of alien will come out though
hmm ... backbox is based off Ubuntu ....
but it is not ubuntu, and hence off topic
actually asking about the ubunto software center . ..so does that qualify?
no. either you run ubuntu, then this is the channel for you, or you don't, then it's not
but its cool, I get it.
ubuntu can't and doesn't know how backbox changed their software
wols: i don't know about that, i run what i run, i ask questions pertaining to ubuntu here
kinda what I was thinking, basic linux . ...
almoxarife: you might not know but it's the channel policy
no derivatives or other linux distros supported
i'll make sure all my questions revolve around ubuntu . ..no biggie . ...
wols: i am sure the policy is to stick to questions about ubuntu, i doubt it says ' not running ubuntu? , not the place for you' , i will leave it at that, its offtopic too :)
wols, the only derivatives supported in this channel are Xubuntu, Kubuntu, and Lubuntu, as well, since those're official derivatives.  sometimes people ask for help with those here instead of the respective normal channels for those derivs.
TheLordOfTime: ok, if you call them derivatives
wols, http://www.ubuntu.com/project/about-ubuntu/derivatives  (some call them derivatives, others call them flavors, same difference)
I see this is a passionate topic . ...
its a small topic no biggie
* TheLordOfTime returns to what he was doing
i installed something with apt-get, how do i find what files it installer where?
apeman: dpkg -L <package name>
this doesn't show debconf created files however
Do you guys know if Enlightment got an IRC channel somewhere?
K350: #e here on freenode
wols: oh :(
ah,
bazhang: thanks for the tip :-)
HAPPY HALLOWEEN!
 i have a problem MBR of my computer is not working correctly .I can't boot  win's on it .Can any one help me how to repair my MBR
put your windows disc in and reboot
How  to fix MBR ? During installing an error message is displayed 'I can't  find where am i " check your MBR ?
polp: installing what exactly?
and how
wols: installing window 7
hi
this is a channel for Ubuntu only, a Linux distribution. get support for Windows in ##windows
please tell me, why the first command works,  but the second gives an error
iwconfig wlan0 key 12ABC45678
^ everything okay
but:
root@linux:/# iwconfig wlan0 key foo1D4ta
Error for wireless request "Set Encode" (8B2A) :
    invalid argument "foo1D4ta".
wols: same problem with ubuntu 12.10 but work fine with ubuntu 10.04 (gnome 2)
Marius80: the first one uses Hex numbers only (0-9, A-F), the 2nd one is a string
hum
polp: gnome has nothing to do with bootloaders. and the error message would be different too than you wrote before
wols, well, my password is a sting
string
what shell I do then?
convert it to hex?
wols: ok ! can't install win 7 and ubuntu 12,0X due to hardware dependencies and MBR
21/m here. cam2cam?
Marius80: use s:foo1D4ta   see man iwconfig for details
blanco, bad joke?
wols, I tried s: before,  same error
polp: more info needed. about the ubuntu install only
root@linux:/# iwconfig wlan0 key s:foo1D4ta
Error for wireless request "Set Encode" (8B2A) :
    SET failed on device wlan0 ; Invalid argument.
Apparently some one on freenode thought I was a troll being on Ubuntu Widnows and MacOSX as well as their channel I got banned lol
WRONG WINDOW!
wols: i'm not sure but when i boot ubuntu using Live USB  , it work fine but when i go for installing it gave me   an error that ' please clear your DVD /CD drive lens or check your h/w update .But while installing window 7 it gave me an MBR error 'can't found where am i '
i'm certain that's not the reason you were banned
hi there
I started the distribution upgrade, but I think its using a very slow server, can I stop it now ?
what will happen if I stop it ?
polp: https://help.ubuntu.com/community/Installation/CDIntegrityCheck
hi all! suddenly my headphone jack stopped working last night. there is little or no-sound in the headphones. the headphones are fine. the speakers work fine too. ubuntu is sensing the headphones. but no output in headphones. please help!
silv3r_m00n: you can. especially when it's still only downloading
silv3r_m00n: nothing will happen
Hi
wols, sorry, I don't want to disturb you,  but did you see me answer?
Can someone please comment on https://lists.ubuntu.com/archives/ubuntu-users/2012-November/265008.html
wols: yeah its just started downloading packages
Marius80: I did.
wols: so what am I doing wrong?
Marius80: isn't iwconfig doing WEP only?
wols: thanks, did it
wols, good argument
isn't there any way to connect using the command line?
arguments are not followed by a question mark. this is a question
you can simply edit /etc/network/interfaces and it will do it all automatically. it's what I generally use. not very good when you have many different APs to connect to however
hey all, trying to reinstall grub using this guide: http://www.av8n.com/computer/htm/grub-reinstall.htm Getting to the part where I run "update-grub" and I get the following error: /usr/sbin/grub-probe: error: failed to get canonical path of /cow.
HI
excuse me
wols, I am just google'ing to find out how
will tell you the result soon
Marius80: http://www.cyberciti.biz/faq/debian-linux-wpa-wpa2-wireless-wifi-networking/ for example
wujie, just ask. people will answer if they know :)
wajeemba: chroot to your ubuntu installation instead
ok,thank
wols, done
wols, how can I tell my pc to connect now?
it's been set to "auto"
is there any way to install a version of ia32-libs that isn't broken?
do I need to restart?
Marius80: ifup <interface> for example
oh, like on debian...
What do you know Deepin linux?
Marius80: it's exactly like debian for a good reason: ubuntu got it all from debian :P
wols, it's doing something weired
wujie: we only know ubuntu linux, nothing else. for deepin linux you must ask elsewhere
wols, http://pastebin.com/a4Ca2FCN
The os is on ubuntu ,
wujie: no it's not. It's based on ubuntu but not ubuntu
wols, I need to update the paste
one moment please
is there any way to install a version of ia32-libs that isn't broken?
nothing weird. check if you are authenticated (syslog should have it)
JaySee: ask a sensible question
wols, ok, that would be "mount /dev/sda2 /mnt/ubuntu ; chroot /mnt/ubuntu"?
wols, now it's finished:   http://pastebin.com/TB1exFCe
JaySee, since 11.10 ubuntu 64 bit is multi-arch
wajeemba: yes, for update-grub that should suffice
deepin, china,i has been use it
oh no. os-prober needs /dev and /proc too. need to bind mount them before chrooting
wols: "error: cannot find a device for / (is /dev mounted?)."
wajeemba: yes, bind mount /dev first, /proc too probably
hi, i have just installed ubuntu-server but i am unable to perform any root command due to "username is not in the sudoers list"
what's the default password for root ?
there is none
FISH_SOUP: type "su" and press enter
wols: after "bind mount /dev ; bind mount /proc" I get the same error. This is a new install, so I'm curious as to why grub failed.. I think I did tell it to install to a small /dev/sda1 partition in the wizard, so that could be my problem..
type su and press enter, it gives me authentication error
wajeemba: did you type "bind mount /dev" as a command?
yes, in a root shell
it asked me for a password when doing so, but if its not given then how do i know whats the password?
wajeemba: that obviously is not a valid command...
during installation, they ask you to provide a username and password
other than that, nothing else
so how do i install stuff if i cant even get down to root
wols: ok, I guess I don't know what you mean by bind then yet. I'm not quite a *nix noob anymore, but definitely not on sysadmin level.. xD
wajeemba: mount -bind
wols, yes i understand
but i cant sudo!
FISH_SOUP: if your sudoers file is fubar, then something bad happened on install. I suggest you use a live cd and fix it
it keeps giving me <username is not in the sudoers list>
if i am not even in the sudoers list, how can i do what you asked
FISH_SOUP: live cd
FISH_SOUP: reboot the computer, hold shift while it boots until you reach the grub menu. select Recovery. when you reach the prompt type without quote marks "passwd <newpasswordhere>" and that changes the root password so you can enter "su"
sudo visudo
yeah, bad install..even when clicking next all the way, it can "result" in bad install?
reboot: needs to be root
lol
try run
sudo visudo
then add ur self
FISH_SOUP: are you in a ssh shell?
yes
i am
then I guess you are fscked
lol
more like ubuntu screwed up for not b eing able to install properly
FISH_SOUP: get off your butt, go to the computer, and reboot it like a pro
FISH_SOUP: reboot the computer, hold shift while it boots until you reach the grub menu. select Recovery. when you reach the prompt type without quote marks "passwd <newpasswordhere>" and that changes the root password so you can enter "su"
wols: so "mount --bind /dev /dev"?
wols, sorry,  please help me with that wifi stuff
wajeemba: no. mount --bind /dev <chroot path>/dev
wols, I really don't get it to work out for me
wols: from within chroot?
so much for VMWare "Easy Install"
wajeemba: no. before you chroot. pointless doing it inside
testing
wajeemba: http://howtoubuntu.org/how-to-repairrestorereinstall-grub-2-with-a-ubuntu-live-cd/
Marius80: what did syslog or dmesg say?
FISH_SOUP, "clicking next all the way " isn't the way to setup a server.
OerHeks, well, they didnt ask for any other information except username and password
what else can i do other than clicking next to continue?
* rypervenche facepalms.
wols: also needed to bind boot and sys, but it says it worked :D
i blame this issue on VMWare "Easy Install"
doing it manually now
ugh, looks like apt-get upgrade screwed up booting
wols: is there any way check before I reboot? or do I just bite the bullet and come back to live cd if it fails..
wols, http://pastebin.com/bX2NijWH
wajeemba: only thing you can do
lets hope this manual install goes well too
wols: well, here I go. Will be back if it didn't work xD Thx for the crash course in chroot, that'll be handy :D
Marius80: line 9 and 10. why do you use ndiswrapper inside a VM?
oh. msiread. no VM it seems
hmm, isnt it weird why they asked you to select if you would like to install LAMP Server when obviously you are already installing Linux?
unless you want it to install another Linux on top on Ubuntu
wols, it's not a virtual machine,  but virtual box is running as a guest on this host
wols, but virtual box does not deal with that issue
FISH_SOUP, maybe you want only ssh & ftp.
Marius80: what wlan chip is it?
FISH_SOUP: no it's not weird. LAMP in this case means the packages for apache, php and mysql
realtek
I run command "ctags -R *" in the dir "/usr/include/gtk-2.0/gtk",but it still can not make a reference for some function
wols, ndiswrapper gives the driver
Marius80: a bit more info needed. lspci or lsusb
I am not able to change the repository server in synaptic manager, it reverts to the server of my country, why ?
wols, 0e:00.0 Network controller: Realtek Semiconductor Co., Ltd. Device 8172 (rev 10)
14:00.0 Ethernet controller: Realtek Semiconductor Co., Ltd. RTL8101E/RTL8102E PCI Express Fast Ethernet controller (rev 02)
silv3r_m00n: edit /etc/apt/sources.list then
wols: thanks again
ok everything is well now, sudo works fine with manual install...screw VMWAre install easy
Marius80: lspci -k |grep 10ec
wols, no output
Marius80: is it a eeePC? from the looks of it, it's a rtl8187se which would be suppported without ndiswrapper
wols, its a toshiba satellite
Marius80: lspci -nn then only the pci id of the wireless card would be needed
wols, beside a lot of other stuff,  I get this:
0e:00.0 Network controller [0280]: Realtek Semiconductor Co., Ltd. Device [10ec:8172] (rev 10)
14:00.0 Ethernet controller [0200]: Realtek Semiconductor Co., Ltd. RTL8101E/RTL8102E PCI Express Fast Ethernet controller [10ec:8136] (rev 02)
is anyone else having problems installing either skype or wine on 64 bit 12.10?
I have a 1TB drive with several partitions. 2 partitions are OS partitions and i choose between them at boot. There sizes are 125GB and 75GB respectively. I just got a new 300GB hdd and want to clone those 2 partitions to it so I can still choose between either at boot. How would i do this?
I'm having an odd issue with installing java on my server http://pastebin.com/kuAmARFs any ideas?
Marius80: what ubuntu version do you have?
i upgraded to 12.10 ubuntu and now every time i boot, or shutdown i have a terminal window showing all processes shutting down, etc. i'm very new, but when i use netstat it shows all connections as "stream" with multiple ports in use, etc. on shutdown there are many scripts that seem strange, albeit i am a noob, but i don't know if this is normal behavior with the upgrade/patches, or ? never did this before going to 12.10
Marius80: cause linux supports this chip since kernel 3.0 with the "rtlwifi" driver
wols, you got my version as private message
Marius80: and you can't run a supported ubuntu why?
wols, because trinity desktop still has a bug
I am wainting for the new version,  then I will upgrade
what bug?
and what trinity desktop? you said it's a toshiba satellite
trinity desktop is the old KDE 3
its beeing developed now as "trinity desktop"
trinity happens to be a current AMD cpu too
oh I see
I still strongly suggest a new Ubuntu version. with a recent kernel with proper support for the hardware
Like I said earlier, i'd try cheese out in the terminal and it crashed, never able to start, paste of the results: http://paste.ubuntu.com/1322656/ (this being on ubuntu 12.04 LTS)
what would cause ubuntu to immediately switch to a blinking cursor upon reaching the splash screen at boot?
 netstat
Active Internet connections (w/o servers)
Proto Recv-Q Send-Q Local Address           Foreign Address         State
tcp        0      0 Brandt-PC:53960         pool-72-84-220-123:9000 ESTABLISHED
tcp        0      0 Brandt-PC:38100         ps14443.dreamhost.:9001 ESTABLISHED
tcp        0      0 Brandt-PC:46232         mix.inf.tu-dresde:https ESTABLISHED
so there is obviously a bug with cheese
Marius80: the main error I saw in your dmesg paste was about ndiswrapper.
rootbrian: you want to see output from a vid-camera?
wols, I see...
both webcam and capture card.
wols, thank you so far
rootbrian: use vlc
almoxarife: cheese was mainly used to verify if the webcam I was using, actually worked with linux. But cheese doesn't start anymore since 12.04 LTS.
Is there something like the "Additional Drivers" program in previous releases to help me easily install and active proprietary ATI drivers?
rootbrian: vlc works
Does anyone know of any programs which seem to be detecting whether the desktop is currently composited? (Programs I could pick apart to learn to write an "is composited" test helper for a shell script)
I normally run Lubuntu to squeeze out as much performance as possible, so I don't have much experience with this aspect of composited desktops.
almoxarife: But does it capture video at the maximum resolution possible and save it to a file?
rootbrian: of course
almoxarife: I have never succeeded to get it working. But it's worth another try. I'm using the PPA for it and since it's always being updated, it should work. Thanks for the advice and renewed confidence, until canonical decides to package a *working* cheese and not some nightly unstable build.
almoxarife: i'm going to test it once an upload using flash player, completes.
rootbrian: vlc is the only thing i have ever used for my built-in cam, and i mostly hear people complain about 'cheese' not doing what ever it is that it should do
someone have any idea how to get pidgin to highlight the nick name with something other than bright orange?
with plugins installed, running in kde even
almoxarife: I have no issues with cheese even if it doesn't work correctly when capturing video or photos, as long as it starts up and functions, i'm cool with it. But if it never starts at all, then it gets on my/others nerves.
someone earlier brought up f.flux, i googled it, turns out there is already something older out there called redshift, so i installed it, imagine that, you can actually get a lappy to go redlit after day light
amazing
Filed a bug with cheese, but searched before filing a duplicate one, had I not done the search. I added the terminal dump to it via the comments. Hopefully they do fix it, and canonical does the right thing come their next 'feature' release. :)
since updating to 12.10 my boot and shutdown shows the processes which nvr happened before. i am new to linux/ubuntu/deb and not sure what to make out of them or why it just started showing all processes.  some seem odd to me so i used netstat, which showed multiple ports as "stream" and from places i have no idea from. is this normal with the new release?
I've inserted an SD to my laptop, and it automounts. mount command at terminal says rw, but nautilus says ro when I try to delete a file. what's up with that?
Getting the webcam working in vlc player shouldn't be that hard, it's not working for me. :S
Seven_Six_Two: What does it say about the permissions and file ownership in the preferences dialog for the file?
hello everyone, i trying to write a startup script in that i want that the sound should be in its maximum state. please suggest how can i do so...
aum__: Add a line involving "amixer" to your /etc/rc.local
deitarion, owned by my user, read and write
my group has read-only
Seven_Six_Two: Hmm. That IS strange. What filesystem is the card formatted with?
here is the relevant URL, i think, to my question http://paste.ubuntu.com/1322659/
I tried changing group to rw, and it pops up saying read only filesystem. I unmounted it and scanned it. fs clean
deitarion, vfat
deitarion, it's the sd card for my book reader
Seven_Six_Two: I think I know what the problem is, then.
aum__: This is probably the line you want to add to /etc/rc.local --> "amixer set Master 100%"
deitarion, I'm all ears! Well, my ears are at any rate
Seven_Six_Two: I've noticed that, for whatever insane reason, the FAT32 filesystems that SD cards come with tend to get corrupted. I've never lost any data, but it does cause Linux to force read-only behaviour for my own safety.
deitarion, what i guess, amixer is hardware dependent, the name Master changes from board to board.
aum__: Then run "amixer scontrols" to find the names your card uses.
deitarion, are you suggesting that I reformat it?
Seven_Six_Two: i'm suggesting the same thing.
Seven_Six_Two: Yeah. I've found that, if I copy all the data off, reformat using the Linux formatter, and then move it back on, it generally stays un-corrupted after that.
deitarion, should i choose the first one int that list...
Hello all
deitarion, alright. I'll give it a go. I lost my copy of "Flow my Tears the Policeman said"
ubuntu auto install is not picking up network source for install
please help
Seven_Six_Two: From the command-line (which I always use), the command is mkfs.vfat or mkdosfs (same command).
it asks for cdrom
aum__: Pastebin the list of options it gives you.
Haris: I suggest downloading the CD or DVD image, burn it, then boot from it and proceed to installing from there.
I need to install this via network
I am remotely connected to the box
Haris: Or you could use unetbootin to extract everything to a USB stick/thumb/flash drive or memory card.
Haris, are you using oob connection?
oob ?
I think he means out of band
Haris: He's asking how you are remotely connected.
via kvm
over internet
I can boot the box from network, the install starts
but it doesn't pick up the network source for installing ubuntu
Do you have complete access privileges?
it goes for local install, I think
yes, I do
Haris: What installer are you using?
you're doing pxb?
Maybe the network source isn't mounted?
box1 (where I need to install ubuntu 11.1.0) <-LAN -> PXE/cobbler box
box1 <-internet / kvm -> my PC
Are you in the same building/area/room/floor as the box?
aah...ok, now I get it. what is your network src? internet? your own archive?
the pxe box has the ubuntu files extracted from iso and placed in a folder accessible over http://
my own archive
deitarion, my question is should i choose first one in that list every time ... http://paste.ubuntu.com/1322693/
I have it placed at http://192.168.1.29/cblr/ubuntu/
Haris: I don't think that's how you're supposed to do it.
HI
anyone know how I can get the ia32-libs on a 64 bit system?
deitarion: Please elaborate
Athquiz: sudo apt-get install libjpeg62:i386
should it be ftp rather than http ?
is that path a list of debs?
is there a list of debs at that path?
that's the path to the folder where the ubuntu 11.10 iso is extracted
I think the debs list is at
Haris: I would suggest, if you have physical access to it at some point, install it from the CD or DVD.
rootbrian: hold please
Haris: Generally, in the name of being foolproof, installers tend to actually check whether the CD/DVD source is really a CD/DVD drive. I do know that you can install Debian-based distros from network sources, but the official steps to setting up your own mirror probably result in a slightly different filesystem.
ok, if you're going to use an iso, mount it loopback and use it as a cd source, not network.
vooze: unable to locate package
http://192.168.1.29/cobbler/ubuntu/dists/oneiric/main/binary-amd64/
I recently buy a D-Link wireless modem router. I can cannect with it in bridge mode. But in PPPOE mode i can't connect.
s/filesystem/filesystem layout/
this folder contains Packages.gz
I'm just trying to get wine running, but I'm getting all kinds of missing dependencies
Athquiz: hmm, weird.. worked for me :/
Athquiz: what version are you using?
12.10
64 bit
aum__: I don't have enough experience to say conclusively. I thought every device I've ever seen or heard of had "Master" as a standard control name.
deitarion: that'd be pretty odd if debian couldn't be installed over network.
Athquiz: did you copy exactly what I wrote?
Anyone can help me?
aln: Is the modem/router configured for DHCP?
vooze: yeah
copy paste
where's the debs packages in the ubuntu 11.10-server iso ?
Haris, it can, I'm just not sure an extracted install cd is the same thing as an apt archive
deitarion, thanks , i have seen such name other than master :(
Haris: It can. My point is that the layout of the files in /mnt/cdrom0 will probably be subtly different from http://www.example.com/working_debian_mirror/
hey, I want one my process to be up an running all the time. even after a fail/abort i want it to restart. I am using upstart approach. Can somebody give me a sample code to say run a sample.py file like this. please. I have been trying to get it working but I don't understand a lot of this. http://upstart.ubuntu.com/cookbook/
Athquiz: then I dont know sorry :/ just double checked.. it works here
ah I see
I can perform a network install from a mirror present over the internet as well, such as uk.archive.ubuntu.com ?
I do also have => box1 <- LAN -> NAT gw <- Internet
hi,guys
Haris: Last I checked, yeah. I don't remember how Ubuntu's recent changes affect things but I know older Ubuntu and current Debian both support minimal installers where everything except the installer itself is pulled from the Ubuntu/Debian servers.
aln: Is that wireless modem-router connected to a ADSL or DSL modem?
Haris, you can, yes. I've used the business card cd and pulled the rest from internet
when I create a upstart conf like http://www.bpaste.net/raw/XYsVmW0oavXHPS8VCzdM/ does this mean that sample.sh will always be up and running? please somebody help me with upstart! I am lost
the_dark_knight: what's in sample.sh?
aeon-ltd: maybe "cd /home/foo/  python sample.py" or some other command like "sleep 2"
rootbrian: I think it is DHCP. see this please: http://up.download.ir/di-V9D3.png
eh, If I was banned from the Ubuntu forums, am I banned here as well or what?
the_dark_knight: you could just test this, by running it then checking with top
wols: didn't work. I've got partitions left over from everywhere, so I'm just gonna clean wipe and install OS's again..
awesome. all this trouble because of poor epub formatting, and then the filesystem bailed and I lost the file. I found another copy on the internet, and the formatting is perfect. 2 hour waste of time.
Is there any big no-no to setting up my entire hard drive under a logical partition. I seem to enjoy creating ~8-10 partitions to play around with..
installing from CD is the last resort for me
the good option for me is network install
aeon-ltd: ok. hold on. after putting this sample.conf in $HOME/.init  do I need to restart something?
aeon-ltd: or should I directly put it in /etc/init/
wajeemba, the partition with your kernel has to be primary, iirc
i've no idea on how upstart works, but try in your home first
rootbrian: phone line in connected to the modem directly.
wajeemba, the rest of the partitions you can do what you like.
Seven_Six_Two: Are you sure? I thought, as long as GRUB was installed into the master MBR rather than the partition MBR, that requirement didn't apply.
deitarion, no, I'm not 100% sure.
Seven_Six_Two: hmm, ok. I'm assuming if that's the case, windows probably wouldn't like it either..
I'm pretty sure Windows needs to boot from a primary partition.
aln: Did you configure the PPPoE settings correctly from within the modem itself?
Anyone handy with Bash have a minute /msg me, thanks :)
Other question I have: should I be creating a separate partition for /boot, since I'm planning on triple booting Ubuntu/Win8/Arch
wajeemba: Separate partition for /boot isn't really that useful anymore since most distros either put the recovery shell in initrd or give you a /boot that can't run on its own.
wajeemba, you don't have to.
nautious ??
nautilus ?
Seven_Six_Two, deitarion, yeah, seems like every distro wants it's own boot folder.. so my followup question is, where will the final resting place of grub be if I don't create a separate partition?
how to update grub help me plz
is the netboot iso different from the normal server iso for ubuntu ?
rootbrian: In Windows it is working correctly
wajeemba: You'll have the GRUB loader stub in the MBR and it'll reference whichever /boot installed it.
hello any indian here?
aln: I guess the manufacturer didn't intend it to work with Linux. I suggest getting a refund and going about the ADSL/DSL modem and router individually if possible, like i'm doing. It's less trouble.
deitarion: ok, I figured there must be a reference in the mbr. that will live within the first 512 bytes of the hard drive, and I won't have to worry about trying to save space for it in gparted? (seems to want to save 1MB by default)
aln: i'm thinking bridge is the only way it'll work.
aln: Why do you want to connect via PPPoE?
wajeemba: Give it the 1MB. It's one measly megabyte and it probably knows better than you do.
aln, are there settings in the device for vci/vpi
Jordan_U: To share internet via my laptop or cellphone.
deitarion: oh, I fully plan on it. I'm just trying to connect my new knowledge to what I've seen going on previously. :)
Seven_Six_Two: yes
did you verify that they are correct for your isp
aln: By "via" do you mean "to"?
wajeemba: will you run windows too?
wols: yes, win8
wajeemba: if you run windows, make the windows partition primary. all the others can be extended partitions: linux doesn't care
Jordan_U: "with". Sorry for my English.
wajeemba: It should live within the boot sector. I believe the 1MiB left free is to compensate for idiosyncrasies in some OS/bootloader/hardware combination I'm not familiar with.
wajeemba: install windows first. leave space for ubuntu and arch, then install them
How to move sent mails from thunderbird to Gmail sent folder?
wols: yeah, that's what I was planning for order. :)
aln: Is it correct to say that you want to browse the internet on your cellphone, using the DSL modem to conenct rather than the cell's data plan?
wols: is it only possible to have 1 extended partition?
aln: If you intend to tether to your cellular phone, you'll need either a USB bluetooth dongle or the smartphone's Mobile Hotspot functionality and likely, a tethering or data option enabled.
wajeemba: pretty much but with as many partitions inside as you want more or less
wajeemba: No, but it rarely makes sense to have more than one.
technically you could create 4 extended partitions i guess. but silly to do so
extended is container for logical
that's funny, because gparted doesn't look like it wants to make more than 1.. Don't think I'll need more than one tho, it would be more of a hassle to manage more..
no, I think you can have only 1
aeon-ltd: still no luck. please help me out here
<waves hand jedi-like>
Jordan_U: Yes. I want to use internet in laptop and smartphone simultaneously.
Seven_Six_Two: Any of your primary partition slots (even all of them) can be used as extended partitions. It just doesn't make much sense to do so as you lose flexibility and gain nothing.
Does Ubuntu support desktop which you can interact with? Like have a box inside my desktop be a terminal
stuart_: Could you rephrase that? I get the impression I'm misunderstanding what you're asking.
Oh, wait. I see now.
Like my desktop is just a picture, can programs like they are a part of my desktop
Jordan_U, wikipedia entry on mbr disagrees.   en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Disk_partitioning#PC_partition_types
stuart_: Yeah. There are basically two ways you can do something like that.
aln: you'll likely have to use one or the other.
Seven_Six_Two: I stand corrected then. Thanks.
stuart_: The first (and most common) way is to set up a terminal which runs on login, has no borders, and is set to always stay below other windows and not appear in the taskbar.
aln: Under my impression, Mobile Hotspot works with up to five devices. Bluetooth, only one.
Jordan_U, np. I just learned that too
stuart_: The second is to replace the program which draws the desktop with something else. (That's usually used for visual tricks like using a movie or a screensaver as your desktop wallpaper)
deitarion: for the second one, what could I google to learn more about it?
stuart_: Look into running applications in the root window.
rootbrian: Thanks a lot  for your help
stuart_: Give me a sec and I'll give you an example.
stuart_: Also, what desktop are you running?
Jordan_U: Thanks:)
Seven_Six_Two: Thanks:)
deitarion, gnome 3
hi guys :)
stuart_: Then you can't use the root window trick. Anything with a fancy, modern desktop handler draws the desktop as a big window covering the root window.
(You can run stuff in the root window, but it'll be hidden by the desktop which covers it and can't be hijacked in that manner)
However, there may be plugins for GNOME 3 to achieve a similar effect.
suddenly my mouse is stop working, is there any service  or cmd to enable mouse again
deitarion, what desktop did you have in mind? unity?
sasuke: Did you try unplugging and replugging it?
rootbrian: aln is *not* trying to teather.
deitarion, its laptop mouse . i am not using any external one
stuart_: Actually, I was thinking of something more like LXDE or Xfce where the panels and the desktop are drawn by separate programs and you can turn off the one that draws your desktop and drop in your own.
sasuke: Ugh. I generally avoid laptops. Do you know enough keyboard shortcuts to run "xev" so we can see if it's still seeing your mouse clicks?
aln: What you're trying to do, have multiple devices accessing the internet from the same router, is how routers come configured by default and should work perfectly fine. You do *not* want PPPoE or bridged mode though, as those both allow only one device to connect at a time (though I will admit I'm not very familiar with "bridged mode" and may be wrong there).
deitarion, ok thanks, I will try and see if i can get gnome to do it
Jordan_U: Bridged mode is for when you want to use your own router rather than the one built into the DSL/Cable modem.
Jordan_U: Whether you can connect more than one PC in bridged mode without using your own router depends on whether you've bought extra public IP addresses from your ISP.
deitarion, ya some shortcuts i know. now i am only using my keyboard. i want to restart mouse drives. i know there is some cmd, but i am not sure... so i need help :)
sasuke: One thing you could try is using Ctrl+Alt+F1 to get to the system console and then Ctrl+Alt+F7 to get back into the GUI. That'll probably cause your X server to reset its drivers at least somewhat. (If Ctrl+Alt+F7 doesn't work, try other F keys since, on rare occasions, the X server ends up on a virtual console other than #7)
hello, pls can anyone assist me? I am having an 400 Bad Request      Request Header Or Cookie Too Large   error on my config
deitarion: Ahh, that makes sense. Still, that does not seem to be what aln should be trying to use, and nor does PPPoE (considering that the modem and router are combined). I'm pretty sure that aln just wants the standard configuration of a home wireless access point and router using NAT and having the router itself handle the DSL connection (since the router and modem are on the same device).
deitarion: We just need to figure out how to walk them through achieving that with their device :)
Jordan_U: That depends on his ISP and how he's using PPPoE. I know my router+modem needs PPPoE configured because that's how my ISP talks to it.
aln: sorry if I got lost/got you lost. Just plugging the computer into the modem-router via the ethernet cable will work fine.
deitarion, i got the answer from askubuntu.com, here is the command "sudo modprobe psmouse" . It works for me. Thanks for the info. have a nice day :)
for flexibility, I'm thinking of leaving a little unpartitioned space in the middle of my hard drive. That way I can give it to an operating system partition or my storage partition later just by a simple partition expansion. Is anything strange going to happen if I format this relatively massive extra space as swap ~20GB
wajeemba: Can't help you there. I've never used that much swap space because I've got four hard drives and I split my swap space across them so I can configure load balancing and have out-of-memory thrashing a little more bearable when one of my dev builds starts leaking memory.
I mean, I figure why not mark it open if it's otherwise going to be unallocated..
wajeemba: will be fine
but you can't use unpartitioned space as swapspace
wols: I believe he's asking whether there's any problem with making a 20GiB swap partition and then, at some point in the future, retiring it and re-partitioning.
< wajeemba> for flexibility, I'm thinking of leaving a little unpartitioned space in the middle of my hard drive
wols: Yes, that's the intent of the space, but I might phrase it that way too.
wols: right, I'd format it as swap, and then toss it later and make a smaller one to the side if I want more space on the neighboring partitions. Mostly just asking what's going to happen if I have a 20GiB swap file with daily use
wols: Your interpretation is akin to insisting that nobody has more than 100MiB of RAM free on any Linux box because opportunistic disk caching means the memory isn't free in the strictest sense.
deitarion: please stop
wols: Already done.
Jordan_U: Sorry. Please see this:http://www.techlineinfo.com/configuration-guide-of-adsl-wifi-modem-d-link-dsl-2730-u-for-bsnl-and-mtnl/
Jordan_U:  PPPoE mode is essential to share the internet connection with multiple PCs, Laptops, Smart phones etc.
wajeemba: Well, I can tell you that nothing out of the ordinary happened with 6 to 8 GiB of swap space in multiple 2GiB partitions.
aln, Jordan_U: That looks right. Basically, in PPPoE mode, the device handles authenticating with your ISP. In bridged mode, it just translates DSL to ethernet so you can plug another router in down the line and let that second one do the PPPoE.
deitarion: I mean, if 20GB of swap gets written to during a normal session, that's fine. The space will fill up. It's really not going to affect the number of disk writes, It'll just spread them out over the 20 gb instead of a smaller space..
wajeemba: ...yes? What was your question then?
deitation: just needed to say it out loud to think it thru I guess. didn't want to be causing more disk writes and speeding the failure of the disk..
deitarion: Can you explain more?
wajeemba: Ahh. Yeah, as long as it's a spinning platter disk, no harm. If it's an SSD, putting any swap on it is bad.
aln: With DSL, you need to log into your ISP using a username and password. It used to be that the DSL modem was a separate device which you plugged your router into.
hi, how to install my graphic card driver?
aln: Now that they're on the same circuit board, there needs to be a way to turn the router part of the device off so you can use your own router if you have a better one. That's what bridged mode does.
hello?
deitarion: good stuff. Off to install the windows I guess..
aln: Basically, if you're not sure, want PPPoE mode 9 times out of 10.
s/want/you want/
aln: Think of "bridged mode" as the on-switch for a certain type of after-market add-on.
deitarion: Is this only one solution? Are there any another solution?
can someone please confirm that you're reading me?
i see you
kristenbb_: We tend to ignore random "hello?" lines while we wait for people to actually ask their question.
deitarion: the question was right above, was it not printed on the irc server?
aln: That question gives me the impression that you are really out of your depth. What, exactly, are you trying to do?
kristenbb_: Oh, sorry. I didn't notice it.
kristenbb_: You asked your question poorly. Give as much detail as possible in the initial question. At the very least, is it an ATi, nVidia, or Intel onboard graphics card or do you need help determining that?
* wajeemba leaves a tip
I actually think I managed to make it work, by using a software called 'additional drivers'. It asks me to restart
i'll be back
aln: (I know you probably explained what you were trying to do, but I was very distracted at the time and it's awkward for me to check that far into a busy backlog with my current client)
maybe john connor told him to say that
aln: if it's a wireless modem router, why don't you connect via wifi instead and let DHCP take care of it all?
aln: Press and hold the reset button until it reboots, release. this will reset it to the defaults, then enter the PPPoE information your internet service provider gave you, then apply the settings. Next, connect to it via wifi. That's all you need to do.
hi, I have one very important porblem related to upstart. My sample.conf and sample.sh are here http://www.bpaste.net/raw/chfJp8rB37ci5HKgbymF/. when i do sudo initctl emit sample, it hangs my computer. I have to restart it manually. please help. am i doing it right?
rootbrian: With my desktop computer?
reboot
sorry, console in other window >.>
it's still me. it's actually worse than before. I now can't even log in, after the system boots, I get a window saying 'tthe system is running in low graphics mode. your screen, graphics card, and input device settings, could not be detected correctly, you need to configure them yourself'. what should i do   ?
is there a copy command that gives MB/sec and progress bars in a shell?
aln: connect the desktop computer's Ethernet cable to either port numbered 1, 2, 3 or 4.
kristenbb: what videocard do you have?
aln: also, before you do that, reset anything you changed via Edit Connections, or where you made the changes.
hi, I have one very important porblem related to upstart. My sample.conf and sample.sh are here http://www.bpaste.net/raw/chfJp8rB37ci5HKgbymF/. when i do sudo initctl emit sample, it hangs my computer. I have to restart it manually. please help. am i doing it right?
wols: nvidia
kristenbb: be more precise
wols: nvidia  gtx 680
rootbrian: Thanks a lot for your attention and for your help.
rootbrian: :)
aln: your welcome.
aln: I was a newbie at one time. ;)
rootbrian: :)
rootbrian, aln: And my apologies for complicating things. I didn't think before I jumped in on the topic of PPPoE mode vs bridged mode.
(I saw the one detail I did know and forgot to check the backlog to catch up on the rest of them)
kristenbb: pastebin your Xorg.0.log
wols: how do you mean, I can't even log in. what should I do ?
deitarion: Thanks:)
deitarion: no problem. I often get confused and mixed up.
deitarion, you need to still use a script for the gui?
hey guys please help me on this. upstart
kristenbb: continue to run in low graphics mode, uninstall the nvidia drivers.
the_dark_knight, there's a wiki and ubuntu help about upstart
jagginess: Context, please?
deitarion, something about 'composite'
deitarion, a little while back..
kristenbb: Which NVIDIA driver are you using? The open source or the proprietary?
jagginess: Oh, yeah. I've got this script I wrote which is sort of like DxDiag for Linux (it gathers debugging information to be attached to bug reports for games and other multimedia applications) and it doesn't yet check whether there's desktop compositing in effect.
opensource == nv , proprietary == "nvidia"
jagginess: Actually, opensource == "nv" or "nouveau"
rootbrian: I just tried installing the proprietary with the software called 'additional drivers'
deitarion, um.. what are you trying to accomplish doing with the composite detail?
deitarion, there's gui app helpers, like aRandr, and there's cli commands like xrandr, xdpyinfo
rootbrian: but I can't get to low graphics mode,  all I got was tty1, a console with no desktop
kristenbb: I suggest disabling the proprietary and going with the open source ones.
kristenbb: startx
kristenbb: type startx, hit enter.
rootbrian: it shows a blank screen
rootbrian: no unity
kristenbb: ctrl+alt+f1 and you can log in
jagginess: I'm already gathering output from xrandr and xdpyinfo (among others) but I couldn't see anything that says whether there's a compositor active.
jagginess: Here's the script in question: https://gist.github.com/3759156
wols: i am logged in, but still no desktop
kristenbb: when you are logged in you can pastebin the log file I requested. please do
kristenbb: if you logged in via the terminal where you're at, type startx and is there anything showing?
deitarion, oh yeah.. one of the glxinfo commands can probably shoot out what you're looking for, try apropos glx
kristenbb: also, follow wols's directions
rootbrian: yes there is, just a blank sscreen
rootbrian: I mean, I can see the desktop, but no unity
wols: how can I pastebin without a desktop environment
deitarion, but there's already gui apps that show this.. just a couple of apt-cache searches...
okay, press alt-f2 and then type in unity
jagginess: I have no clue what to apt-cache search. I know there are apps like fusion-icon which show which WM is active, but I have yet to see one which checks whether compositing is enabled.
kristenbb: Alt-F2. Type in unity, hit enter.
rootbrian: alt f2 doesn't do anything
(For example, KWin from KDE 4 can be toggled between composited like Compiz or un-composited like Openbox with a simple keypress)
kristenbb: Press ctrl-alt-f7 and see if anything shows
rootbrian: yes, some random text
rootbrian: the last line is 'mountall: Disconnected from Plymouth               [OK]'
kristenbb: Since we cannot see what's on the screen, I am going to suggest doing a reinstall.
rootbrian: a reinstall of what?
kristenbb: The current version of ubuntu you're running.
rootbrian: that's nott convenient, I just lost a lot of time setting up my new system
W:Failed to fetch http://extras.ubuntu.com/ubuntu/dists/quantal/Release.gpg  Unable to connect to extras.ubuntu.com:http:
kristenbb: This is out of my reach. Sorry.
wols: which file do you want me to give you again? and where is it?
jagginess: As far as things like xrandr, xdpyinfo, and glxinfo go, I'll probably have to just log into KDE 4, run `(xrandr -q -v ; xdpyinfo -queryExtensions -ext all; glxinfo -t -v -l) 2>&1 1>log.txt`, toggle compositing, log them again, and diff the logs to see if anything reliable shows up.
wols: I can't see anything starting with xorg or Xorg in my home.
kristenbb: /var/log/Xorg.0.log
deitarion, there's arandrd or a<>randr that is a gui app .. i don't know if it shows other things
jagginess: Probably not. I get the impression the XRANDR extension doesn't know or care about compositing
deitarion, but ehm.. maybe you should ask in #xorg, they can point you to better resouces
jagginess: Point. I'll try that if nothing shows up in the brute-force diffing of of the command outputs between KWin's composited and un-composited modes.
hello I am terribly new ubuntu i would like to ask how to install and or update software with ubuntu using commandline
rommel092079: `sudo apt-get install name-of-package` or `sudo apt-get upgrade`
deitarion, but it's kinda pointless what you're doing because people should not or don't ever toggle their live window managers..
rommel092079, and 'sudo apt-get update' to update the package cache
jagginess: I think you misunderstand somehow. The reason I'm toggling is because it minimizes the number of things that differ between "with compositing" and "without compositing".
what are we toggling
wastrel: I'm trying to find a WM-agnostic way to detect compositing and I'll be testing by using KDE 4, where you can turn compositing on and off with a single keyboard shortcut.
deitarion, but either the window manager should be set to it or not.. i think it's not very well supported for the libraries to allow toggling to be securely done without having windows cropped up
deitarion, ^
jagginess: You really don't get what i'm talking about. The toggling is just an artifact of my test procedure.
i am usig centos right now and i have issues with their packages. some are installed with yum and some with using rpm.  is ubuntu done somewhat this way too or just with apt-get?
rommel092079, #centos (you're in #ubuntu :)
rommel092079, not the same thing
ubuntu==dpkg/apt-get/aptitude , synaptic
rommel092079, its a similar situation, yum is equivalent to apt-get, while rpm is equivalent to dpkg
hey guys please help me out on the upstart
hi, I have one very important porblem related to upstart. My sample.conf and sample.sh are here http://www.bpaste.net/raw/chfJp8rB37ci5HKgbymF/. when i do sudo initctl emit sample, it hangs my computer. I have to restart it manually. please help. am i doing it right?
jagginess: The whole point of this exercise is so a script can detect whether the desktop is composited without recognizing the WM by name and saying "Oh, Compiz! That's composited" or "Oh, KWin! I need to use <name of command> to check for compositing"
rommel092079: yum is a rpm front end and doesn't install anything. apt-get gets the packages and does conflict resolution while all packages are installed via dpkg
deitarion, i dont think there's a standard API for window managers to report if they're using a compositing feature..
deitarion: you can't do this, cause the fact that it uses compositing is WM internal. all you can do is check for compositing support from the server
jagginess: But there's probably a standard API for the X server to tell me that some WM has activated the rendering redirects inherent in compositing.
is there ever an instance where you will be needing to install using other than apt-get?
deitarion, unless you can query some class trees like you can with old X intrisic classtrees
rommel092079: depends what you do,but yes there is. but you can then uninstall this package via apt-get again if you want to
deitarion, probably this might be another avenue, but other than that you'll have to probe it
deitarion, again you should ask a higher level group on the subject.. but I do know you won't get an answer about scripting solutions
hi guys - I'm now storing my ssh keys in a new location in /etc . how do I get selinux to allow sshd permission to read it ?
jagginess: We shall see. I suspect that, whether it's glxinfo or xdpyinfo or some other such utility, if I set it verbose enough and query the right X extension, I'll find some indicator I can awk out and use.
deitarion, you can probably script probing gnome classes, you'll have to find the right tools for scripting this, but the dev's at #xorg would point you to glx/xorg docs
deitarion, not talking strictly on xdypinfo, but some other miscellaneous helper tool in the repos
what packages are installed with apt-get and dkpg?
deitarion, (you can keep digging like -> apt-cache search glx ) dunno what grep can be used.. but there's always something
guys for svn any hosting free like assemla!
rommel092079: all
jagginess: *nod* I'll drop into #xorg now and ask since it'll probably be low-effort.
wols: can you give me example on how to use dkpg to start with
deitarion, what are you going to use with your script, xdialog? a misc tool like xdialog for the purpose you're looking for.. there's tools for scripting all sorts of stuff (and doubt #xorg can help you on this because you're not doing C)
cloudgeek: why not assembla? Free for no-frills isn't it?
rommel092079: to do what?
somsip: nope it's only free for 30 dyas
to install / update
days
jagginess: No gui whatsoever. It generates a debug dump to be attached to a bug report.
deitarion, well there's also dmidecode that's sort a structured output
cloudgeek: sourceforge
best hosting for svn for private!
or you use github
wols: let me checkout sourceforge
jagginess: Structured isn't necessarily a problem but it also requires root.
wols: let me check if github gives free hosting for svn
cloudgeek: limited if you setup a team account for a trial period. Free for single users
cloudgeek: oh - maybe because i'm already signed in. Oh well
somsip: we are 3 guys , we are working on the app deveopment, using svn which is best solution for us
cloudgeek, I heard Linus Torvalds made git
cloudgeek: ok - see you need team collaboration. fair enough
somsip, he, himself and hehe
jagginess: but i am using java , but for most things i use git only
cloudgeek, well apache.org has stuff, maybe ant (there's probably ant-addon capability for the eclipse IDE)
somsip: ya we working for an NGO app ,that will be free
cloudgeek, (eclipse and ant are tools for java development)
jagginess: yep i using them
jagginess: but how we can share and commit out code
cloudgeek, "ant" ?
our code
jagginess: okay
cloudgeek, dunno, maybe there's a git plugin for eclipse
hi, I have one very important porblem related to upstart. My sample.conf and sample.sh are here http://www.bpaste.net/raw/chfJp8rB37ci5HKgbymF/. when i do sudo initctl emit sample, it hangs my computer. I have to restart it manually. please help. am i doing it right?
wols: are you still there?
yes
the_dark_knight, what is that for? you'll definitely be safer using a crontab job for a user
wols: I managed to start unity using xinit
There is a git plugin for eclipse. one sec.
duh, i already told him
that's his homework :)
s/There is/There IS/ (I'm responding to your "maybe"
wols: the file you request can be found here: pastebin.com/4EMgfGGi
)
i dont think he wasn't listening to me.. but he knows better what he wants to do exactly.. :) lol
cloudgeek: you say git is okay for you? https://bitbucket.org/
Given that I suspect that's true, probably better to give him the "for skeptical noobs"-designed GitHub page on the topic rather than the mess of old solutions in search results.
hi guys - I'm now storing my ssh keys in a new location in /etc . how do I get selinux to allow sshd permission to read it ?
http://eclipse.github.com/
sandGorgon, if you enabled selinux, you need to reboot it, and update the selabel across the / drive
jagginess: but with cron I'll have to restart it for like per min. I want my process sample.py to be always up and running. you get the point? should I be doing initctl start sample. right?
the_dark_knight, do you know what cron is? It sure doesn't sound like you do. You can specify repeats with cron
kristenbb: have you connected your monitor via hdmi cable? if you specify the res manually in xorg.conf (run nvidia-settings) it should work
the_dark_knight: then start it as a user's script. not upstart
wols: i don't understand what you're talking about regarding "res manually", sorry. But yes it's a hdmi cable.
cron can allow user task jobs...
kristenbb: display resolution.
wols: so what am I to do exactly ?
How  can I get 120hz, anybody know?
jagginess: from what I know and have used , cron will schedule some jobs periodically. say do run sample.sh everyday at 11AM, like that. But with upstart I want sample.py to run always. Even when it gets aborted for some reason i want it to restart it again.
kristenbb, look in the menu for arandr or use xrandr in the cli
wols: I am not getting  it.
jagginess: have you looked at his xorg log?
jagginess: what??
the_dark_knight: what you want to do, upstart is the wrong place
jagginess: what's a 'arandr', 'xrandr', 'cli' ?
kristenbb, arandr is a gui frontend for xrandr, xrandr/arandr do the same thing-- change screen res
wols: so what should I do then?
the_dark_knight: do a cronjob which check if your script is already running. if it's not, make the cronjob start it. let the cronjob do this every 5 minutes
wols: I don't think cron is the option?
jagginess: I still don't understand what I should do
wols: i can't afford to stop for 1 min.
kristenbb, look with your package manager for 'randr', see if there's a<>randr and install that, it would be in the menu somewhere..once you install that, you do the click click from the menu
the_dark_knight: then why is your script stopping in the first place?
wols: which script?
the_dark_knight, the python one
lol
the_dark_knight: your python script you talk about?
jagginess: you mean I should install a new software just to change my screen resolution? I'm sorry, I don't understand.
wols: jagginess, suppose if gearmand stops. it will stop. sample.py is nothing but a gearman worker.
gearman worker? wtf is that? lol
hahhhahahhaa
How can I get 120hz, anybody know?
the_dark_knight: so you want something to monitor gearman and restart iot if it stops?
mN-, driver and monitor have to support it.
mN-, if you using cheap fallback driver, you won't get high hertz
somsip: yes
jagginess: yea it does, i can only raise it to 100hz however through nvidia, but in win7 i can get the full 120hz
mN-, how big is your screen?
the_dark_knight: then start gearman inside a script which immediately starts it again if it stops for whatever reason
Is extras.ubuntu.com down?
the_dark_knight: same would apply to your python script, et
somsip: I want some of my gearman workers to be allways running. they should restart after reboot, also if fail/abort they should restart on their own
*etc
jagginess: hmm i think it's 23inches
jagginess:  1680x1050
whitman: it's a normal web/ftp server. why don't you check for yourself?
mN-, you using "nv" or "nvidia", maybe you should try the "nvidia" driver
wols: I am sorry. I don't understand the "inside a script which immediately starts it again if it stops " part
wols: Do you mean use upstart for this.
wols, I have, I can't connect but it could be a localised issue rather than being unavailable for everyone
the_dark_knight: while (1) do: run gearman;
the_dark_knight, i think cron may be able to do that.. to restart a task if it dies out prematurely
whitman: http://www.downforeveryoneorjustme.com/
jagginess: no it won't
jagginess:  im using NVIDIA binary Xorg driver (prop. ,tested)
whitman, hey you know that book you wrote, 'leaves of grass', the poems don't rhyme.. it's quite a shame
mN- tried the nvidia-settings gui tweaker?
jagginess:  what was the command?
mN- and ask it to save a .nvidia<> in ~ .. if you can get a 120Hz with the tool, you can script nvidia-settings to auto-apply ~/.nvidia<>ttings
mN- , nvidia-settings
mN- , or use nvidia-<tab><tab>
mN- , it probably is in the menu
jagginess:  yea i was able to get 100hz from there instead of the 60hz
jagginess:  but not 120hz
mN-, see if there are edid errors, maybe you have a long cable that isnt very good
mN-, (/var/log/Xorg.0.log
)
wols: jagginess, I can solve it by cron but I don't like the option of monitoring at least per minute.
Can someone please help me regarding my issue with the nvidia driver ? The system fails to boot properly, and says 'the system is running in low graphics mode. your screen, graphics card, and input device settings, could not be detected correctly, you need to configure them yourself'
the_dark_knight, well you can show your #python script and people may suggest the best way to overcome and premature freeze/etc..
the_dark_knight, if it's a buggy script then you'd expect it to be very problematic with anything starting it
the_dark_knight: I just gave you pseudocode above
MBR problem while installing OS .Plz Help me !
polp, pop in boot-repair iso , it'll work after click click
pop it
pop it
jagginess: do you know anything about respawn. there has to be a way other than cron. I mean mysqld is like what I wanted.
wols: which pseudocode?
jagginess:  there are but more like warning regarding my usb keyboard and mouse
jagginess: ? , plz explain it clearly
mN-, do you get anything saying 120Hz detected?
is extras.ubuntu.com is down ?
polp, google "boot-repair iso" download that iso from sourceforge and boot with it.. it's very easy to use
polp, you know how to burn an .iso right?
hi
Can someone please help me regarding my issue with the nvidia driver ? The system fails to boot properly, and says 'the system is running in low graphics mode. your screen, graphics card, and input device settings, could not be detected correctly, you need to configure them yourself'
i have problem with ubuntu 12.10
jagginess: his MBR problems are with windows 7, with ubuntu he has "can't read from CD" issues
jagginess:  ok !
kristenbb: nvidia-settings
oh well that boot-repair has been said it can fix windows problems too, but i never did use it for that
wols: yes?
polp, maybe your cd drive is poop .. it's easy to make a usb ubuntu-installer with pendrive's usb universal maker
kristenbb: run it
wols: done
polp: did you check your CD integrity as I told you?
jagginess: can i use LIVE USB ubuntu , to solve MBR problem
wols:  yup ! but it don'r work
polp, if you can do usb-boot, you can use pendrive's usb maker for the boot-repair iso probably.. (i'll check)
hey .. it's my my third day . in linux ! is there any channel for newbies ? :p
cuore_: not a particular one. but we're happy to help with any ubuntu problems. there is also ##linux
polp, there's an option of 'Try unlisted iso' with pendrive usb maker..
wols: so I did open it, but what am I to do with it?
kristenbb: I won't hand hold and force feed
wols:  actually , while working on fedora , i accidently copied my MBR on my fedora using dd command
apt-get update fails
polp, the ubuntu-live may have the boot-repair app contained in it.. dunno
kristenbb: if you are unable to use a GUI program, you need to take a beginners course at your local community college
wols: I'm sorry I have a ubuntu problem, my system doesn't start, and I have no idea how to fix it, it's why I come here for help, I have no idea what to do?
it says extras.ubuntu.com connection fail
jagginess: d'nt worry jagginess  , i will try boot it
polp, but why use a tool that's not safe? next time use boot-repair :)
wols: jagginess, somsip , what is wrong with this script http://www.bpaste.net/raw/I31h8yLK629ioNwgJ8ge/  . When I do start sample it gives " Unknown job error"
polp, you sure there's a problem with either the drive or cd?
the_dark_knight: don't ask me.
wols: but why am I to do to make it work ? I don't know what to do, my system is broken.
jagginess: i think  with hard disk , while installing OS using live USB ,MBR  Error : can't find where am i now
the_dark_knight, i think it's more than that.. http://upstart.ubuntu.com/wiki/
here is past http://paste.ubuntu.com/1322876/
apt-get update fails
wols: thX .. and my first prb : i'm using ubuntu classic mode 11.04 with compiz .so if  i upgrade to 11.10 will i lose the compiz config ,.if not:will it work fine with ubuntu11.10?
compizconfig does work with 11.10
jagginess: do you think i can change refresh rate from " gksudo gedit /etc/X11/xorg.conf " somehow
savio: looks like the site is down or your connection dropped. Can you access http://extras.ubuntu.com in a browser?
however, 11.10 migrates to gnome3.. and you should be better off upgrading straight to 12.04 at least :)
savio: http://www.downforeveryoneorjustme.com/extras.ubuntu.com
cuore_: while upgrade , it'll simultaneously upgrade all packages including compiz .Don't worry .But i'm not sure which Desktop environment are you using .
wols, somsip try to update apt-get
savio: the repo is down
cuore_: in gnome 3 , compiz effect don't work .only support gnome 2 and unity
my problem is still not solved :(
somsip, must be some stupid company hosting it
polp: i'm in gnome 2
wols: cuore_  so , go on . Ahha !
Hey folks, I have a mac mini with 12.04.  I use pm-suspend to put the little guy to sleep, and I would like to be able to wake him up with the remote.  I've set /sys/bus/usb/devices/usb*/power/wakeup to enabled.  No go.  Can anybody point me in the right direction?
mN-, if you don't see 120Hz in the X log, you will never be able to get it
mN-, pastebin your x log.. maybe it's there..
Can someone please help me regarding my issue with the nvidia driver ? The system fails to boot properly, and says 'the system is running in low graphics mode. your screen, graphics card, and input device settings, could not be detected correctly, you need to configure them yourself'
crizis: polp : the update-manager indcate that i can upgrade to 11.1 not 12.04
well, yes, you gotta upgrade to 11.10 first.
kristenbb, make sure kms is not disabled (if you didnt then see if the x log says nvidia driver is failing to load)
you can only skip versions when upgrading if you upgrade from lts to lts
cuore_: correct. you can only update to the next ubuntu version or lts version and never skip versions in between
jagginess: I don't know how to interpret the x log, but I pastebined it. I don't know what 'kms' is.
crizis: wols  thx guys  .. :)
cuore_: well, i big suggestion from my side .Some time even if you upgrade , your compiz will not working correctly according to hardware .So, try to install fresh OS
hello
hiii
route add default ???
polp: what d u mean " fresh OS " ?
Harry_123, you on the road with jack?
cuore_, i think he means debian (*ouch)
polp: ubuntu 12.10 OS
who jack?
Harry_123, the song, hit the road jack,, as in route <> :)
Harry_123, route add default "sing Hit the road jack"
will dkms package solve recompling of vmware when kernel update
jagginess: cuore_ : fresh OS means new .iso (to which you want to upgrade)
savio: yes, that's what it does. if your VMWAre is DKMS aware
I want to add a single machine routing
polp, are you using a live-linux?
192.168.1.224 to ppp0. Vpn interface
jagginess:  here it is: http://pastebin.com/RUBBVhh4
Can someone please give me real help rather than incomprehensible tech words ? I am a total linux newbie and I just installed my system and I want my graphic card to work, and it doesn't.
kristenbb: with your approach this won't ever work
clear
#clear
wols: with what approach?
mN-, doesn't this look wrong "(--) RandR disabled" ? (can you post your xorg.conf too if you're using one?)
yeah ill post it
wols: I am lost, you told me to open a software but then didn't tell me what to do with it.
hi
hi
CLEAR
kristenbb: so let's try this...when you say the systems fails to boot properly, can you explain
mN-, cat /var/log/Xorg.0.log |xclip   , mid-mouse button pastes (can use pastebin if you want to do the whole thing)
kristenbb: if you don't have any initiative of your own, it's the equivalent of a toddler sittind down, crying for mommy to force feed him. this won't work. if you don't want to act yourself, bring your comptuer to some expert and let them fix it for you
somsip: yes, sure. I mean that it does boot, but at one point it stops loading (the login screen doesn't appear), and instead a window appears and says:
gin-Orange
what version of ubuntu and what video card?
somsip: 'the system is running in low graphics mode. your screen, graphics card, and input device settings, could not be detected correctly, you need to configure them yourself'
mN-, cat /etc/X11/xorg.org |xclip (and midmouse button pastes-- dont paste in here please)
is it possible to get windows xp like blue scrollbars in ubuntu 12 using gtk3
kristenbb: clicking on a GUI with a mouse is doesn't need an expert, doe sit?
kristenbb: what version of ubuntu and what video card?
mN-, cat /etc/X11/xorg.conf |xclip (and midmouse button pastes-- dont paste in here please)
mN-, (sudo apt-get install xclip  , if you wish)
somsip: the version is 12.04 and the video card is nvidia gtx 680
jagginess: yes
kristenbb: is this a new install or did you make some changes to an existing install that broke something?
somsip: it's a new install, but I did try something to be able to take advantage of my video card. I went to the dash and typed 'additional drivers', and installed the first one (proprietary driver)
somsip: and after rebooting, that's when it stopped working
mN-, comment out the horiz and vertrefresh lines, as well as line 57 and 58.. (use # at start of those 4 lines )
mN-, we can try to use wide desktop setting later
ok
Hi everyone. I have a quick question: I've recently upgraded from 12.04 to 12.10 and in the Software Sources preferences in the "Other Software" tab i have 3 disabled checkboxes with the mention "disabled on upgrade to quantal". My question is if this means that BEFORE the upgrade, they were enabled?
kristenbb: kristenbb this seems to be a comon issue and a number of solutions are given here. Have you tried any of these? http://askubuntu.com/questions/141606/how-to-fix-the-system-is-running-in-low-graphics-mode-error
jagginess:  what then? i wrote " # option "ster..."
Ampersand, correct. probably PPA
from 12.04 on bluetooth is not being handled correctly
Ampersand: Yes, third party repositories are always disabled as one of the first steps in upgrading.
and it's safe to re-enable them then?
yes, they're all PPAs (launchpad and dropbox)
can I install ubuntu from minimal iso on a pppoe connection?
yeah.. disable the ppa's when upgrading.. you can rename the .list to a .list_dis
Ampersand, check if there are PPA builds for 12.10
(in the sources.d folder)
whenever I suspend/hibernate resume the bluetooth devices cannot reconnect
jagginess, they are automatically disabled on version upgrade, so no need
sorry, could you tell me how to do that (check for PPA builds for 12.10) ?
jagginess, did you mean sources.list.d ?
bazhang, i dunno, i spent 3 hours a few days ago doing things like this.. you talking about upgrading from cd?
Ampersand, just go to the PPA search page on launchpad
somsip: no I didn't. Am I to take the first answer ? It mentions it's only a 'workaround' but doesn't really solve the problem, is this my best option?
jagginess, any upgrade will disable the PPA.
bazhang, the upgrade failed upgrade.d (full instruction was followed, so i had to manually upgrade..)
somsip: and what is the problem anyway, why is it that installing a new driver would break the unity greeter?
kristenbb: reas through it and look for a solution that seems to fit with your particular problem. Some mention ATI video cards. These clearly do not apply to you. I see nothing in there that will break anything, and it's likely you will learn something in the process of working throguh these to see what works
the only way to solve it is to reboot or to restart X
Ampersand, the easiest way is to look at the PPA name, then search that name/that package/PPA in a search engine to bring you to the page
I'm on the launchpad.net site right now. I have to search in the searchbox "private-ppa" ?
kristenbb: thuogh you could just reinstall nvidia-current, just in case that's an easy fix too
I'm not sure on what the name is
private-ppa.launchpad.net/comm
mN-, i use 12.10, use ctl-alt-Fn
Ampersand, or simply look at software sources and check the PPA name there.
ah, I see, ok, I'll do that, thank you
can I install ubuntu from minimal iso on a pppoe connection?
somsip: how can I do that?
hello all
i installed ubuntu along side with windows 7
somsip: I actually managed to get to unity using xinit. But if I try to install another driven, it says permission denied
but everytime when i log on pc
i cant get any option to
boot ubuntu
kristenbb: in a terminal, sudo apt-get --reinstall install nvidia-current
everytime
windows opening
whats wrong with me?
mN-, yeah
and I have one more Q abouit the PPAs: is any PPA that's listed on the launchpad site safe? I mean, I do read a lot of articles on various websites, recommending to install various software from PPAs, but to check if they're indeed safe, it's enough that they're listed on launchpad that being an indication that it's safe?
can anyone help me?
an, I see... so, to ensure 100% safety, no PPAs should be used ;))
Ampersand: that's the official line
I see
ok, thanks a lot for your help
somsip: I tried reinstalling it, and rebooted, the error is still the same
kristenbb: and...? What will you do next?
Why does GTK3 think that it is above xmodmap?
 /scowl
somsip: well i don't know? I think it's interesting to try to install another driver, but it says i don't have the rights. How can I change that?
kristenbb: you could try doning what I suggested and looking at the webpage I found for you. If you want to install drivers, use sudo apt-get in a terminal
somsip: sudo apt-get followed by what? I wanted to use the gui called 'additionnal drivers', but I can't change the 'current version' that is selected
kristenbb: no idea. I don't use that
can someone tell me how upstart compares to systemd and/or link me to some nice docs?
kristenbb: sudo apt-get install {driver} if you want to do it the CLI way
somsip: {driver} being the driver's name, right? but how to know its name?
kristenbb: you said you wanted to install something. You must know the  something you want to install
somsip: no, not its exact name, I just said maybe it was worth a try to install other drivers, given that this one doesn't seem to work. But i don't know the other drivers names
I installed xen, and booted into xen kernel. however when I want to go back to the other kernel, it says "/bin/sh: libc6.so: no such file file or directory" or such. how do I fix that?
kristenbb: then maybe follow some instructions from other people who have solved this. On the website. That I gave you before. "Maybe"s are all well and good, but you've admitted you're a novice. Why not try some possible fixes from people who have BTDT
How to get 120hz in ubuntu?
somsip: because they themself said it was not a solution, just a workaround, so I wanted to try it last..
somsip: but ok i'll try it
ubuntu one is very slow, is there any log or some that I can find what's ubuntu one going on?
kristenbb: you read one fix. Look at the others.
How to get 120hz in ubuntu?
somsip: which one? none was selected has being the answer  to the question, and I don't want to break it even more...
somsip: should I try the second solution then?
kristenbb: And that's me done. Good luck
hoy
How can I configure dhclient to keep requesting a lease until the end of time, on a reboot?
somsip: this linux thing is not easy, there are not these problems with Windows. i am trying really hard to fix it, but I'm not as good as you, sorry.
thanks for trying anyway
I installed xen, and booted into xen kernel. however when I want to go back to the other kernel, it says "/bin/sh: libc6.so: no such file file or directory" or such. how do I fix that?
Kartagis: sounds like you did more than install the xen kernel
sounds like a lot has changed
or you've deleted glibc
hi
hello
you said that
heh, dpkg-query -l glib* says "un" for glibc-2.13-1
sorry i'm new here
and i'm french
nice name anarchy911
How can I change the driver of my graphic card ? If I go to 'additional drivers' and choose a new one, it says 'permission denied'.
tanks
kristenbb: Is there a fuller error message that comes up when you run "jockey" from the Terminal?
thanks ikonia, now to reboot
herpp i'm new here
blazemore: no, but using sudo before solved it, thanks. I'm downloading a new driver, the one I had was not working. I hope it will solve my issue
How can I use a keyring manager on Openbox?
So I don't have to type my ssh passphrase every time
blazemore: is there any good keyring password manager?
ak5: That's what I'm asking
Oh, so you don't have one in mind?
I create ssh keys with passphrase and then have them in .ssh/config
sorry, without passphrase
You can use GNOME keyring without the rest of GNOME
hi
I need an ssh passphrase in case my key is stolen
Why cant I login into tty1... with my username?
I just want it to be unlocked when I log in
mN-: Because you're typing your username and/or password wrong
blazemore: if my username is Donkey Kong and pw lol
and i type both in and nothing happends, incorrect password
mN-: Usernames don't usually have spaces in
What's the output of "whoami" on a terminal?
blazemore: ah okay thanks :P
it works now, didnt know about the space thing
is +1 up and running yet?
mN-: Your actual username is different from the "Full Name" or "real name" on the account
hi, i am new to ubuntu and opensource.
blazemore: yeah.. jagginess told me im an idiot and quit when i said i cant login with Donkey Kong :<
how can one contribute to the whole scene?
Has anyone experience in ubuntu on lenovo R500 an the use of fingerprint / card-reader etc.?
Spazz_Attak: Use Ubuntu until you know how to do stuff, then lurk in here helping people
as in where do i begin? and what do i need to know?
Spazz_Attak: read the URL ubottu just sent
Spazz_Attak, read the links provided.  then tinker and report
ikonia: sorry it was libc.so.6. I did a apt-file search libc.so.6 and found out that it's provided by libc6, and dpkg-query -l libc6 says ii
I get kernel panic
Kartagis: yes, that's glibc
cool
Has anyone experience in ubuntu on lenovo R500 an the use of fingerprint / card-reader etc.?
ikonia: so, what to do?
e\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\||||\\\\\\\
Kartagis: your system is broken you are missing core libc libraries
\quit
Kartagis: you need to work out what you've done to remove it
I'm trying to open port 873 but it's not working - I ran "/sbin/iptables -A INPUT -p tcp --dport 873 -j ACCEPT"
But telnet 1.2.3.4 873 from another machine shows "No route to host"
hello
helo sir
How did you manage the name "john"? I'm impressed
Kartagis, it is also provided by libc-xen, which is a dependency of xen-hypervisor. maybe it has something to do with library load path
not sure lol
Yay I fixed  it, I have 120hz now!
mN-: Were you asking about that yesterday?
yeah
Kartagis: I suspect you have made a mistake somewhere or not seen somethin on screen
blazemore: They only helped me get nvidia-settings. but it worked after I modified xorg.conf saying 1680_1050_100 to 1680_1050_120, and then in tty1 just sudo service stop lightdm; service start lightdm
_cronus_: libc6-xen is also installed
so thanks to you too blazemore ^_^
sudo service stop lightdm? Does that work
I assumed it was sudo service lightdm stop
yeah i meant that
misspelled
I have a /lib/i386-linux-gnu/libc.so.6, if that helps
Kartagis: are you using 32bit ?
yes
Kartagis: ok, so you are probably missing a symlink to /lib
Kartagis, yes, that's what i mean. there are 2 libc.so.6 files in your system. maybe it tries to load the wrong one. ldd /bin/bash may give you a hint which one it tries to load.
ikonia: from where?
Kartagis: think about it
Kartagis: what you've got and what I'v ejust said
_cronus_: it tries to load /lib/i386-linux-gnu/tls/i686/nosegneg/libc.so.6, which I also have
blazemore:  instead of Option "metamodes" "1680x1050_120 +0+0; nvidia-auto-select +0+0", I just wrote Option         "metamodes" "1680x1050_120 +0+0"
. I hope it stays after reboot, too
Kartagis, you are running the xen-enabled kernel when you run this command right?
_cronus_: I've just thought that
Hey guys! Has anyone figured out a good way to get Beats speakers on a laptop working with Ubuntu?
Mornin' all.  :)
berdy: Surely they'd just work? It would depend on the audio interface not the speakers
I have an HP Pavillion dv7 with two main Beats speakers, two regular by the touch pad, and a "sub" that's beats
blazemore, they don't
sound quality is shit
just using the two upfront that aren't beats
inb4 "That's because they're Beats"
Kartagis, try sudo ldconfig
blazemore, so is there no solution for it yet?
berdy: echo "options snd-hda-intel model=lenovo" | sudo tee -a /etc/modprobe.d/alsa-base.conf > /dev/null
yes lenovo
then, do I restart?
Or log out and back in again?
Do you folks discuss Kubuntu here or is there another channel for that?
_cronus_: do I do anything else afterwards?
This one is more active DJ_U|Laptop , and a lot of problems aren't specific to KDE
roger, thanks.  :)
So ask your question and if #kubuntu would be more appropriate someone will say so
blazemore, do I need to restart anything now?
Well, the one issue I have isn't specific to KDE, it seems to be the display/backlight.  it's a known issue though it seems.
berdy: yes reboot
Kartagis, reboot to your previous kernel.
brb
pretty sure it's related to the GMA4500M display adapter I have.
hey folks..
jey lambis
I'm trying to figure out how to install this via wine http://download.spinnerchief.com/spinnerchief2.zip
Its an article spinning software that I need to use for my website(s)
Can someone try installing it on their end?
es para murtar
I can open it..but when I try to run the program I get an error
I had ubuntu 10.10 on my system, i had deleted some directories accidently and i re-installed it with 12.04. I forgot the password i had given during installation
how can i reset the password
"End-of-central-directory signature not found.  Either this file is not
  a zipfile, or it constitutes one disk of a multi-part archive.  In the
  latter case the central directory and zipfile comment will be found on
  the last disk(s) of this archive."
whoops..sorry
rsv: http://www.howtogeek.com/howto/linux/reset-your-ubuntu-password-easily-from-the-live-cd/
blazemore: i will give it a shot
*reboots
same
/bin/sh: error loading shared libraries: libc.so.6: no such file or directory
_cronus_: ^
Have anyone tried how to stream to a "western digital live" box from ubuntu?
Kartagis, could you check that you have /etc/ld.so.conf.d/i686-linux-gnu.conf and that it contains /lib/i386-linux-gnu ?
_cronus_: yes and yes
Hey there I have ubuntu 12.10 and I was trying to get hybrid graphics to work I've followed all the tutorials on getting it to work since I had it working on 12.04. I can't even get it to work on 12.10 and then I have to go and erase the xorg.conf for it to load lightdm but unity fails to load.
blazemore, still not working right
I have a Samsung Chronos 7 Series 15.6" model
berdy: Sorry then, I don't know
Kartagis, sorry, i can't think of anything else. :(
_cronus_: what causes a kernel panic?
Anyone else successfully configure their beats laptop speakers/
?
Well
There's a android app for beats audio
That's all I know
My HTC One X has that. But this is an HP Pavillion
Hi, I'm using ubuntu 12.04 and my computer is getting stuck in the splash screen when I'm trying to shutting it down (it didn't use to do this).. I would like to investigate to know what is going on, so where can I find the shut down's logs? thanks
Kartagis, an invalid kernel state usually
hsnmck: Try holding shift
when booting
you'll get the recovery menu
Kartagis, which means... anything out of the ordinary
jgfarnden, is there logs there?
hsnmck, in logviewer go for sys.log
I'm pretty sure there is
dmesg
Theres that too
xD
hi, can someone help me please , i Updated to ubuntu 12.10 , problem is every 20 sec when idle my screen goes black . i have disabled it in settings, but still does the same thing
please somebody answer this - http://askubuntu.com/questions/210440/for-processes-to-be-up-and-running-all-the-time
good night/day all.
blazemore:  it worked!
now, i have a launcher which is oriented vertically, how can i make it orient horizontally. this is in 12.04
hello. LN across directories doesn't work here. I have to be in the directory where the link will go and use "ln -s ../../target link-foo". why could that be?
ust submitted a "Show HN" at http://news.ycombinator.com/item?id=4726827 - let me know what you think of the concept - and feel free to sign up
rsv: What do you mean "a launcher which is oriented vertically"
blazemore: i mean it has all the icons "dash, home, browser..."
the_dark_knight: @reboot
rsv: That's the Unity launcher
anyone ?
blazemore: the vertical bar on your left
You can't configure it
I know right
the_dark_knight: also check ps x output
blazemore: i dont know how to, i clicked all over it
it doesnt work
You *can't* configure it
That is it, all it can do is launch applications
I currently have thunderbird set to use my ISP's SMTP server to send emails. Is it possible to configure command-line email programs to do the same?
sure MestreLion. you could use ssmtp or a fully fledged postfix or exim
I've seen the horizontal launcher on google
blazemore: i want it to run from the bottom of my desktop rather than on the left. it occupies too much space
MestreLion: Naturally, I recommend mutt
I saw in someone's yakuake, there were some indicators at the bottom which displayed temperature, processor clock for each core and user name, ip etc. Can anyone tell me what needs to be added to get that ?
rsv: You can't
for "command-line email programs" i mean tools like mail or sendmail (or whatever MTA/MUAs are common in Ubuntu/Linux world)
blazemore: okay
rsv: Install XFCE or KDE if you want a more usable and configurable desktop
Funny how the Unity dock is less configurable than the Mac one
MestreLion: use ssmtp/msmtp/nullmailer
anyone having any problems with suspend/hibernate-> resume and bluetooth ?
blazemore: so right now ubuntu runs what? gnome
MestreLion: example http://tombuntu.com/index.php/2008/10/21/sending-email-from-your-system-with-ssmtp/
Muelli / llutz: any of these tools will allow command line emails to automatically use my ISP's SMPT ?
rsv: A Linux-Centipede of Gnome, QT and custom stuff
MestreLion: yes
MestreLion: thats what they're made for
nice, thanks!
hi
blazemore: it looks good!
I'm having the same problem this person posted about: http://askubuntu.com/questions/205375/beats-audio-4-speakers-subwoofer-not-working-on-dv7-6165us-and-ubuntu-12-04
any one here have thoughts on it?
Have anyone a Western digital live box or such, and know if itsp ossible to stream movies to it directly
 Just submitted a "Show HN" at http://news.ycombinator.com/item?id=4726827 - let me know what you think - and feel free to join up
stevechc_: do you have any ubuntu support related question?
It was byobu
Muelli: llutz : what about maildir / mbox /mail / mailtools ? I'm not sure how these are related to command line emailing, or how they "interoperate" with ssmtp
hi everyone
liveintokyosubwaypleasetreamhalfwaytherujohtfy dephoverahaundeleter igfthandr aculesosmurderdomeshalftimeshowtimedenirowalkintheparkkiddoxcoguysnemtdooradercaprteveniegalhatealwaysonmymindlarryphotoshopiwoalsojimaking
MestreLion: no need to send mails
liveintokyosubwaypleasetreamhalfwaytherujohtfy dephoverahaundeleter igfthandr aculesosmurderdomeshalftimeshowtimedenirowalkintheparkkiddoxcoguysnemtdooradercaprteveniegalhatealwaysonmymindlarryphotoshopiwoalsojimakingliveintokyosubwaypleasetreamhalfwaytherujohtfy dephoverahaundeleter igfthandr aculesosmurderdomeshalftimeshowtimedenirowalkintheparkkiddoxcoguysnemtdooradercaprteveniegalhatealwa
ysonmymindlarryphotoshopiwoalsojimaking
Yes, lluttz, what do you think of this concept as a way of learning to admin your Ubuntu servers?
MestreLion: if you only want to send email, don't bother with all this. use sstmp and make your mail client send mails to the ssmtp server spawned on localhost
ls
file not found
Ok. fair enuff!
Muelli: hummm... so ssmtp creates an smtp server at localhost? so I could set up thunderbird to localhost? wow...
I wasn't planning on chaning tb's config... I would at first just copy its smtp settings to whatever solution you pointed... but "localhost" is quite tempting :)
does that also mean that *any* software that tries to send email through localhost will now work? :D
oh, wait a second MestreLion. ssmtp doesn't spawn a server. You would have to make postfix or exim to do that.  ssmtp is "only" a program to send mails via a relay
and yes, it's a bit messy. Even in 2012.
http://paste.ubuntu.com/1323099/
can  anyone help me?
MestreLion: be carefull, ssmtp does not queue mails. you don't want this for more than just systemmails
what's the url to the netboot for 11.10 ?
sdfdafadfsadad: you may need to restore grub. follow here: http://askubuntu.com/questions/27155
is it -> http://archive.ubuntu.com/ubuntu/dists/feisty/main/installer-i386/current/images/netboot/netboot.tar.gz
Haris: no
Kartagis, i thought of something else. there is a link in /lib/ld-linux.so.2 that points to the library loader.
its http://archive.ubuntu.com/ubuntu/dists/oneiric/main/installer-amd64/current/images/netboot/netboot.tar.gz
Haris: http://archive.ubuntu.com/ubuntu/dists/oneiric/main/installer-i386/current/images/netboot/netboot.tar.gz
Haris: if you want the i386 version
llutz: what is queueing useful for?
Haris: and why not 12.04 or 12.10?
MestreLion: i cant go to ubuntu how to "sudo grub-install --root-directory=/media/UBUNTU /dev/sda " ?
sdfdafadfsadad: using a live cd / usb
ok i have windows 7 already
MestreLion: if the receiving smtp-server is not reachable, a "real" (queueing) mailserver tries to deliver the mails later, ssmtp won't - it drops the mail
MestreLion: now i put ubuntu boot cd then what should i do?
sdfdafadfsadad: I mean an *Ubuntu* Live CD/USB boot
the one wanting this box wants 11.10 specifically
In addition to the Trash problem, PCManFM doesn't automount removables!
Yayyy for logind etc...
Hi, how to make so that the  fullscreen in flash application (youtube, dailymotion,...) working correctly, thanks !
_cronus_: /lib/ld-linux.so.2 -> i386-linux-gnu/ld-2.15.so
llutz: does it generate any log / error message when dropping? I'd be fine with that
rcspam: How is it *not* working correctly right now? That is, what is the actual issue?
sdfdafadfsadad: do you know how to burn a CD and boot using it?
MestreLion: iirc it logs to syslog, yes
MestreLion: yes even i installed ubuntu already on D
but i cant log on ubuntu
hateball, when i press on te fullscreen icon, nothing appens, no fullscreen !!
sdfdafadfsadad: you will be able to log to your ubuntu hdd install after you boot the live cd and carefully follow those instructions I gave you
rcspam: Are you using Adobe Flash in Firefox? What graphics chipset/driver are you using?
MestreLion: should i choose try ubuntu? or which option after boot cd?
I have this in ks file -> d-i mirror/http/hostname string 192.168.1.29:80
sdfdafadfsadad: yes, "try Ubuntu", so it boots you to a live session, where you can use nautilus, gparted an dterminal to follow the directions
what do I set d-i mirror/http/directory string <- to ?
Hello
ok lemmecheck
Is this the place to ask for help with xubuntu?
hateball, nv9800gt firefox and chromium
Is this the place to ask for help with xubuntu?
where i can find gstreamer document on my pc?
bar_: Yes.
hateball,  last driver nv 304.60
I guess I'm stuck with the xen kernel ;)
Well, I just recently installed xubuntu on my system, and I keep getting crash reports
Everything seems to crash here, I don't know why though.. is it just me?
Like, I get "Sorry, the program java closed unexpectedly" or, "Sorry, Ubuntu 12.04 has experienced an internal error"
or its just a single report thats nit gettung cleared out bar_
Hi. I am trying to configure two gateways in ubuntu. Hoping that my connections will be balanced. Any simple script available?
that is odd...
hi
dr_willis: I see an internal error with a package named: xfce4-panel, the problemType: Crash
hateball, am i alone with this bug ?
vpmurdan: You cant configure two gateways expecting things to work at all.
vpmurdan: IP expects one default gateway only.
rcspam: Probably not, I just wanted to get some more details from you, if anyone else has any idea. I don't run nvidia myself so I don't know of any specific issues there. Are you using 32-bit or 64-bit?
hateball, 64-bits
rcspam: with native 64-bit flash or the nsplugin-wrapper?
bar_: is it crashing often.  or are you just seeing a report message?
hateball, 64-bit flash
It's not just that dr_willis, everytime i turn my computer on it gives me a different crash report..
dr_willis: I'm not sure if it's crashing often or not, I'll close this message and see if I get any more of those reports
rcspam: manually installed with the tar installer or?
hateball, apt
id have to suggest running memtest for a while to verify ram. and a good  cleaning. and test with a live cd or usb to try to narrow it diwn bar_
llutz / Muelli: I've installed ssmtp and it looks like this is indeed exactly what I need. But it's curious that, since it is not a daemon or require sudo, it does not have a per-user config file..
rcspam: It's been a long time since I used that myself. Does that actually use 64-bit now? It used to grab the 32-bit flash
heh MestreLion. Feel free to patch it ;-)
rcspam: running "file /usr/lib/mozilla/plugins/libflashplayer.so" in a terminal should tell if it's 32-bit or 64-bit anyhow
dr_willis: I tried the live cd and got these issues too , I thought installing it would help it work better, but I'll try to run memtest
dr_willis:Where do I get it though?
its on the boot menu of the live cd somewhere
hateball, i use 64-bit
Muelli: I probally will... its usually not hard to. But I wonder... I'm sure i'm not the first one to ask / want this, so why its not done already? It looks like a very popular package (and oh, btw, thank you guys!!!!)
anyone have any experience with the battery indicator for gnome?
mine shows that im alwas fully charged, which is definetely not the case
how to ctags in the directory "/usr/include"? Direct "ctag -R *"  command can not refer all function
MestreLion: *shrug* don't know. I don't think it's a very highly demanded feature. If you have separate SMTP servers for separate users, you probably have a bigger installation and then run your own MTA anyway.
http://bugs.debian.org/cgi-bin/bugreport.cgi?bug=181315
rcspam: Well ok, then I guess it might be something with the nvidia driver or some such. I have no issues with 64-bit flash + intel.... so maybe someone else here knows more
Hola
From 2003
hateball, thanks, this appens since several distribution, perhaps a card problem
Thanks for your help dr_willis
Muelli: even using the same smtp server for all users (say, gmail), their auth settings are surely personal... and it looks a bit awkward to set up a personal password in /etc
MestreLion: I agree. But it's probably not meant to be configured with a "personal" SMTP server. Rather the ones from your ISP. Or college. Or company.
hateball, fullscreen is working with troubles in youtube html5 ... so thank i think it's probaly a hardware problem
but my ISP's smtp (and I guess many college's and company's too) require login and password to send emails
rcspam: ok
Another question to you guys, how do I know if my graphics driver is currently active?
And not the default thing, but nvidia
hello, I'm sorry to ask this here, but is there a way to make sql like table join with google search. make a search like "asus motherboard" RIGHT JOIN "all electronics business in town", which would translate as "for each business in town, search asus motherboard site:<business-in-town.com>"
bar_: run nvidia-settings  is one way
@bekks: Thks . may be I should use two pcs as routers and group my users in two groups
hello
hi!
dr_willis I'm sorry for my lack of knowledge, but how would I run that?
vpmurdan: Or use a routing solution that implements load balancing and metrics.
I have installed ubuntu 12.04 on my server and the keyboard does not work correcltly as user but does as sudo
Oh nevermind, got it
MestreLion: hey there, thanks i finally installed ubuntu however i set password 12345 at the time of install
jonjo: how does it behave incorrectly?
tab, direction arrowsdont work
but one thing is numpad key is not working
jonjo: console or X?
^[[C^[[D^[[A^[[B
console
MestreLion: i tried sudo apt-get install ubuntu-restricted-extras to install codec, but when terminal asking my password i cant type 12345
its a server without x
sadasdasdas: have you tried using NumLock key?  :P
yes
jonjo: do they not work at all, or produce other characters?
other characters
df
^[[C^[[D^[[A^[[B << like that
ooops
MestreLion: not only numpad key i cant type number anywhere on terminal
jonjo: try "stty reset"?
tthose look like escape  codes.
sadasdasdas: this is very weird, and I have no idea. But you can always boot using the recovery mode and change this password to something more meaningful
reset is an invalid argument
jonjo: try "echo $SHELL" as the user?
/bin/sh
sh? should be bash...
jonjo: http://ubuntuforums.org/showpost.php?p=6997842&postcount=3
jonjo: carefully edit your password file and change "/bin/sh" to "/bin/bash" for the line with your user name no it
er... user name on it
jonjo:  is this a vpn , vps or other unusual setup?
you can use the 'chsh' command to set the defsault shell. no needc to edit the file directly
oops
dedicated server
sorry, yeah, use chsh
so its a normal ubuntu server install you did to a desktop machine?
can Imake it work without logging back out?
run bash to get a bash shell.... as a test
thanks
seen 2 people this week with defauklt shells of 'sh' instead of bash... wonder why
something else you might be able to help me with while I am here
my laptop running 12.04lts
"sh" is "bash" on Ubuntu, dr_willis I believe
i keep it upgraded and recently the login broke
i have to login twice everytime
1st time takes me back to login page
after showing a black screen
my server was a fresh install btw
so it defaulted to sh
How to save the backlights of screen in Ubuntu?
Something is wrong with my 'Passwords and Keys', I'm getting seahorse: symbol lookup error: seahorse: undefined symbol: gck_attribute_hash
hi, I have a problem with my graphics card. I tried installing the property driver, but now I can't get to the log in screen
I notice, every so often, that my Ubuntu 12.04 running Gnome-Shell will switch from the default GNOME on-screen display to NotifyOSD bubbles ... This appears to be a bug, but does anyone know of a way to make this change permanent?
can someone help me please with my driver issue ?
Hello, my cpu fan speed is driving me crazy, I was wondering if there was any way to make it go slower ( cpu temp is 20c ). Desktop pc.. Asus p5w dh deluxe motherboard.
kristenbb:  good idea to menttion your chipset when asking graphic issue questions
dr_willis: maybe i'd be eassier to mention it if i knew what it is :)
dr_willis: where can i find this info?
so you 'tried installing the driver' and you dont know what the card is? what did you try to install exactly?
lspci    should mention your video card.
dr_willis: I have a nvidia gtx 680 card, does that answer the 'chipset' question?
kristenbb:  so you have installed the 'nvidia-current' package?
dr_willis: yes I have
dr_willis: and even since, it fails to load the desktop properly
i seem to recall seeing '68' and nvidia issues befor. but never had one.
dr_willis: and ever* since, it fails to load the desktop properly
what does it do exactly? does the login screen work?
no it doesn't, an error message is displayed instead
OMG ... Ubuntu!
is still alive? Thought it chocked out with Unity ... seriously?
CodeRat: enough
not here, CodeRat
hi ikonia. Been a few years since I have seen you around.
dr_willis: it says: the system is running in low graphics mode. your screen, graphics card, and input device settings could not be detected correctly. you will need to configure these yourself
Onryo ;)
kristenbb:  tryed running the nvidia-settings tool?  'gksudo nvidia-settings' ?
dr_willis: no I didnt try it. but I can try. from there, what should i do?
kristenbb:  id also check the forums and askubuntu.com for that exxact chipset. there may be known work arounds or fixss for it
kristenbb:  i always   run nvidia-settings, configure my screens, then save the xorg.conf
install driver, reboot, run settings, configure it, restart x server... is all i normally do
Anyone know of way to speed up thumbnail rendering besides new hardware?
goobraaaa11: There is no other way.
goobraaaa11 to write something that is does not need an interpreter (python) and do it in C.
Okay thanks bye now
hi, can some1 recommend me a light weight file manager, that can do double pane? i use thunar now and i like it, but it bothers me to open a second window for copying files
nabblet: Midnight Commander?
Hi. So I have a printserver. It goes like: Printer <-(usb) Printserver <-(network cable) Router <- Computers. Somehow I can add and connect to the printer via the Printer settings, but I get the "Spooling 0% complete" message, and nothing happens.
How can i make it so when i use my tv, to auto select 720p mode
(using the prop. nvidia driver)
loli, ok i will try it thank you
ubottu, is real person
ubottu, :)
loli, oh, mc is is a bit too light weight :P
dear colleagues, HI; I have setup a VPN connection to a WIN server, however is does not work ...message is : VPN connection failed; anyone available to diagnose this issue ???
parapan: make the VPN software more verbose. check the windows eventviewer, etc
parapan: sniff the traffic of your software with wireshark, etc
load balancing with two network cards on linux.
wols: first of all, thank you; second , can I use dmesg for identifying this issue , if YES, what syntax do I use ?
Hi there
parapan: no you can not
possibly syslog but unlikely. check your vpn software and what parameters it has
i am new to ubuntu and i have spend the last few days installing and understanding the system
wols: grrr ...then I have to check into wireshark ???
can anyone help me with my problem?
no. into the documentation of your VPN software
ngt: only when you actually state it
will do
Can someone help me with my graphic card driver issue ?
my problem is that ever since I installed the recommended driver, the desktop fails to load, there's an error message instead
the error says: the system is running in low graphics mode. your screen, graphics card, and input device settings could not be detected correctly. you will need to configure these yourself.
kristenbb: short answer: nvidia-settings and change resolution. or hardwrite it into xorg.conf. other possibility: use a nvidia 30x.x driver from current ubuntu (i.e. upgrade to quantal)
wols: change it to what resolution?
how do I disable the nouveau kernel? I tried adding it to modprobe blacklist, launch ubuntu with 'nomodeset' but it will always be active
I'm trying to install nvidia drivers..
hey, can anyone help with ipv6 setup? I have the interface setup, I can ping my gateway and traceroute6 some stuff, but the ip is not reachable from outside it seems
kristenbb: whateevr your monitor uses as native
wols: is there any way I can know what my monitor uses as native?
py_can: then do it. unless you do it the bad way by going to nvidia.com
wols: what is bad about going to my vendors website to download drivers for linux?
kristenbb: look on your invoice for your monitor. even I know that you have a samsung something or ever
py_can: it breaks your ubuntu. it's not the way drivers are handled in linux. never were and hopefully never ever will be
okay. what do you suggest wols?
py_can: but you probably already have installed the crap from nvidia.com. good luck getting rid of it
wols: the installation wouldnt go trough because i couldnt get rid of nouveau
thanks for the good luck tho
wols: I tried changing the resolution there to the one of my screen, and rebooted, but the error is still there
got it network installed via the netboot archive
wouldn't work otherwise
w .. t .. h was that
lol
kristenbb: https://answers.launchpad.net/ubuntu/+source/xorg-server/+question/39299
hello server
pavucontrol is only showing "dummy output" and I have no sound
I can't add it87 to modprobe. 'No such device'. I'm trying to lower my CPU fanspeed because its on 100% and makes a lot of noise.
Sometimes rebooting fixes this
restart is "the windows trick"
Well it's annoying me. I'm in the "audio" group
And here is lshw http://paste.ubuntu.com/1323347/
hello
since i have installed the latest updates with the updater, my desktop is not working anymore
how can i re enable the desktop?
johnshepard_,  can you recall any of the updates?
no, there were many
johnshepard_,  did you already reboot?
yes
mm
johnshepard_, how exactly is the desktop "not working"
a friend of mine upgraded from 12.04 to 12.10. now unity isn't shown on his pc. we tried unity --reset but it says it is deprecated. what should I try?
minas,  not sure ,, try   unity --replace & disown
coz_, there are no icons on the desktop, i can't show the contextual menu with right click, i can't make a selection box with left click
johnshepard_,  let me check hold on
but the application bar at the bottom works fine
johnshepard_,  this is 12.04 or 12.10?
12.04
My CPU fan speed is always 100% and I cannot seem to do 'modprobe it87' because it errors. What to do? The noise is driving me crazy
I am trying to setup Unicenta opos but when the installation is complete but when i check in the dashboard there is no unicenta
hello there
Can you show us the error py_can
can ubuntu 10.04 install gstreamer 1.0?
loli: http://paste.ubuntu.com/1323359/
Sorry py_can idk
johnshepard_,  can you open a terminal
ok:)
the application bar at the bottom works fine, when i open a window and go to the desktop inside my window i can view my desktop
yes
i mean i can view my icons on the desktop
johnshepard_,  try the unity --reset  then type   unity
which is the best open source N/W simulator in Ubuntu?
n/w?
i enabled the open source driver and it worked :)
johnshepard_,  if that works dont close the terminal just log out then log back in
hey guys, I have one question. when I put this sample.conf file in /etc/init/ it works fine, even though it doesn't run the worker.py. But when i put it in $HOME/.init/ it says unknown job. please help me. here is my conf file http://www.bpaste.net/raw/3xGgfyobgkkwDP8dUc8Q/
i'm doing: locate db.php | grep /home/files/  but is there a way I can output the contents of those files too?
upstart may not be set up to handle user controlled services yet the_dark_knight  i was thinking that was a 'for future releases'  fesature.
coz_, that didn't work
johnshepard_,  darn,, ok,,, unless someone can help other than me,,, you can also search for solution, I dont use unity at all  but rather gnome session fallback
ok
dr_willis: it's not enabled by default, but it should be supported on recent versions of ubuntu (judging from the wording in the docs anyway, I haven't actually tried it)
jrib:  i just recall it mentioned at the upstart.ubuntu.com/cookbook docs. i thought i saw where it  was 'for the future'
but ive nevvver used it either. ;)
AdvoWork: 1) you can use a regex with locate so you don't need to grep 2) you can do something like: locate foo | while read -r file; do cat $file; done
find /home/files -type f -name db.php -exec cat {} \;
AdvoWork: or use find as bekks suggests
bekks, how to list of people on channel in irssi ?
blackshirt: try /names (maybe)
blackshirt: "/names"
johnshepard_,  if no one responds try a search string in google similar to     ubuntu 12.04 updates reboot only wallpaper
thanks bekks, jrib much appreciated
Hi All
hey
In mylaptop wifi is not working
from laptop to other device not working
i am using ubuntu 11.04
recenlt i upgraded
pleaSE HELP ME
We have a compiler that we need to run under wine (on the command line). When we do, X uses a perverse amount of cpu (~50%). Any idea what could cause such sadness?
Hello all
what's the password for root with the netboot archive ?
There is no root password.
for 11.10
doesn't login me in without a password
log+ me+ in+
i have install Unicenta OSPOS but when ever i am trying to run the program this error pop out "There was an error launching the application. Detail: Failed to execute child process "/home/ngt/sh" (no such file or directory)
doesn't allow me to sudo in without a password
Haris: try the same as the def username.
it does
I'm in
sorry for that
Haris: np.
quit Leaving
anyone?
I am getting an error that my backup location is too small in deja dup, but it is 5gb and the backup will only be 85mb
i have install Unicenta OSPOS but when ever i am trying to run the program this error pop out "There was an error launching the application. Detail: Failed to execute child process "/home/ngt/sh" (no such file or directory)
is there a sh file where its looking ngt?
nope there is no sh folder
88kjuzinho
so thats the issue it seems
ngt: /home/ngt/sh is a file expected.
ngt a script named sh makes me nervous already -- suspicious
weird name and path for it.
might wanna pastebin it to check :)
another thing, im doing a locate on something, its showing results, i removed the file, did the locate again, it still shows the file even though ive removed it? any ideas?
am i suppose to look for it?
where can i find it?
AdvoWork: updateb
AdvoWork: updatedb
locate runs off a database that is updated regularly
ngt: i wonder why its looking for sh there
i am not really sure
hey guys, I have one question. when I put this sample.conf file in /etc/init/ it works fine, even though it doesn't run the worker.py. But when i put it in $HOME/.init/ it says unknown job. please help me. here is my conf file http://www.bpaste.net/raw/3xGgfyobgkkwDP8dUc8Q/
i have been trying to understand the system
dr_willis: it is supposed to be java. why is it looking for sh at all?
for the past few days
bug in the program would be my guess
the_dark_knight,  I may not have an answer, however, what is the .conf file for?
the_dark_knight: you need to enable user jobs in upstart
ngt could you pastebin the script that is calling sh ?
I am getting an error that my backup location is too small in deja dup, but it is 5gb and the backup will only be 85mb
jrib: not getting you.
the_dark_knight: upstart isn't configured to check user's ~/.init by default in ubuntu
the_dark_knight: afaik
jrib: modified .conf file http://www.bpaste.net/raw/i2Fs9WlAWgkzeAH3gz3e/. log prints it till " just before starting the worker"
the_dark_knight: you need to enable user jobs in upstart: http://bradleyayers.blogspot.com/2011/10/upstart-user-jobs-on-ubuntu-1110.html
how to use regular expression with aptitude to represent *
?
blackshirt: .* ?
or use it with apt-get
blackshirt: I thought the star was bare in aptitude
blackshirt: wine* is all the wine stuff
robbie: thats dont works
robbie: sorry but can you tell me how to do that.
ngt: go to http://paste.ubuntu.com/ and paste your script and then post the url here
robbie: jrib , new conf http://www.bpaste.net/raw/i2Fs9WlAWgkzeAH3gz3e/  why is it not running the exec. when I see my syslog it gives log till " just before starting the worker"
blackshirt: if you are calling it oddly you may need to escape the "*" .. wine\* ... Im not sure other than that -- I thought I just id this the other day
robbie: jrib , please help
the_dark_knight: please see the url I sent you
the_dark_knight: http://bradleyayers.blogspot.com/2011/10/upstart-user-jobs-on-ubuntu-1110.html
the_dark_knight: here's the page for playing with upstart -- Im sorry man, I dont actually use it: http://upstart.ubuntu.com/getting-started.html
robbie: it just helps regarding ther user services. but I can run the sample service now. just can't run the exec statement in it. please have a look at http://www.bpaste.net/raw/i2Fs9WlAWgkzeAH3gz3e/ .
blackshirt:  did it help ?
robbie: your url doesn't help regarding this, it helps for my previous problem regarding $HOME/.init
the_dark_knight: either put it in /etc/init or enable "user jobs" in upstart -- see the second link for the manual for upstart
robbie, wine? was works
the_dark_knight: the manual for upstart is all I can give you, sorry. that is the only program for running jobs from $HOME/.init
blackshirt:  heh
blackshirt:  and wine\* doesnt?
I am getting an error that my backup location is too small in deja dup, but it is 5gb and the backup will only be 85mb
robbie: wine\* was interpreted as wine*,
the_dark_knight: try having it run a simple command. not the prthon script.
Need a DEJA DUP user's help please
robbie: I have put sample.conf in /etc/init/ it works fine upto running this service. but my log says http://www.bpaste.net/raw/qgcQKKPvGvDryuvrasLo/.   my conf http://www.bpaste.net/raw/i2Fs9WlAWgkzeAH3gz3e/
blackshirt: it sounds like you are putting it in a script
dr_willis: ok hold on
it can't bring up the eth0 interface :[
netinstall is a mess, in that one has to struggle quite a lot with it to make it network capable
dr_willis: which command should I run. ls?
interface config for eth0 is ready in /etc/network/interfaces, yet its saying it cannot bring eth0 up
w .. t .. h is going on with it ?
the_dark_knight: or   echo   it works...
the_dark_knight: you need to change your logging message, it says "start" when it means stop
hmmm...  lubuntu doesn't seem to have a gui for startup applications.
robbie: ok but where is this script? sorry i am quite a noob.
the_dark_knight: the last logger line should be: logger "post-stop for sample"
ngt I dont know -- its the one that is giving you that error
did you now rudetube
?
I am getting an error that my backup location is too small in deja dup, but it is 5gb and the backup will only be 85mb
Question
I'm trying to install libboost-dev and I'm getting this error:
loli Im pitching in, I can ask once every few minutes my own question cant I?
rudetube tv hehe
(Reading database ... 182877 files and directories currently installed.)
Unpacking libboost1.46-dev (from .../libboost1.46-dev_1.46.1-7ubuntu3_amd64.deb) ...
dpkg: error processing /var/cache/apt/archives/libboost1.46-dev_1.46.1-7ubuntu3_amd64.deb (--unpack):
 trying to overwrite '/usr/include/boost/aligned_storage.hpp', which is also in package libboost1.44-dev 1.44.0-2ubuntu1~10.04back1
dpkg-deb: error: subprocess paste was killed by signal (Broken pipe)
Errors were encountered while processing:
 /var/cache/apt/archives/libboost1.46-dev_1.46.1-7ubuntu3_amd64.deb
yepwatermelon: kinda looks like you have a bad download -- check the md5
http://paste.ubuntu.com/1323430/
okay then
robbie: dr_willis , simple echo "hi" > ~/abc.log works, How do I make it run with python script
yepwatermelon: wait i see now there was a real error in there
any ideas?
robbie: dr_willis , should I put "python sample.py" in a "sample.sh" and exec it?
yepwatermelon: can you uninstall libboost1.44-dev first?
guys, where does ubuntu keep the network mac address config ?
robbie: the error pop up and the text on it "There was an error launching the application. Details: Failed to execute child process "/home/ngt/sh" (No such file or directory) and there is an ok button. Nothing else
Haris: udev.
the_dark_knight:  id double check yout paths and permissions and script. perhaps put the command in your defualt Path
do I need to give the mac address in interfaces files to make it work ?
ngt you dont know what script is being run that is causing that?
Haris: You don't.
Haris: /etc/udev/rules.d/70-persistent-net.rules
the gingers do have souls
:)
That just throws an error saying I have unmet dependencies. From there I run apt-get -f install and get the above error again. :S
the_dark_knight: I dont kow python, sorry
robbie:  unfortunately i don't understand what you mean by script. Try to google it but no luck
ngt you dont know what APPLICATION is being run that is causing that?
Unicenta oPOS
robbie: unicenta oPos
ngt: its just a random pop up interrupting your day or what?
dr_willis: robbie , I put "cd /home/magic/Documents  python Worker.py" in sample.sh and "exec sample.sh" and it works.
ngt oo
Hey all
robbie: nope i am trying to run this program which i install earlier but that is the error pop out.
So what should I do. I'm stuck in a loop here.. :/
what service do I need to restart for ubuntu to reload its network interface config ?
how can I google to find all squid.conf files publicly avail?
or the config mentioned in udev
ngt: Id contact them if I cant find the script they are using that is giving the error
ngt commercial software is well supported usually
nope it's actually free software
it's an Point of Sale software
ngt: did you see their web page? wow thats some nice looking free software :)
robbie: yup but not much help can be found on this matter.
ngt:  ok well .. if you want you can scan your syslog and see if you get lucky with a specific message from their software
robbie: though might try my luck here first
ngt: yea good luck sorry, without knowing the process causing the error its not easy to diagnose
the_dark_knight: congrats :)
I am getting an error that my backup location is too small in deja dup, but it is 5gb and the backup will only be 85mb
anyone know/use the default backup software for Ubuntu ?
robbie: thanks will try to look around and come back later. I am a windows user so it's kinda hard with ubuntu right now
robbie: Why?
robbie: I mean I have previously tried to put "python" in cron too. It didn't work either, I had to go with a shell script with python command. Wonder why I can't directly run python
Yeah I'm still stuck... :/
bekks: I am getting an error that my backup location is too small in deja dup, but it is 5gb and the backup will only be 85mb
robbie: So you are using deja dup then.
robbie: trying to remove it throws an unmet dependency error running apt-get -f install throws the error from earlier
yepwatermelon: what is the other application that is requiring libboost-dev?
bekks: its the default backup software in Ubuntu
robbie: libboost-dev
can ubuntu 10.04 install gstreamer 1.0?
yepwatermelon: what is the *other application* that requires libboost-dev?
robbie: gearman requires it.
robbie: sorry that was other discussion.
robbie: They're just dependencies required to compile another program.
the_dark_knight, yepwatermelon: whichever software that is, you might make a backup of it, and then uninstall it... install libboost1.46-dev and then reinstall the other software -- but I think you are going to find that it won't accept libboost1.46-dev, so you'll need to get the package from the source instead of from ubuntu
bekks: yeah, it's the default backup software in Ubuntu
join #als
hello
I am trying to install 12.10 64 bit onto this laptop but get a message telling me it requires an x86-64 but only has i686?  http://cdgenp01.csd.toshiba.com/content/product/pdf_files/detailed_specs/satellite_A105-S4284.pdfv
how do I go about changing the DE in ubuntu 12.10?
no /etc/inittab on ubuntu 11.10 ?
Haris: No.
where does it store the config with which I can tell it to boot in what init mode
i can't force myself to like unity
Haris: There are no initmodes anymore since Upstart.
how do I make it remain on console, rather than go to X after bootup ?
do we have runlevels ?
Haris: No. As just being told.
Disable the startup of the desktop manager in /etc/default/
I see
please, I have 2 NICs (network interfaces) connected on a router... One is connect on a PCI and another is on a miniPCI... How can I know which interface is connect on each device? I mean.. i wanna know if wlan0 is the network connect on a miniPCI or on PCI slot..
RxDx: Connect a cable and see which interface it is.
=> /etc/default/console-setup file ?
bekks: there is no cables.. they are both wireless interfaces
I think this ( https://help.ubuntu.com/community/BootOptions#Text%20Mode ) link is broken
Haris: Why do you think that?
RxDx: Just pull out one of them...
I see no such heading or point that it takes me to on the page, after this web page loads up
bekks: u mean.. ifconfig wlan0 down?
but how can i know if i pulled out the miniPCI or the PCI?
how do I switch to a gnome environment?
RxDx: By looking into your hands...
RxDx: No. I mean "pull it out of your computer".
bekks: on my hands i can see both.. but i dont know if the device that im looking for is the wlan0 or the wlan1
RxDx: Do you know the difference between PCI and miniPCI?
this is the CD's default options
bekks: hmm, its an option.. but is there any other way without take the card off?
its not options for installed OS
Haris: I just told you how to solve your problem.
bekks: yes.. but both uses the same driver
RxDx: And...?
(atk5) i guess
them i cannot differ them.. i mean.. i dont know if im looking for wlan0 is the miniPCI or the PCI device
RxDx: Do you know that PCI and miniPCI have different sizes when compared to each other?
bekks: I didn't understand the message
i need to know that because i wanna make wlan0 connect via adhoc with miniPCI device while wlan1 is an AP connect via PCI
there's nothing in what I read that relates to it
bekks: physical size? yes, i know
RxDx: Then pull out ONE of them...
RxDx: Where's the problem with that?
bekks: this routers could be installed on a remote location that i could not have physical access
RxDx: But now, you have access...
I can't find the relevant file under /etc/defaults/
Haris: So which desktop manager do you use?
bekks: ill have to do that way hehe.. thanks a lot :)
I don't want to use any. Just want it to boot into console/cli
Haris: So which do you use NOW?
I'v installed 11.10-server-64bit
Haris: And why did you install X on your server then?
I'm not sure. I'v just installed 11.10 from netboot. Can't see anything on KVM
I didn't tell it to install X
I wanted a basic, bare minimum install from network
Then there is no X installed. And no desktop manager. Your vm is bootinginto cli.
Haris: don't start a display manager.
wols: He didnt.
bekks: but he got X somehow or what?
when the box boots up, the KVM screen goes "No signal"
wols: No.
but when I send Alt+F4 macro to KVM, the display goes back to cli
Haris: Then boot into text mode as suggested.
Haris: nomodeset
I'm not sure what I was suggested
You were. :)
I can't find anything relevant under /etc/default
That has nothing to do with the text mode.
That only has something to do with not starting a desktop manager.
wols: there's nothing as "nomodeset" on cli on 11.10
ok
Haris: ? nomodeset is a kernel option, not a cliu command.
ah
hi all! I need to get 2 connections working...
there's no /etc/sysconfig on ubuntu. Where do I set this option
Haris: In the bootloader config.
ah, I'm going to have to read a lot about this. I'll let go of this one for now.
laptop--->wifi--->router--->internet AND laptop--->eth--->router--->eth--->PS3
second issue, the ciritical one, I have is, its not bringing up eth0 interface. I can't find the reason
ah that
Haris: what's in your /etc/network/interfaces ?
how can I get theese 2 connections works at same time?
ubh: Why do you want to connections to your router? Thats not necessary.
Hi, i created a bootable usb and set usb-zip (i tried usb-hdd also) as fist bootable device in the bios, but it doesn't work. The other day it worked with win8 on the same pen. Do you have any advice? Could you help me, please?
auto lo and auto eth0. then normal interface config under the auto eth0 line for eth0. pasting it
bekks: because I'm connected to the internet and laptop is near my router
ubh: And...?
bekks: PS3 is far from router
You dont need two connections, but only one.
LennyLinux: how did you create it?
bekks: ? explain please
I'm a bit n00b on networking
Hi
http://pastebin.com/ypZAKtUB3
ubh: laptop <- wifi-> router <- cable -> internet / ps3
correction
http://pastebin.com/ypZAKtUB
ubh: Thats all you need.
wols: i tried universal usb creator and now live linux usb creator.
Where can i see when apache will be upgrade to 2.2.23 on ubunti 12.04? We need the allowAnyURI and thats broken in 2.2.22
s/ubunti/ubuntu/
bekks: I don't understand at all... You maybe mean that with only one interface I can communicate with PS3 and also surf 'net?
How do I completely 'reset' the package manager, cause my retarded apt wants to downgrade to 12.04 after my dist-upgrade to 12.10..
it says, cannot find eth0. failed to bring up eth0
* ubh connected?
It does not need to be connected or cabled to bring it up
Hello. Is it only me, i couldnt upgrade from Precise Pangolin to Quantal Quetzal. I ended up installing a fresh copy of 12.10 of a different partition.
How do I reset/fix apt
I see it defined in /etc/udev/rules.d/70-persistent-net.rules file
bekks: and if my laptop an ps3 are LAN Gbit and router only 100Mbps? I should connect via eth directly to the PS3 to have full speed, right?
Where can i see when apache will be upgrade to 2.2.23 on ubunti 12.04? We need the allowAnyURI and thats broken in 2.2.22
holaaaaa.................
heys
any ideas why its not finding eth0 ?
tinux: I'm not sure they will.. you might have to get the next version of ubuntu
tinux: ubuntu doesn't do rolling updates unless it's security stuff, iirc
Slart: hmm its 12.04LTS :) long term... yay
Haris, use ethtool to bring it up.
tinux, they won't upgrade the versions in already-released versions, bugs and security fixes get pushed in with patches and minor fixes
I have it disabled in bios. that's why it can't find it
I will make a bugreport
my! bad
tinux, they won't upgrade that to 2.2.23, but if you can find bugfixes that would fix it in 2.2.22 it could be SRU'd (and bugfixes are put in)
how can I set the font in indicator-messages? it is too dark except the very last line that says "clear"
Haris, fix it :)
They turned it of on 2.2.22 but didnt enable the option
how can I set the font in the messaging menu (indicator-messages)? it is too dark except the very last line that says "clear"
Hi, i created a bootable usb and set usb-zip (i tried usb-hdd also) as fist bootable device in the bios, but it doesn't work. The other day it worked with win8 on the same pen. Do you have any advice? Could you help me, please?
fixed that
I still can't connect to network with ti
how do i make apt-cache show information only the package that is installed and not all packages with given name?
how do I make ubuntu reload its network interface config ?
Haris: sudo service network restart
I'm already logged in as root, for now
I see
dont need sudo then.. but it wont hurt
:P
when I use the stop command
it says invalid interface or job
Haris: ifdown <interface> ifup <interface>
Haris: just start it then
Haris: what command do you run?
wols: I remember those ones :D
Haris: service network start
=> /etc/init.d/networking restart, /etc/init.d/network-interfaces restart
Check if the links are up, ethtool
Haris: I *think* networking and network-manager are subsystems and the main service is "network"
can you believe it, the server ISO/version doesn't come pre-installed with openss-server
I see
I mean the netboot one
Haris: you can remaster it to have it. The server install CD is there to install the server OS, so why would it be needed?
How can i create a startup usb stick from ubuntu-12.04.1-server-i386.iso ?
got it working
haris, you can install it manually
n00bie: use unetbootin, it runs on nearly everything
Hi, I installed text-only Ubuntu 12.04 32-bit on BTRFS as Virtualbox Guest and it is saying this error on Boot: "sparse file not allowed". After I hit enter it boot right. It is without installed drivers/VBox addons.
n00bie: server OS doesn't come with a desktop UI. Is that what you want?
how can one connect to the server remotely, if not via ssh ?
nikolam: I had that, no idea of the fix
Haris: install openssh-server on the system
ActionParsnip: hey, good morning
already done =)
Haris: then connect away
robbie: good night here :D
ActionParsnip, will see if it goes away after installing addons
ActionParsnip: i tried to boot into desktop verion of 12.04.1 i368 and using the startup media creator, but unfortunately it produces a corrupt result
=)
robbie: howdy
can i just install the 3.5 kernel with apt-get under 12.04 ?
n00bie: what video chip do you use?
VlanX: you may find a PPA but it won't be supported here as it's a 3rd party kernel
ActionParsnip: Im looking for help with indicator-messages -- do you know how I can change the text color of the submenus? for some reason they are dark on dark instead of like every other indicator
ActionParsnip: huh? nvidia gt 240?
VlanX: yes, sure
robbie: check font settings
n00bie: did you add the boot option:  nouveau.blacklist=1
ActionParsnip: how is it possible if 3.5 belongs to 12.10 ?
VlanX: its a later release, so has a later kernel
ActionParsnip: ok Ill search that thanks :)
I installed ubuntu 12.04.1 (64bit) yesterday and my laptop continued for 24 hours and many hours it was idle. I was been running 2-3 Applications vmware workstation(With 2 guests), Firefox  . Today again the all icons, menus,windows etc got ugly. I did not even able to take any screenshot because i can't click on K menu SO i forcefully reboot the system(So i again lost my all important works) . This happened on Ubuntu 32 before but the same proble
m in 64 bit too. Anyone can help me to fix this please?
Also PATA CD/DVD is not available in /etc/fstab after install (even if CD was inserted in the same PATA drive for install...)
check this out. I said service network restart. it says network: unrecognized service
ActionParsnip: nope thats another problem, im booting it with nomodeset, but there seems to be a bug in the startup media creator since i thought i used the most compatible verion and when i check the created usb drive with md5sum -c md5sum.txt there are missing files
lol
same for bare metal 640bit install and 32bit Vbox install from PATA DVD
o_O
Has anyone tried installing Ubuntu 12.04 .. then xfce-desktop, then completely removing Unity?
n00bie: you should add the nouveau.blacklist=1 so that you use fallback driver, you can then install the propriatary driver once installed and be ok
LucidGuy: Why not just install xubuntu?
ActionParsnip: so you suggest me to istall 12.04 rather than upgrade ?
LucidGuy: why uninstall Unity? It's  tiny
blazemore, because Xubuntu 12.04 only has 3 year support as apposed to 5
LucidGuy, it sounds to me like Xubuntu install. It has no Unity but everything works.
LucidGuy: maybe someone has trying to do that..why not you try it ?
VlanX: for me personally, clean install is always ideal (seen too many issues  with upgrades)
ActionParsnip: thanks, but thats not the problem in facing right now. i need to create a usb drive for server install with all the needed files . currently i get     md5sum: ./install/netboot/ubuntu-installer/i386/pxelinux.cfg/default: No such file or directory
is there a general resource on .desktop files?
ActionParsnip: k thank you :)
LucidGuy: Xubuntu 12.04 is supported as long as Ubuntu 12.04 is. Lubuntu 12.04 is not LTS
Clean install also has big issue if it is 12.4
n00bie: use TAB to autcomplete folder names.
ActionParsnip, Thats not ture.  Xubuntu is 3, Ubuntu is 5
food: if your work is 'impportant' why is it not backed up?
ActionParsnip: how would i do that_
ActionParsnip, It crashed before backed up because i just started.
ActionParsnip: i dont know where the correct file missing from the created usb stick would be located to copy it over
is there a general resource on .desktop files? like the files discussed here: http://askubuntu.com/questions/108060/is-it-possible-to-add-custom-items-to-system-settings-window
LucidGuy: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Xubuntu#Xubuntu_12.04_LTS     states 5 years
n00bie: type a few letters of the folder name and hit tab,if a match exists it will be autocompleted
ActionParsnip: i dont understand how this would help with a missing file
n00bie: then the ISO is corrupted
LucidGuy: wait, you are right. My bad
ActionParsnip, http://xubuntu.org/getxubuntu/   first line of 12.04 description
ActionParsnip: the md5sum matches with the ones for the release versions
n00bie: then what are you MD5 testing?
LucidGuy: Lubuntu 12.04 isn't even ay LTS :( sad times
*any
LucidGuy: lts or not was not so important until you want support from canonical :D
ActionParsnip, have you ever tried Ubuntu for at least 24 hours with opened few windows?
food: sure, my server systems stay up for weeks and get all kinds of apps ran on them.
ActionParsnip, Desktop?
how to install gstreamer 1.02 on ubuntu 10.04??
food: yes, LXDE on one, my laptop is powered off at night
blackshirt, Im not interested in Canonical support..  I am interested in their repos keeping their software patched and upgrade for the entire 5 years
Any have a Dell Inspiron 5720 with wireless working?
ActionParsnip, What is your Laptop Model?
ActionParsnip: i am on ubuntu 12.04.1 i368 desktop, downloaded the ubuntu-12.04.1-server-i386.iso checked its md5, used the startup media creator to create an live usb drive without errors, mounted it and issued md5sum -c md5sum.txt in its root directory. there are 3 files missing from it, they simply are not there. thats my problem, how do i create an correct usb stick from the iso
food: Dell Lat D420
LucidGuy: yes, you get them :D
theuns: what wifi chip does it use?
LucidGuy: just do regular updates for your apt databases, and fetch the patch update you want
i use the latest 12.04 lts, when i drag my mouse on the top of the screen i get FILE, EDIT, ... which is essentially the task bar, it vanishes when the mouse is taken off, how to permanently enable them
ActionParsnip: with lshw i get product: Broadcom Corporation
guang_: http://packages.ubuntu.com/search?keywords=gstreamer0.10&searchon=names&suite=lucid&section=all    take your pick....
theuns: what is the output of:   lsb_release -sc
ActionParsnip, Well, my laptop is Dell xps L502x ....
ActionParsnip: precise
why does the title bar not update when you ssh somewhere in 64 ubuntu 12.04?
Does anyone here know how i can create an installer usb stick from ubuntu-12.04.1-server-i386.iso?
theuns: I recommend you get a wired connection and get updated, you can also install the driver much easier
n00bie: did you try unetbootin?
ActionParsnip:It is all about 0.10,not the version 1.0
ActionParsnip: yes it does not support that verion of ubuntu
ActionParsnip: the machine is wired, did all updates, but still no joy
guang_: then try a PPA
theuns: did you run:  gksudo jockey
n00bie: what files were missing?
n00bie: it doesn't support the server ISO?
ActionParsnip: no, will do so
theuns: read the link ubottu gave please, it also shows how you can install it in a terminal
ActionParsnip:where i can find the ppa?google?
ActionParsnip: ok, will do, what will gksudo jockey do?
question: if whereis tomcat7 gives me /etc/tomcat7/ and /usr/share/tomcat7, should I set TOMCAT_HOME to the former or the latter? there is also a /usr/share/tomcat7-root/
vfw, ActionParsnip these files are missing with the usb creator from the correcponding desktop verion     http://paste.ubuntu.com/1323624/
n00bie: How did you get that output?
n00bie: What command?
vfw i mounted the finished new usb stick, cd into its root and executed md5sum -c md5sum.txt
ActionParsnip: I did run gksudo jockey, but does not look like something happend?
vfw it runs fine until the end part of it which is the paste in question
vfw there are similar bugs around http://askubuntu.com/questions/127398/usb-drive-install-of-ubuntu-12-04-server-fails-cant-find-components-from-cd-r
theuns: again, read the link
vfw thats why i tried to use the correspondung desktop verion of 12.04.1 but it didnt help.
n00bie: Did you use an ISO or a CD when you created the USB ?
vfw md5 checked iso
how do you take a screen cap
robbie: you press print screen?
vfw i read somewhere i could just dd the iso to the usb block device, just not sure if thats the right method for the boot loader
ActionParsnip: Article in the link suggest to run lspci -vvnn | grep 14e4 to get the chipset. The output i get is
02:00.0 Network controller [0280]: Broadcom Corporation Device [14e4:4365] (rev 01)
Does not tell me what chipset? Only its broadcom
ewook thanks -- for some reason it wasnt working
vfw didnt try that yet
ooo
theuns: the PCI ID does: 14e4:4365
how do you take a screen cap when you have a menu open?
robbie: import ~/screenshot.png      you can draw a box around the area. You need imagemagick installing :)
but *when you have a menu open*?
like if I click an indicator and the menu below it opens
ActionParsnip: o, ok. Thanks, Did not realise that. :-[
theuns: http://webcache.googleusercontent.com/search?q=cache:bDlzhwkWfowJ:www.ubuntu.com/certification/catalog/component/pci:14E4:4365-WIRELESS/+&cd=1&hl=en&ct=clnk&client=firefox-a
ActionParsnip, You sure that current ubuntu does support on Modern hardware?
Like Dell xps?
food: should be fine
vfw, ActionParsnip seems like either the release iso is broken, the usb startup media creator of it or both
ActionParsnip: So it looks like the driver is not available
@food it would be better to ask Dell to support Linux properly.
vfw, yesterday you asked me to make a pastebin of sudu fdisk -l. http://pastebin.com/BSMNEehG
question: if whereis tomcat7 gives me /etc/tomcat7/ and /usr/share/tomcat7, should I set TOMCAT_HOME to the former or the latter? there is also a /usr/share/tomcat7-root/
Kartagis: dpkg -L <tomcat package>
Whose idea was this to change gnome in ubuntu? The worst thing they could do :( I don't see clear list of running apps, i don't know where to find installed apps.. HORRIBLE!!! Please help, how do i find list of my installed apps?
wols: I got lots of stuff
nardev: dpkg-query -l
Anyone know what dmesg error "fail to flush all tx fifo queues' means?
n00bie: possibly a bad MD5 sum file. Are there any bugs reported?
Kartagis, what is that going to do?
greasegum: sounds like some NIC error
nardev: it's going to list all your installed applications
:)
Kartagis, aha, ok, but i WANT TO BE ABLE TO CLICK ON MENU AND HAVE SHORTCUTS easly not like THIS.. this si HORROR :(
Kartagis: if you run:   export TOMCAT_HOME=/etc/tomcat7/      or whichever you need, does it worl
Why aptitude is saying it does not have "super cow powers" ?? :))
nardev: kill the caps
Kartagis, it's ok, but i need it for regular use...
unity is childish, thats why i choose xfce.
can someone help me with a font problem?
can someone help me with a font problem? http://imgur.com/UrwKb
ActionParsnip, sorry
Got me an older Ubuntu 8.10 server I would like to upgrade to 12.04.  Now in the indeal world I would back-up the system perform a fresh clean install .. and then restore all my apps/services/data.  Unfortunately that can be a pain.  Any recommended upgrade path?
ActionParsnip, girafee http://ubuntuforums.org/showthread.php?t=1969300 , https://bugs.launchpad.net/ubuntu/+source/xserver-xorg-video-intel/+bug/993187 , Dell should make Hardware for linux ?
nardev: install gnome-panel   log off and log in to the new session
ActionParsnip, lets see ...
wols:: I'm only getting it on my school's network.
LucidGuy: 8.10->9.04->9.10->10.04->12.04
food: they pre-install the OS on some systems. They don't make specific hardware for Linux, they just use normal hardware  which is linux friendly
wols:: meanwhile my ping times are highly erratic, sometimes not connecting at all, sometimes
Unfortunately, 9.04 and 9.10 arent supported anymore.
bekks, Have you tried performing an upgrade path like that?  Sounds scarry .. as in Ill break things.
bekks: glas 9.04 is dead tbh
LucidGuy  fresh install is less painful
girafee, Many peoples don't have this if they have Ubuntu 11.x ...
did anyone have an issue with skype on ubuntu, webcam shows image upside down.
ActionParsnip: I know :)
LucidGuy: fresh install then restore data from backup
ActionParsnip: possibly this one is related but its for 12.04 not 12.04.1   http://askubuntu.com/questions/127398/usb-drive-install-of-ubuntu-12-04-server-fails-cant-find-components-from-cd-r
Im having a font problem on the panel -- please see http://imgur.com/UrwKb
n00bie: could install 12.04  and not 12.04.1
n00bie: Try xorriso
robbie: what is the output of:   lsb_release -sc   please
ActionParsnip: quantal
n00bie: or install using the mini ISO then install the desktop ontop. Does the system use a switchable GPU?
robbie: if you make a fresh Ubuntu user and log in there, is it ok?
@food if the hardware vendors decide to make open sourced, 99.9% of the hardware related issues should be over.
ActionParsnip: let me log into guest
vfw you mean copy the files from the iso_ they arent there either
ActionParsnip: is uses powervr sgx 530
n00bie: Oh, the iso is missing the files. I get it now... sorry.
n00bie: Myabe you can just remaster the ISO and add them.
vfw its the release iso for the server 12.04.1 i368 idk where to get those missing files
ActionParsnip: absolutely no idea if this is what I want, but I'm seeing what I want
girafee, Well, I love Linux. But If Linux(Ubuntu) does not support those kind hardware then there should be an option for Ubuntu ... right?
n00bie: from desktop version
girafee, https://bugs.launchpad.net/ubuntu/+source/xserver-xorg-video-intel/+bug/993187/comments/19
n00bie: yes, its a switchable GPU, this causes a tonne of problems in Linux
Unity is THE WORST thing ubuntu has done. I used suse, mandrake and debian for almost 10 years, i haven't come across this horrible and not intuitive GUI yet!
nardev: you don't have to use it......
ActionParsnip: there is no indicator-messages at all for guest account .. the other account on this box isnt hardly used at all so i checked there and it has the same problem
ActionParsnip, gnome 3 also sucks :(
nardev: you don't have to use anything in Ubuntu, you can switch the apps out as you want
i have to use ubuntu but i HATE unity
nardev: there is an unsupported fork of Gnome2
nardev: Try xfce
hi, I have a windows 7 computer which I dont have the password for is it possible to read the files in ubuntu?
nardev: There's always lxde, xfce, kde
nardev: again, you can use Ubuntu and not use Unity
ActionParsnip, i just hope there is no need for "horrible" way to adjust it.
nardev: you have the option to log in with GNOME
vfw what you mean with remaster it? i dont want the desktop version, btw the desktop verion doesnt have this issue
@food, its not the os who support cutting edge hardwares. its the device manufactures who distribute drivers. how many devices is automatically detected by mswinXP?
jakey1, unless the files or disk are encrypted, you can read it when booting ubuntu
jakey1: http://www.psychocats.net/ubuntucat/resetwindowspassword/
jakey1: https://duckduckgo.com/?q=ubuntu+reset+windows+password    too hard?
hi, can someone help me to solve my graphic card issue ? I just installed 12.04 multiple times, but I can't get the graphic card driver to work. It was working before I chose to reinstall 12.04. Now when ubuntu starts, I get this error: The system is running in low graphics mode. Your screen, graphics card, and input device settings could not be detected correctly. You will need to configure these yourself.
jakey1: yes
so whats stopping someone stealing my laptop and getting all my info off it?
nardev: its the way Ubuntu wants to take the Gnome desktop. The default shell for Gnome3 is Gnome shell which is also available
n00bie: mount the iso, add the files, create new iso from the mount.
Guys i have win 8 on my machine and i think it doesn't let me boot from cd, so i'm not able to install ubuntu, how can i do?
jakey1: physical access circumvents most security measures (but not all)
ActionParsnip: there is no indicator-messages at all for guest account .. the other account on this box isnt hardly used at all so i checked there and it has the same problem
LennyLinux: check BIOS
ActionParsnip, physical acess?
robbie: how about a new ubuntu user, not guest
girafee, Why Ubuntu 11.x is working ? Anyway, If it is bug of ubuntu then it is bug. And if ubuntu community would known where the problem is then they could fixed it. At this time i am just trying to make it little stable so i can work for long time.
did they fix the freezing after sleep for laptops in 12.10 ?
jakey1: holding the device. Physically sittinig in front of and using the system as opposed to remote access over network.
ActionParsnip: the bios is ok. I also pressed f12 and specified to boot from cd but the starts win 8.
ActionParsnip, two times i was listening Mark S. trying to explain that this is right move. I'm so sorry i don't see ti is :(
ActionParsnip, so someone just steals my laptop?
I think win 8 prevents to install other os.
jakey1: yes
LennyLinux: on the same drive yes.
LennyLinux: sounds like some EFI stuff which I've never had to mess with
Just go separate disk for each os ;).
Entrez le texte ici...hello
and select disk to boot, and done.
can someone help me
sorry i dont speak good english ^^
here is the error message
That bastard.
And now?
Can someone help me with my driver issue please ,
kristenbb: with details, maybe
ActionParsnip: just like the guest account -- he indicator-messages panel indicator doesnt even load
ActionParsnip: just like the guest account -- *the* indicator-messages panel indicator doesnt even load
ewook: ActionParsnip what can i do now? Am i stuck? :D
ActionParsnip: I just installed 12.04 multiple times, but I can't get the graphic card driver to work. It was working before I chose to reinstall 12.04. Now when ubuntu starts, I get this error: The system is running in low graphics mode. Your screen, graphics card, and input device settings could not be detected correctly. You will need to configure these yourself.
LennyLinux: its not something I've used so therefore have no idea, maybe others can help
LennyLinux: I'd say go with leaving windows 8 on one drive :)
I having a problem with MAAS, trying to commission a box but the timestamp  for oauth is off by 4 hours. Have modified the config to use a local time server I have setup but still no dice. Still always off by 4 hours. Any thoughts?
kristenbb: why haven't you stated the video chip or make and model of the system? How can I possibly reply intelligently?
ActionParsnip: sorry. The system is ubuntu 12.04. The graphic card is nvidia gtx 680
kristenbb: why did you not state that before?
ActionParsnip: just like the guest account -- the indicator-messages panel indicator doesnt even load
kristenbb: add the boot option:  nouveau.blacklist=1    and it should help
robbie: you said, 3 times
w:gpg error:http://ppa.launchpad.net quantal release: the folowing signatures couldn't be verified because the public key is not avaiable :NO-PUBKEY 83fba1751378b444 ????????????????
ActionParsnip: just wondering if you are reading me
if someone know what to do
^^
thank you
ActionParsnip: How to add that boot option?
christian67160: sudo apt-key adv --recv-key --keyserver keyserver.ubuntu.com 83fba1751378b444
christian67160: add the keyring to apt
kristenbb: why did you not add the 2nd lot of info the first time?
will try this now ^^
ActionParsnip: what are you talking about ?
kristenbb: when you initially posted the question there was no detail, why did you not state the video chip and other useful details?
is there another room for MAAS?
ActionParsnip: The message was already a few lines long, I won't make a whole book to explain my problem, I thought this was good enough to get the conversation started
ActionParsnip: besides i'm a newbie I don't know what info would be relevant
kristenbb: its cool, you can type huge lines
ActionParsnip: does that really matter anyway?
vfw: i found the missing files in the original iso file, just copied them over to the usb stick ... now the md5sum check completes without error, i just hope those files were the ment for usb sticks, idk why they were missing ...
kristenbb: you are having a display issue, so its very relevant
ActionParsnip: now you know, so can you help me please ?
kristenbb: please give full details in future, it speeds things up
ActionParsnip: sure
did they fix the freezing after sleep for laptops in 12.10 ?
ActionParsnip: so from what I understand, this is done through grub2 inn my case? I don't see the grub menu
hello , i have downloaded the unity-2d 5.12 source code, do you know what i need modify for use unity-2d-panel standalone?
kristenbb: hold SHIFT at boot
ActionParsnip: I guess you had nothing else to say about it now that you know that it doesnt load in a new account ?
ActionParsnip: still not seeing grub
ActionParsnip: does it matter whether it's left or right shift, or both?
can someone help me with a font problem? http://imgur.com/UrwKb
can someone help me with a font problem with the panel? http://imgur.com/UrwKb
kristenbb: I use left. If you are booting the CD and you see the stickman screen. Press SPACE
its just that one indicator
ActionParsnip: no I am  not using the cd, I have a ubuntu installtion.
Ill come back
kristenbb: then hold SHIFT at boot should do it, its the standard in Grub2
ActionParsnip: I installed ubuntu 12.04 and I have problems with the graphic card driver.
ActionParsnip: I tried it twice, didn't work.
kristenbb: you can then press E and (e)dit grub and delete the:  quiet splash   and in the place add: nouveau.blacklist=1
can anyone help with virsh routed networking?
Thank you for the sudo apt-key adv --recv-key *********      works good
hi
thank you for the help for the apt key ^^
HOY
christian67160: if you add PPAs properly you don't have this issue
now i have just 2 errors and then my ubuntu works again ^^
JUST INSTALLED NEW UBUNTU WHAT HAPPENDE TO THE START-MENU LIKE THINGY BEFORE
urur65: NO IDEA
i have the old menu on ubuntu 12.10
urur65: take your finger off SHIFT
I INSTALLED Addition Drivers in software center then it doesnt appear in dashboard how do i run it
christian67160: install gnome-panel and log off then log into the new session
i had a windows 7/ubuntu dual boot and installed windows 8. now i dont get the boot screen to boot into ubuntu. is it possible to recover?
it's classic menu indicator
fr4zzle: you'll need to boot to Ubuntu liveCD and reinstall Grub to the MBR
ok. is that pretty straight forward?
how do you run something u installed in software center but doesnt appear in Dash board
hello
i'm new here
fr4zzle: http://www.omgubuntu.co.uk/2011/09/live-usb-sticking-grub-2-video
anarchy911howdy
urur65: gksudo jockey
ActionParsnip: it doesn't work, I tried 5 times, holding or pressing or doing multiple tries, grub is still not showing
urur65: may be:   gksudo jockey
i think i have a wrong sources.list too have 2errors when i open update-manager
christian67160: can you pastebin the output of:   sudo apt-get update
yes gksudo jockey works but i want to know how to gui-ly locate it
cheers, ActionParsnip
pastebin ?
i neet do look on google ^^
like the old menu thingy in ubuntu
urur65: Look for "Drivers" in the Dash?
will i need the same version of ununtu that i have installed?
christian67160: use http://pastie.org   to host the text, when the page changes, copy the address bar and paste here
im not sure what version i had, it was a while ago
drivers show no results
fr4zzle: just the same architecture
except songs and stuff
k
urur65: once its installed, you don't need to worry about it
urur65: if you have an nvidia GPU you can sidestep the GUI app and run:  sudo apt-get install nvidia-current     and you don't even need the GUI app
how do i suppress jhas joined and has quit system messages here
urur65: what irc client do you use?
online, webchat.freenode.net
hello , i have downloaded the unity-2d 5.12 source code, do you know what i need modify for use unity-2d-panel standalone?
anybody guide me how can i enable mic in pidgin?
urur65: Click the top left button, go to options, check "Hide JOINS/PARTS/QUITS:"
padhu: does it work in sound recorder?
ActionParsnip: yes, working....
skypce: unity needs at least compiz to run. It won't run standalone
I thought Unity 2D just needed Qt?
padhu: I use pidgin but never used sound with it
ActionParsnip: gksudo jockey, nothing happens
o.O
Touhou44: Qt is an app framework
ActionParsnip,  i have a desktop like pear os 6 (with elementary gala and unity-2d-panel as panel) the problem is when logout or reboot machine it takes so much time about 30 seconds in begin to reboot
urur65: Try "sudo jockey"
urur65: what video chip do you use?
ActionParsnip: But i need it, because, i always using pidgin
ActionParsnip: I know what Qt is...
can anyone help with virsh routed networking?
nothing happens in sudo jockey either
hey guys, i'm having a huge troble with my ubuntu, with ambiance theme, after a update, when I right click the menu is gray, and ugly and hard to read... anyone can help me?
urur65: what video chip do you use?
amd
urur65: which one!?
i need modify unity-2d source code for dont check if unity-2d-shell is open or close when reboot :S
radeon hd 4250
k found addition drivers but it cant detect my graphic card
urur65: are you using Quantal?
what is quantal?
urur65: run:  lsb_release -sc     what is output please?
dash > system settings > display states that my graphics is "unknown"
hi, If I had a mac which I dont have the password for is it possible to read the files in ubuntu?
hey guys, i'm having a huge troble with my ubuntu, with ambiance theme, after a update, when I right click the menu is gray, and ugly and hard to read... Also the applications' sub menu are gray... anyone can help me?
pastebin.com/16Ea6mE7
lsb_release -sc : quantal
I really don't want to reinstall ubuntu, again...
urur65: you'll want this then http://www.ubuntuvibes.com/2012/10/how-to-install-amd-catalyst-legacy.html
What have I done? I typed something wrong I guess (key-area: return, shift, control, arrows ...) and after that my gnome session vanished very very quickly and I had to login again. This happend the fifth time, but I am still so surprised, that I cannot follow, what I did and what really happend.
jakey1: Yes, Linux can read HFS+ filesystems
legacy? does that mean no future support for my gpu nymore
hey guys, i'm having a huge troble with my ubuntu, with ambiance theme, after a update, when I right click the menu is gray, and ugly and hard to read... Also the applications' sub menu are gray... anyone can help me?
Touhou44,  can you recomment a tutorial or website on the matter
vaurdan: Do you have a screenshot? I had an issue like that before where the particular user didn't have access to the theme files
pastie.org/5166992
Kennt sich hier jemand mit C aus? ;-)
http://pastebin.com/rAi1Qn3s
jakey1: There's a wiki page: https://help.ubuntu.com/community/hfsplus Does Ubuntu not automount the HFS disk?
doh! Wrong window - sorry
Touhou44, i'm having troubles screenshooting with the menus open, let me try another software
how to force-overwrite when installing packages with apt-get ?
hello
I didnt try yet
how to force-overwrite when installing packages with apt-get ?
Touhou44, tahnsk for the link
Touhou44, just take a picture with my smartphone, sending you the link in few seconds
Touhou44, this is the problem I'm having: https://docs.google.com/open?id=0BzFNC7jET0aib21zMkRiem05QnM any ideias?
wc
dr_willis: trying to overwrite '/bla/bla' which is also in packages firmware-linux-free 3.1
what's the terminology for packages that simply install other packages?
Touhou44, this is the problem I'm having: https://docs.google.com/open?id=0BzFNC7jET0aib21zMkRiem05QnM any ideias?
syskk, are you talking about metapackages?
syskk: metapackage
vaurdan: I'm not sure, possibly bug which I'd report
Touhou44, I also recently had a bug with Volume slider, with replaced text to VOLUME, and that made me change to Gnome 3.6
I think, i enabled Voice in Pidgin, using Voice&video plug-in
Touhou44, https://docs.google.com/open?id=0BzFNC7jET0aiRHk3bXhmaWgtbW8 <- see? I'm soooo close to reinstall Ubuntu 12.10... Since I've upgraded to 12.10, I only had troubles...
vaurdan: Ubuntu 12.10 is a little buggy in places I agree
My first bug was with the NVIDIA graphics... and now this
dr_willis: solved this with --force-overwrite to dpkg
Well, time to reinstall Ubuntu, right Touhou44 ?
I don't know if that's a solution, that's what Windows users tend to do. If there are bugs in the software you're using, they'll still be there after a reinstall
so i have been tracking down some strange issues, and i found one of my ppa's contained a tons of related packages, i would like to remove the ppa and restore the original packages. How do i do that without getting cought in a massive chain removal of dependancys etc?.
I didn't had any of those issues when I fresh installed Ubuntu 12.10, so I belive (or I hope) that this bugs don't be here...
hey does anyone know about the etc/hosts file
and blocking specific webpages
rephy222: Yes
Just add a line in it like this
ok well i know the basics of it and it works rather well
127.0.0.1 gawker.com
Hello All.  I have just upgraded my Ubuntu VM from 12.04 to 12.10.  The first thing I notice is that Ubuntu feels more sluggish.  Then I notice that after a fresh boot, it's sitting on 600 megs of ram.  This is almost double what 12.04 seemed to need after a fresh boot.  Any ideas? Does 12.10 just want more memory?
Cajun_Lan_Man: check what's using the memory
but i was wondering if i could add something like 127.0.0.1 www.*google*.com
Cajun_Lan_Man: Install and run htop
hm, seems like they didn't fix the freezing.
jrib, compiz is taking the most, a little over 200 meg.
say i wanted to block any website with google anywhere in it
rephy222: For more complicated things you need something like dnsmasq
rephy222: Take a look here for more information: http://serverfault.com/questions/118378/in-my-etc-hosts-file-on-linux-osx-how-do-i-do-a-wildcard-subdomain
i am trying to run a program called "Unicenta oPos" but i keep getting this error " There was an error launching the application Detail: Failed to execute child process "/home/ngt/sh" (No such file or directory)
found it, ppa-purge
the reason i ask is cause the hosts file can get rather big
trying to use Cheese. launched from the cli it says: GLib-GObject-WARNING **: value "32768" of type `gint' is invalid or out of range for property `video-capture-width' of type `gint'
same for height
is there a config file somewhere i can edit? what's going on here?
|Anthony|, it's a warning... nothing more, nothing less... probably nothing serious
Is there any newer solutions then switching to uswsusp
net
anyone?
for the freezing issue, or is switching to a fedora distro the only solution?
or
rumpe1, well it's followed by: WARNING **: Device '/dev/video0' cannot capture at 32767x32767
and WARNING **: Could not negotiate format
Hi guys. I have the following question. I am currently running a Sony Vaio 13.3 ultrabook (http://store.sony.com/laptop/Custom-Sony-VAIO-Ultrabook-13.3-T-Series/SVT131190X-Standard/en/vaio/8198552921666454150) which has two hidden drives - a HDD and 32GB SSD. For some reason, not a single OS can recognize them during installation, although I've successfully mounted and formatted them.
and in cheese there is no capture device and all options are grayed out
 ngt dirty thing to try. make a link from sh to the one it wants..
|Anthony|, again just a warning. Linux applications are often somewhat "chatty" if you launch them from terminal.
blazemore, compiz is clearly the culprit. Just not sure why the change.
Cajun_Lan_Man: They discontinued Unity 2D, it might be something to do with that
rumpe1, yes, but there it isn't working. which is why i launched it from terminal... to see what it was complaining about.
Hi guys. I have the following question. I am currently running a Sony Vaio 13.3 ultrabook (http://store.sony.com/laptop/Custom-Sony-VAIO-Ultrabook-13.3-T-Series/SVT131190X-Standard/en/vaio/8198552921666454150) which has two hidden drives - a HDD and 32GB SSD. For some reason, not a single OS can recognize them during installation, although I've successfully mounted and formatted them.
I just installed a new system. If I want to retrieve my whole firefox settings (add ons, icon location, history, bookmarks, about:config, ...), do I just need to delete the current .mozilla and copy the .mozilla folder from the old system to the  new one, or do I need to do something else, or will that not work ?
Is there a way to install Ubuntu on any of those drives? I believe they're locked in the EFI bios
lookin for someone who knows lubuntu 1210
kristenbb: ive done that beforr. keep a spare copy of the original directory also
Ya tel me
dr_willis: so that will work?
dr_willis: i am quite a newbie on ubuntu so i am not following by what you exactly mean?
hello
dr_willis: why should I keep a spare of the original directory ?
kristenbb: it has in the past.
ff has a sync feature i use these days.
need a channel for noobs like me so i ask questions
not found a guide (italian!) to personalize desktop like simple shoutdown on panel and other
in case ff resets somthing kristenbb
smooh: this is the channel, just ask
does anyone know of a Quick Look like thing for ubuntu/linux?
quicklook does what Linkandzelda
there's a built in thing?
o-o
hello people
So, I take it no one has the knowledge how to install the damn thing on hidden drives...
hello guys
I thought everyone is a genius here
cant-install-ubu: i dont see how they are hidden..
uf yiu can mount them...
do any of u guys knows how to expand the hard disk of a virtual machine in ubuntu?
well, they are hidden
Anyone knows ho to solve this? https://docs.google.com/open?id=0BzFNC7jET0aib21zMkRiem05QnM :(
i ican mount them, they are mounted alright
just the GUI install app cant see them ?!?!
smooh: vbox and vmware i recall have tools to do that..
it is crazy
anyone able to help with virsh networking on ubuntu 12.04?
cant-install-ubu:  that dosent  mean they are 'hidden'
EFI controlled at all times then, I dont know
Anyone knows how to solve this? https://docs.google.com/open?id=0BzFNC7jET0aib21zMkRiem05QnM :(
never seen such thing before
cant-install-ubu:  seen people in here with similer issues all the time. but in most cases its b3cause they got 4 primary partitons allready
dr_willis, the only way I could mount them was via Terminal. GUI file manager failed crying for lack of privilege or something
dr willis: i use virtual box and im kinda stuck
vaurdan: what does the text mean?
Erik_D it's my language(Portuguese). The problem is the Ambiance style of my menus
cant-install-ubu:  what device does mount/fdisk say they are?
even the damn application menus are like that
cant-install-ubu: gksu nautilus
what is gksu nautilus
vaurdan: Hmm, have you tried messing with themes? That's all that comes to mind.
runs nautilus as root...
yes, every single theme I've on my computer have the same menu's issue :(
drives are formatted, so no partitions there
gk is used for graphical applications, right?
err.. if they are formated they are partioned...
cant-install-ubu:  gksu is a graphical "sudo"
pastebin the output of sudo fdisk -l   may help us
vaurdan: never seen that :/
hello! i ran xoscope and now my headphones arent working. laptop speakers are working fine. what can be the problem?
Erik_D, Yup, is it very weird :( I'm now backing up everything and getting ready for a reinstall...
vaurdan: try reinstalling your display manager before taking the nuclear route
vaurdan:  even a newly made user has the same issue?
Nautilus could not create the required folder "/root/.config/nautilus"
some kind of permissions issue
Erik_D, how can I do that?
dr_willis, going to try that
can someone help me with an indicator? only this one indicator is broken -- see this image http://imgur.com/UrwKb
cant-install-ubu:  pastebin the output of sudo fdisk -l   may help us
vaurdan: are you using gnome?
cant-install-ubu: because the user-nautilus hastn permissions in /
unity?
cant-install-ubu: wait, you are running a root-xsession?
Erik_D right now I'm on Unity, but I use gnome on my daily usage
I am running a live USB
dr_willis, but I guess it's not a user related problem... LightDM also have that glitch
vaurdan:  that would point to a system type issue yes...
cant-install-ubu: sudo mkdir /root/.config/nautilus
vaurdan: I think : sudo apt-get remove --purge gdm & sudo apt-get install gdm
would do it?
I'm also suffering the problem that robbie told (<robbie> can someone help me with an indicator? only this one indicator is broken -- see this image http://imgur.com/UrwKb)
Erik_D, i'm going to try that :)
how do i select and copy terminal?
vaurdan: Please use common sense, I could be wrong
ctrl-shift-c/v
hi
please, in main repositories is not midnight commander?
cant-install-ubu: ^
blazemore: im not quite sure what the .py script does
wait what how do I do package stuff
rephy222: Sorry was that intended for me?
blazemore: yea about the dns server thing...the link u sent me led me to a python script to use wildcards with the hosts file i think
blazemore, you know, it might be.  More resources needed for the 3D.  Especially if it's being software rendered.
rephy222: Oh IDK how to actually use it
Cajun_Lan_Man: Yeah, if it's software rendering it will probably be sluggish
blazemore, any idea if there is a way to tell if Unity is being software or hardware rendered?
tomatto, sudo apt-get install mc
hi any idea how to change from UEFI boot to BIOS boot on ubuntu server?
OerHeks: it isn't install mc at all
http://pastebin.com/jDJbhGsV
Cajun_Lan_Man: Good question! I'm opening it to the floor. Does anyone know if you can tell if the graphics hardware is drawing unity?
D4v1d___  there's also #ubuntu-server
it was a good link i believe it may help im just a little unsure what it does and a little leary to use something i dont know how it works
dr_willis, Erik_D - http://pastebin.com/jDJbhGsV
blazemore: Are you seeing unity?
deadmund: No, I'm not using Ubuntu. What that intended for me?
blazemore: Does anyone know if you can tell if the graphics hardware is drawing unity?    in response to that question
deadmund, It was from a question I asked. I'm trying to find out if my install of 12.10 is using software rendering, or HW.
thanks rephy222
Cajun_Lan_Man: ohhh!  No, I'm not sure.
Cajun_Lan_Man: What graphics card / driver?
<smooh> and i dont know how to expand the hard drive of the virtual machine without loosing the OS
deadmund, 12.10 is using twice the memory footprint, and feels sluggish after upgrading to 12.10, and I'm just trying to find out why.
omg
i jusy bought logitech t650
Cajun_Lan_Man: Are you using radeon?
works soooooo good in ubuntu
deadmund, This particular machine is a VMware VM. It suppored 3D hardware on 12.04, but that doesn't mean it's working in 12.10.
D4v1d___  for?
That's *wonderful* fagioli
Cajun_Lan_Man: I'm not sure then.
Erik_D, lol
Cajun_Lan_Man: Bit of a special case
i just want people to know it works with multitouch
Cajun_Lan_Man: Twice the memory footprint is not true.
Cajun_Lan_Man: Not at all, to be honest.
fagioli: I'm actually a little surprised though, what with all the "it's for win 8!"
Besides the fact that RAM is there to be used, not to be left alone.
Erik_D, in gnome 3, 3 finger swipe up is amazinf
its going to change the way i usr the computer
fagioli: I have  tablet pc, unfortunately gnome 3 wasn't working that well, so I switched to xfce
kinda useless for touch
Hello there is no linux_headers_all.deb on http://kernel.ubuntu.com/~kernel-ppa/mainline/v3.6.5-raring/ ?
bekks,  What I mean is, I have 1 gig of ram allocated. Normally after a clean boot, 12.04 would be using about 350 megs of ram.  Now with 12.10, after a clean boot it's sitting on about 700 megs. That, combined with the fact that the machine is no longer "snappy" as it was with 12.04, I'm just trying to figure out what's going on.
food, join #ubuntu+1 for raring issues
i set an NTFS partition to mount on startup and now its read-only .. how can i change the permissions to gain write access.  ROOT is currently the owner
dr_willis, Erik_D - no luck again? Thank you for your time at least.
deadmund, It is a special case.  I'm upgrading a physical desktop install to 12.10 now, and I will see if it feels much snappier. Integrated Intel graphics on it, but only a couple of years old.
OerHeks, I am trying to install it on Ubuntu 12.04
why is there so many problems with kernel 3.6.4 and 3.6.5?
food don't mix raring and quantal kernels.
Okay okay
hi
OerHeks, I am having same problem http://askubuntu.com/questions/203465/ubuntu-12-04-12-10-keeps-on-freezing , So trying to fix it somehow .
cant-install-ubu: all your hds are partioned with fat32 or ntfd.. id delete the partions on the hds you want to use and leave them unallocated, then reboot the installer
deadmund, See, after a fresh boot of 12.10 on the physical desktop, it's only sitting on 400 megs of ram.  That's making me wonder if it's hardware accelerated, verses software rendering on the VM.
dr_willis, already tried that but without reboot
area51: /dev/sda2 /win7 ntfs-3g defaults,user,noauto,uid=1000,gid=1000,umask=022 0 0
cant-install-ubu: then the system may have been using the old partition layout still...
ok, will try it now
blazemore, I just found a place in VMware Workstation that shows me hardware accelerated graphics are NOT being used any more.  That answers my question.
OerHeks, Is it safe to compile the source from kernel.org?
blazemore: http://paste.ubuntu.com/1323935/   its the /media/sda3 partition
Someone got slowdown with Radeon 200M with new ubuntu quantal?
I got this issue (Terrible slowdown in composition plus high cpu usage) using Unity and even cinnamon. I have a Radeon 200M
But if i ran a gnome-terminal and inside it i open metacity, everything backs to normal.
But Xorg.0.log dont report any error
Someone have idea how i can report this?
blazemore:  should ( /media/Data  ntfs  nls=iso8859-1,ro,umask=000    0  0 ) nls=iso8859-1,ro be replaced with utf8?
ciao
deadmund, blazemore, Problem solved.  After re-enabling HW rendering on the VM, my CPU usage at idle is back down in the single digits, memory usage is back down, and Ubuntu is quite snappy again.  This did teach me one thing.  Software rendered Unity 3D is a bit of a pig. Something I will try my best to avoid.
dr_willis, well, that didn't work either :)
Cajun_Lan_Man: awesome! :)
now, they're unallocated, yet installer can't see them :(
Cajun_Lan_Man: I didn't think there'd be a GUI checkbox for that
deadmund, thanks for the help though.
Cajun_Lan_Man: sure
How can I echo on bash without newline
dr_willis, you know what else is interesting, even Windows 8 can't see those drives during installation. Damn...
can someone help me with an indicator? only this one indicator is broken -- see this image http://imgur.com/UrwKb
is no one here?
Yes, but nobody knows the answer to your question
it was just a very strange quiet
Hi. I want to extend a partition into the free space on my hard drive... I am using Disk Utility... the free space is to the LEFT of the partition and it is within an "Extended" container.
jrib: Yeah I found -n, thanks
will the 12.04.1 LTS server install guide me through creating a raid+lvm install, or should I just take of that first before starting the install?
reCAPTCHA: You need to move the partition to the left, and then expand it to fill the new space on the right. Use gParted to achieve this, from a, Ubuntu liveCD, or the Parted Magic liveCD
hello  .  how to  save changes in  etc/bash.bashrc   ?  because i can't save system  said i'm  not owner .. hmmmm
jonas-k: You need to open it as root
jonas-k: what changes?
no  is not working  at all
jonas-k: How are you opening the file to edit? And what error do you get?
blazemore: I have an "unalcated" partition nex to my Ubuntu partition.. I want to expand the Ubuntu partition into that space so that there is only one continuous partition on the drive... and I want to do this would breaking grub or losing data.
:-/
i'm  badly added PATH    /home/....../bin
reCAPTCHA: You need to move the partition to the left, and then expand it to fill the new space on the right. Use gParted to achieve this, from a, Ubuntu liveCD, or the Parted Magic liveCD
jonas-k: you wanted to add ~/bin to your path?
yes but now i want to deleted what i add but can't
jonas-k: right, well you don't need to edit /etc/bash.bashrc to add ~/bin to your path.  That happens automatically by default if ~/bin exists.  Anyway, what exactly are you executing?
Want to install Game Editor for all users.  The installation instructions is just single user. Anyone get this to work as a shared application?
blazemore: Sigh... yes... I know that... HOW do you move it to the left when there is an allocated partition occupying that space. :-/
reCAPTCHA: You have to delete that partition
i add PATH=PATH:/home/jonas-k/bin            but i did a mistake so  can't fix that
jonas-k: what are you executing to try to change it?
nano ..  gedit
blazemore: I did... it's just "unallocated" space that I cannot expand into. Maybe becauseof the extended container?
reCAPTCHA: Now you need to move the partition to the left
jonas-k@jonas-k:~$ su
Command 'su' is available in '/bin/su'
The command could not be located because '/bin' is not included in the PATH environment variable.
su: command not found
jonas-k@jonas-k:~$
jonas-k: do this: /usr/bin/sudo /usr/bin/nano /etc/bash.bashrc
blazemore: Yes... I know... but it will not let me... I click "resize" and it shows no space to the left to expand into.
i want to append specific name to server
to ip
is it in /etc/resolve.conf ?
meegooo: No, /etc/hosts
thans
you're welome
 (UNIX) ubuntu-7.04 does anyone still have old version on powerpc?
jrib   thnks   it helps ..
Ah... I needed to turn swap off.
swapon swapoff two great commands
juztus  that's a yes/no question... what brings you here?
sorry my ppc died but it was running 10.4 when it died.
juztus: oldreleases.ubuntu.com
juztus: sorry that should be http://old-releases.ubuntu.com/releases/
Hi
Hi. I have Xubuntu 12.10 on my work box, and in many GTK applications, I can't highlight anything. In GEdit and Zim, the highlight doesn't even appear, and in XFCE terminal, the highlight appears and disappears when I release the mouse button.
i used sudo grub-install /dev/sda and grub still cant detect windows 8 partition...theyre both on one hard drive
windows 8 and ubuntu 12.04 that is
anusPotatoes: Try running "sudo update-grub"
Anybody know how can I use java on android?
I don't think you can? Try #android
anusPotatoes: sudo apt-get install os-prober && sudo os-prober && sudo update-grub
IdleOne: Nice one, I'm remembering that
Anyone out there ever try to remove onboard nvidia card with a PCI nvidia card running 12.04lts?
where can I try an answer for my question
????
email9541: #android
os-prober seemed to recognize windows 8 loader but grub-update didnt seem to include windows 8
my ubuntu server doesn't allow to ssh to it !!?
????
it says wrong password,
email9541: Try #android
email9541: Instead of #ubuntu
please try again
Thx
meegooo: What command are you running to ssh into it? The syntax is "ssh username@server"
blazemore:  ssh mtnm@myip
meegooo  be sure caps is not set or so
meegooo: If you don't specify a username it will try to log in with the same username you're currently using
meegooo: And there is definitely an "mtnm" user on that server?
blazemore:  yes
blazemore: the server is beside me
blazemore:  i've logged in
fotographix, you enable the pci card in the bios , usually if you choose auto the pci nvidia card will become default , but choose pci in case auto doesn't work
meegooo: Can you try "ssh -v mtnm@178.131.48.159" and paste the output into http://paste.timico.net
or whatever the IP is
wow thanks for the reply BluesKaj, I'm on my last leg, figured i would try IRC 1st time :( hate to say it, No I disabled it in BIOS and set it to PCI, which PCI is the new card, but it loads up and the onborad is still default and the new card is seen by NVIDIAsettings but is set to GPU1, XSCREENS=NONE
blazemore:  let me try
no auto option, only {Onborad, PCI PCIe}
Hi. I can't select text in any way at all in pure GTK applications. Click/drag, shift+arrow, even ctrl+a, none of them work. What do I do to fix this? This is on my work box, and it completely cripples my ability to use my computer.
guys im trying to build wine from source, im trying to dpendencies i need to know which should i go for, 1.5, 1.5-dev, 1.5-dbg, or 1.5-i386
[TiZ]: Do you mean from a text field?
ttafred: -dev
from terminal
blazemore why shoud i go for -dev, i think that means developer
if youre building, you need the dev packages
blazemore:  http://pastebin.ubuntu.com/1324071/
blazemore: Yes, any kind of text field at all. Gedit, Zim, even the input box in XChat here.
ok thanks i go do that now
is it recommended/ok to install and run Ubuntu from a USD external hdd?
hey  i just desactivated the unity panel from compiz-manager !! how can i get it back ?! the compiz-manager window is closed !
Linkandzelda: It'll be slow
cuore: Use control-alt-t to open a terminal
cuore: Once you have a terminal open you can run compizconfig-settings-manager
(I think it's ctrl+alt+t)
i dont want to erase my mac setup that i have, was just thinking of quicker soutions lol
Hello all. I need help with my wi-fi usb adaptor
fotographix, ok run   in the terminal and look for the lines, renderer string and version string: .. that's your card and driver
fotographix,  glxinfo | grep OpenGL
Hi there.  Anyone seen a pop-up saying "problem detected with program.  Enter password to report problem," or similar?
I need to get a Belkin wifi usb adaptor working with Ubuntu 12.10 can someone help me ?
I'm suspicious that it's a virus.
moondoggy: Yes when an application crashes, you can choose to submit a bug report. The password is needed to access system files which provide information to make the bug report more useful
moondoggy: https://wiki.ubuntu.com/Apport
OpenGL vendor string: NVIDIA Corporation
OpenGL renderer string: GeForce 6150/integrated/SSE2
OpenGL version string: 2.1.2 NVIDIA 295.40
OpenGL shading language version string: 1.20 NVIDIA via Cg compiler
OpenGL extensions:
this is the onboard card the new card shows in Nvidia settings as GPU1=GeForce 9400 GT I'm hoping this will be reflected
blazemore, thanks.  I never needed a password on other OS's.
cuore: Once you have a terminal open you can run compizconfig-settings-manager
moondoggy: I know, they're terrible aren't they
sorry!
Also, the punctuation was weird like in all those emails from Nigeria.  :)
cuore: the command name is ccsm, the package is compizconfig-settings-manager
Is it?
what's the best way to install proprietary ATI drivers? preferably a way where they're reasonably easy to uninstall
trism: I'm sorry cuore - I thought it was the other way around
lahwran: Using "jockey" the built-in driver tool in Ubuntu
Hi.
blazemore: is that going to install an up-to-date version?
PK Hi. Nice nick
that's always my worry using driver tools like that
lahwran: probably. What's the result of "sudo apt-cache search fglrx" ?
Thanks, those are just my initials. ;)
blazemore: trism   thanks a lot for your help
I know how to paste, you don't have to jump on me like that :|
however, it's on a different computer
Is there a good way to learn PyGTK used for making Ubuntu apps?
PK http://www.pygtk.org/pygtk2tutorial/index.html
blazemore: apt-cache show fglrx says that it's only version 8.960
blazemore No, that ain't a good one. I need something better... like Codecademy?
blazemore, Weird.  That page tells me that it shouldn't be running on my machine, and the pop-up looks different.
Am I just paranoid?
PK  start here http://developer.ubuntu.com/get-started/
MonkeyDust Already installed Quickly and learnt all its features. Just need to learn PyGTK.
PK try asking in #python
PK  http://zetcode.com/gui/pygtk/
blazemore: Not really. PyGTK is not so easy as Python.
Any more languages I need to learn to continue? Any alternatives?>
blazemore: It ended up being a problem with x2x.
PyGTK is a Python library, so you'd do well to learn Python
I deleted a bunch of packages associated with Evolution Mail (I use Thunderbird), and I seem to have deleted my clock/calendar display from the upper right side of the screen.  Can anybody tell me how to restore it?
Is there a way to create apps in Ubuntu using Java? I don't think so... but still...
You'd do well to learn Python just because anyways. I came from C-like languages like Java, C#, Vala.
IUseOTR: The calendar is part of Evolution
IUseOTR: indicator-datetime
PK Java is cross-platform, so yeah you can code Java in Ubuntu
Python is a very nice language once you get used to it.
Python > Java IMO
java is xplatform so yes, i think
I have a problem with my usb wifi adaptor. can someone help me
trism/blazemore: Thanks!
tottto-drummond: You'll have to be a bit more specific
You would need Java bindings for GTK. Which are probably uglier than C# bindings to GTK.
What is this Pango I hear of?
PK: Pango is a library for laying out and rendering of text, with an emphasis on internationalization.
Nothing you will likely have to deal with directly. It's pretty well integrated into GTK.
blazemore: Ah! Are you a bot? Because you type fast.
blazemore thanks.. I have a Belkin F9L1103 usb wifi adaptor I tried to get it to work with Ndiswrapper. but it doesn t seem to work. When I do lsusb ubuntu does recognizes it
PK  you didnt accept any advice, what is it that you want?
MonkeyDust  I just need an alternative to PyGTK because there are not a lot of good tutorials  that I want.
is there any body can help me?
caglar  if you're sweet
i have a problem with my radeon hd 6470m driver
:)
how can I set pulse volume control as the default volume control instead of the one that usually is in sound prefs?
the system sound control cant handle volume sliders for 5.1 audio
blazemore any clue on how I can get it to work
it is hyprid with intel ati driver
at least not digital 5.1
PK I'm not a bot
(slow enough for you :P)
tottto-drummond: What version of Ubuntu are you running?
blazemore 12.10
tottto-drummond: What happens if you run sudo modprobe rt2800usb
if I do sudo apt-get install fglrx, then it should activate automatically, correct? and if I later do sudo apt-get remove fglrx then it should then revert to the open source driver automatically, correct?
lahwran: In theory, yes
Hello. I've bought Humble Indie Bundle V with SuperMeatBoy and I'm trying to install with via Ubuntu Software Center, but it keeps downloading 277 instead of ~170 mb version of amd64 DEB. Why is that?
blazemore: do you have experiences with it not working, or are you just being cautious with your recommendations?
lahwran: I tend to screw around a lot so my breakages are probably my own
lahwran: As long as you stick to the package manager and don't try installing from AMD themselves, you'll be golden
lahwran: not exactly... to remove fglrx you have to purge and reinstall some things.
blazemore: blah. I was curious because I want to try fglrx, see how it works, and if it doesn't switch to official catalyst
after days of searching to simply replace/swap a graphics card in ubuntu i have come to no conclusion, anyone know of a how to url, or any support options for hardware in ubuntu?
blazemore let me try
fglrx is official catalyst
but according to apt-cache show it's like 5 versions out of date
tottto-drummond: be quick, I need to go home in 10 minutes
lahwran: the "fglrx-updates" package might be more your speed?
fotographix  start here https://wiki.ubuntu.com/HardwareSupport
thank you
lahwran: what version of ubuntu are you on and what is the output of lspci -nn | grep VGA
blazemore: that's also version 8.960, whereas http://support.amd.com/us/gpudownload/linux/Pages/radeon_linux.aspx is no less than four major versions ahead
L3top: 12.04.1 installed a few days ago, and gimme a minute, I'm on irc from a different computer
L3top: what does -nn do?
lahwran: see my pm on reverting from fglrx to radeon driver
oh, I see
-nn = all numbers as well
but i have another problem
lahwran: cd /tmp && wget -c http://goo.gl/Bbeki -O catalyst-12.10-x86.x86_64.zip && unzip catalyst-12.10-x86.x86_64.zip && chmod +x amd-driver-installer-catalyst-12.10-x86.x86_64.run && sudo sh amd-driver-installer-catalyst-12.10-x86.x86_64.run
it does not solve mine
blazemore nothing happens
blazemore: okay, what does that do? it looks to me like it's just the commandline version of a normal install
because ati dont support my signature it says you need to talk with provider of your computer it means sony
Guys, is there a workaround for the non working fn+F5 brightness control on a laptop?
blazemore when I open ndiswrapper it says that I have rt2870
I am blinded :(
lahwran: Yeah but it's the latest version from AMD's website, rather than the one packaged for Ubuntu
Guest34433: I believe there's a brightness applet, if you alt-rightclick on your top bar and click add
blazemore: yes, that's what I mean, I understand how to do that ._.
10x man
OK I have to go
good luck Guest34433 and lahwran
Guest34433  the workaround is in the system settings, brightness and lock
blazemore and if I do sudo modprobe rt2870usb then I get a FATAL: rt2870usb not found
MonkeyDust, this doesn't work, hence me asking
tottto-drummond: What happens if you run sudo modprobe rt2800usb
sliders are moving, controls are showing on the screen, yet nothing seems to work
Anyway you're on your own
blazemore as I said.. nothing
Should have done that in the first place ;)
gtg
connect
So, no way to manipulate brightness :(
\connect
I read this is due kernel bug
hello!
L3top: https://gist.github.com/1ffdcbf2300f5c08f27a
jello
blazemore Ndiswrapper does see the adaptor but under rt2870 not 2800
Can someone please help me install flash, because I cannot get it installed off Adobe's site because the browsers will not open apt.
man i'm in trouble. I just did an 1hr recording of my screen and voice using kazam. I know for a fact it worked, because i did trials. but during presentation, i couldn't exit out of recording. how do i recover it?
blazemore any idea ?
Guest34433, maybe this page is any help > acpi_backlight=vendor >>> http://www.techjail.net/solved-brightness-problem-in-ubuntu-12-04-precise-pangolin.html
MonkeyDust: I have it installed, it just does not work.
L3top: are you there? I got the lspci output as requested, what were you planning to find out
I installed Kernel 3.4 64bit .. Can anyone kindly confirm me that i installed it correct version? http://paste.ubuntu.com/1324200/
that isnt exactly what I requested... but... lol ok... so make sure you purge the driver with the instructions I gave you, and give fglrx-updates a try. If you just want to revert then skip that lahwran. I am now tied up but will be around for quick questions.
L3top: the only difference is that I didn't bother filtering for the graphics card
L3top: more information is better and all that
Okay, let me retry this... HOw do I get the browser to open APT installer when a link is clicked that tries to open it?
hyyy
Is gigolo supposed to show al shares in xubuntu? i can see shares with smbtree command
Ascavasaion: install apt url
anyone please?
lahwran: I am pretty specific with the commands with reason. I don't want to have to open a pastebin and read all of your lspci devices to find out if your pciid is supported by the current slew of drivers... I just want what I want pasted here as often as possible because I am busy.
food1: run uname -a
HulkHogan, it says 3.4.0-030400-generic but searching all kernel version it output "Linux kernel image for version 3.4.0 on 32 bit x86 SMP" where 3.2 says " Linux kernel image for version 3.2.0 on 64 bit x86 SMP"
HulkHogan: Okay, it asked me f I want to open the link with Apturl.  I chose to, and then it popped up "Unknown channel 'precise-partner' The channel 'precise-partner' is not known".
food1: if it says 3.4.0 then thats ur current kernel
HulkHogan, So it really 64 bit ?
Ascavasaion: u probally need to enable it in the software sources
Ascavasaion: is just a checkbox u need to enable
food1: if it says 64 then ur using 64bit, if it says like i686 then u using 32bit
what about PowerPC processor ubuntu?
Hello their! i would like to ask a question about ubuntu
does any use such on old PowerMacs?
juztus: dont think they support those anymore
When i load ubuntu from a live usb stick, it takes a very very long time
HulkHogan, What can i understand from this description :  Linux kernel image for version 3.4.0 on 32 bit x86 SMP
like 2 or 3 minutes, at least
do you know what is the problem?
Peter: your USB drive?
i am having trouble mounting my windows ntfs drive and fdisk does not see the harddrive either.  I am running kubuntu which is installed on a SATA Raid 5 PCI controller card (no problems here) and I have Windows installed on a seperate physical harddrive (only ntfs partition on it) which is connected to my motherboard's SATA Port.
ok Hulk told me theyre outdated PC's (them(e) 'Parked'Macs.)
Yes, a linux live usb
food1: yea thats a 32bit then
hi
hi
how are you
:/
Erik_D: Yes, i am launching ubuntu from a live usb. but it takes a long time
borg-queen: might need to install ntfsprogs or ntfstools forgot the name
it works but at the start screen (the purple screen with the ubuntu logo and the 4 dots) it takes like for 2 or 3 minutes
Peter: I meant your USB is probably the problem
Oh
what do you think i should do? right now i have 2 different usb sticks
how much better for a guru-geek is theBBS in comparison to this ubuntu?
USBs over, well, usb connections are much slower than hard drives over SATA
Is it possible to use any other type of USB device?
like a portable hard drive?
Is it possible that switching to Lbuntu has drastically lowered my download speeds?  I swear my internet will no longer download anything above 100kbs a second
its incredibly slow
HulkHogan, I installed these http://paste.ubuntu.com/1324237/ ... But not understanding why it should 32bit .. Here i confused
HulkHogan: I installed ntfs-config which is the only ntfs package I could find
my computer does not have a cd drive
borg-queen: did u enable the other non-free repositories?
probably mmany overly many disk configurations r possible but most produce a slow environment for Todays DigitalMedia-to-be transferred thsrough the electronics-32bit-channels
is it possible that lbuntu is limiting my download speeds?
borg-queen: then u should be able to see the other packages
Peter: a drive might work better
Peter: Is an extra minute or 2 that big a deal?
What is a drive? a hard drive?
No
yeah
Express-PCI etc. dont yeat remove certain bottlenecks
Peter: Or try a lighter weight distro
its just that i use it on the school laptop (teehee) to bypass admin controls and to play games. i dont want to do anything permenant to the computer
pretty much anything but ubuntu.
OH lol
Fun times in high school XD
Erik_D: Lubuntu is light
yeah. i play minecraft on it XD
the admins have a program called lanschool, so they can basicly own the computer
Erik_D: ubuntu minimal + openbox is insanely light
so i figuered, if i change the OS then they cant log everything
food1: run aptitude search linux-headers , to see which one is installed
so yeah. it loads for a long time. is there anything i can do?
Peter: Also fun is getting damn small linux, loading to ram, and leaving
you can remove cd / usb
nobody knows what happens
gon on reboot
*gonje
i use ubuntu on my external HD and it works great :D
*gone
Err
I'm trying to help but mySelf, a simple Proble, how to  rebuild a network connection to a laptop, if integrated is damaged beyound repair
Can I disable a startup script in /etc/init.d just by giving it an extension like .sample ?
I am not exactly a computer technician
so what do i do? get a small os that i boot it and because its so small it stays in the RAM?
viaUSB (like suondCard is), I don't have pcmcia, AnyOne knoe how to rebuild a RJ-45 through some usb port, or so?
HulkHogan: I believe I did. Software Sources states I have enabled: Canonical-supported Open Source Software, Community-maintained Open Source Software, Proprietary drivers for devices, and Software restricted by copyright or legal issues
Peter: there is a distribution called Damn Small Linux, and one of the boot options is to move the image to ram, so you don't need the usb drive or cd, and it's really fast because it's all already loaded into ram
Oh
But yeah, try something like lubuntu
does it looks good and is GUI'ed and has a web browser?
borg-queen: yea try refreshing now
i need it to look kinda good, so i get brag points (XD) and also i prefer GUI rather then command line
i could use command line if i had to, though
Peter, I use puppy
What is that?
puppy is a small distro
Peter, Puppy-Linux
How is it? can it boot to ram?
macmartine: sudo apt-get install sysv-rc-conf; sudo sysv-rc-conf
Good afternoon... I am having some wireless problems with my Asus Zenbook UX31E... Can anyone help
Peter  "The entire system can be run from RAM, allowing the boot medium to be removed after the operating system has started."
Peter, http://puppylinux.org/main/Overview%20and%20Getting%20Started.htm
rwlyonsjr: if you can give details, we can advise
Thank you, people
i am now compairing darn small linux and puppie
hello, I've got some problems with my terminal... the width is wrong in some of the apps I run
ActionParsnip: Sure I am only getting about 2 bars of signal and at times I am dropped off the network even if I am sitting close to the router
where do I even start diagnosing it?
how can i disable the email bounce response email from my server?
goddard: depends on what you're using
rwlyonsjr: what wifi chip are you using?
Peter: slitaz is light too
Ok?
Peter: as is tinycore (tinycore is probably smallest)
can all of these distros boot via usb?
my school laptop is designed for security, so no cd drive
ActionParsnip: what is the best way to find the exact chip. I know it uses the Arth9k driver
Peter: yes, you can use unetbootin to put them on a USB stick
rwlyonsjr: sudo lshw -C network      is ONE way. There is no best way
Ok
ActionParsnip: AR9485 Wireless Network Adapter
Peter, use unetbootin if u r on Windows or use multisystem if on Ubuntu
I am on my school laptop, windows now
i mainly use linux to bypass admin controls, so yeah
with Multisystem, u can install multiple OSs on a single USB
Connecting my phone to the computer using bluetooth a2dp profile always fails, how can I check what is wrong?
Multisystem-- http://www.pendrivelinux.com/multiboot-create-a-multiboot-usb-from-linux/
rwlyonsjr: if you run:   sudo iwlist scan | egrep -i 'channel|ssid'     do you see a lot of wirelesses on the same channel?
Guys, what is the best file system for storage?
Guest34433: all filesystems do storage
Guest34433: there is no best file system
big media files and such
Peter, Multisystem can be installed on live-cd/USB too
Guest34433: anything but FAT then
Guest34433: I'd go for Ext4 for simplicity
ActionParsnip: Right now I see 2 networks in range and they are on 2 different channel
ext4 it is then
Oh dear :D your all gonna advertise me your favorite Linux distros :D
Peter, no ad but help
Peter  wait until we start recommending IRC clients
rwlyonsjr: that's good, now you have the wifi chip, you can search for solutions
* Peter says to his computer: Brace yourselfs! the great linux distro ad-rant is gonna come!
Guest34433: http://www.quora.com/What-are-the-advantages-and-disadvantages-of-the-filesystems-ext2-ext3-ext4-ReiserFS-and-XFS
ActionParsnip: ok
Peter: As long as we don't start the text editor war it's all good
(vim > emacs, btw)
I think i better get out of here, Lol
Current speed download: 318 KB/s upload 1216 KB/s
* keithzg is a nano-using heathen
keithzg: same
So is there anyway I could check why my bluetooth connection fails after a few seconds?
My upload is better than download
TheJelly: run:   dmesg | tail
hello
how can i find out what package provides dhcpcd-test utility ?
TheJelly: when it drops
Hey all you Ubuntu-users, I'm using the superior Linux Mint
ok, another question
mnice: dpkg -S dhcpcd-test
Trebuchet: hey, we dpnm
Trebuchet: hey, we don't care
where to get and how to install intel hd3000 drivers
Mint is soon Ubuntu
intel's site doesnt provide that
ActionParsnip: i mean from possible installation candidates
serverqg: mint is offtopic here
Ubuntu is laggy, so I went to Xubuntu, but that didn't feel right either
Sorry for being so noobish, but how do i download DSL?
its darn small linux XD
Trebuchet: troll somewhere else!
then when I installed Mint, I was happy as can be
Trebuchet: what video chip do you use?
umm, I'll check
hold on
Intel driver guys - where to get, how to install
Peter u google
I use Slackware, Ubuntu 10.04 server, Debian Squeeze server, Ubuntu 12.10 too
Ok
Guest34433: its in a default install
not its not
Google Earth 7 now
serverqg: do you have a support question?
Anyone install Google Earth 7?
this is my laptop: http://h10010.www1.hp.com/wwpc/us/en/sm/WF06b/321957-321957-64295-3740644-3955548-5086782-5086785-5223272.html?dnr=1
i need to dump dhcpack without using it
i'm not sure how to see the video card
ActionParsnip, it says Driver: Unknown, Experience: Standard
Trebuchet: lspci
Trebuchet: run:    sudo lshw -C display
so no working Intel driver in the install
which means i cant adjust simple thing as brightness
what do you call the quantal new deskop interface
Guest34433: its in the default install, it does the resolution. The brightness is different
 description: VGA compatible controller
       product: Core Processor Integrated Graphics Controller
       vendor: Intel Corporation
       physical id: 2
       bus info: pci@0000:00:02.0
       version: 02
       width: 64 bits
ttafred: the shell is called Unity
Trebuchet: we just need the product line.
ActionParsnip, ok then. How to fix brightness?
it doesnt work
HP 630
oh wow, I'm such a noob sorry
Trebuchet: no, the product line of the video chip........
as you can see, I don't know very much about conputers
Guest34433: what make and model is the system
http://h10010.www1.hp.com/wwpc/us/en/sm/WF06b/321957-321957-64295-3740644-3955548-5086782-5086785-5223272.html?dnr=1
thats the laptop
sudo apt-get install lsb-core ; cd /tmp ; wget -c http://goo.gl/YEqTf -O google-earth-stable_i386.deb; sudo dpkg -i google-earth-stable_i386.deb para 32 bits
ActionParsnip, http://store.sony.com/laptop/Custom-Sony-VAIO-Ultrabook-13.3-T-Series/SVT131190X-Standard/en/vaio/8198552921666454150
Guest34433: let me search, sony rubbish can be a pain.
applets work as they should, I mean they indicate changes without any effect. and yes, sony is garbage
sudo apt-get install lsb-core ; cd /tmp ; wget -c http://goo.gl/YEqTf -O wget -c http://goo.gl/t6E3i -O google-earth-stable_amd64.deb ; sudo dpkg -i google-earth-stable_amd64.deb for 64 bits
Did you guys figure it out?
hi
Current speed download: 318 KB/s upload 1218 KB/s
Guest34433: tried adding the boot options:      acpi_osi=Linux acpi_backlight=vendor
i've just installed 12.10 but i saw that the effects when you iconize a window it's different. Now the window fades back to the panel much slower.. how can i tweak this setting?
Current speed download: 318 KB/s upload 1218 KB/s
serverqg, why are you postin g that
HELLO !!!!! how i can find tutorial to create my canal
Guys, is it true that Linux doesn't need anti-virus?
lolol where should i put that line
Killa_Killa[RIP], on #freenode
After logging in, all of my windows have lost the X [] _ for close/minimize/maximize
take out the "C" in canal, I believe that oughtta work
hi, why the f*** did do-release-upgrade upgraded me from natty to oneiric and not to the next LTS?
Trebuchet: only if you are running a file server or an email server
Sorry... bazhag. I want if Google Earth run good in Ubuntu 12.04 and 12.10
sorry ubottu
FloSoft: because theonly way you can upgrade to Precise OS from Lucid (LTS to LTS) or from 11.10 (next release)
serverqg, please stop posting that here. we don't need to know your upload and download speeds
FloSoft: you cannot skip versions while upgrading unless you are going from LTS to LT
FloSoft: you cannot leapfro releases
S
ActionParsnip, which file should I put this acpi_osi=Linux acpi_backlight=vendor line?
hmm so I cant go to lts from oneiric?
Guest34433: http://askubuntu.com/questions/154557/unable-to-change-brightness-settings-in-sony-vaio-e-series-laptop
bazhang, OK... Vou unable function... Sorry.
I am brazilian, sorry my english
FloSoft: yes as it is 11.10 to 12.04 which is the next release. As I said earlier, you cannot leapfrog releases
hi, is it possible to recover rar or zip passwords in ubuntu?
ActionParsnip: hmm thats kind of strange
I forgot the password to my TrueCrypt btw, how do I recover it?
It has all of my dad's business stuff
ubuntu_mint: http://my.opera.com/mazwarbz/blog/rarcrack-how-to-crack-rar-archieve-password-in-ubuntu
Trebuchet: oh dear :(
what?
ActionParsnip: but I dont skip a version arent I?
FloSoft: you can upgrade to precise (LTS) from oneiric
jrib: how? im on oneiric now, but do-release-upgrade does not offer that option
I suggested to my dad to use truecrypt and he trusted me with the password, but I forgot it
FloSoft: it should
FloSoft: if you update from Natty to Oneiric, then upgrade Oneiric to Precise then you have not missed a release
I need to get it open or he'll kill me
my dad uses Ubuntu if that helps
interesting - I tried 2min before and it said no new release available O.o
now it works *lol*
Trebuchet: http://www.dslreports.com/forum/r24404882-Truecrypt-Forgot-My-Password
Trebuchet: one of the reasons I don't use encrypted nonsense
thx anyway ;)
Thanks Parnsip, you've been very helpful
Trebuchet: you'll usually remember the password after trying not to think about it for a while
hello, i was wondering where does "Keyboard Layout" client writes all the configs ?
Ok, I'll just go and sulk for a while
does "vgaswitcheroo" aka https://help.ubuntu.com/community/HybridGraphics also work for desktop computers?
would like to get a desktop with a potent gpu, that can be turned off to save power
How can I prevent bluetooth from disconnecting when establishing an a2dp connection  with my phone?
test
zastaph: it can't. and what you want is a bad idea
wols, how come
cause a modern GPU only uses 10-20W while on the desktop
wols, I see, gotta check the cards specs then
How to use IRC in Empathy?
I don't see IRC on the account settings.
PK: if 12.10 you may need to install account-plugin-irc
Okay, I got it.
PK: you need empathy irc module, besides that empathy is VERY limited for irc
sudo apt-get install blah.
i need to clone a dual-boot hdd to a smaller drive. the 2 partitions that make up the dual boot are smaller than the new hdd. the rest of the original hdd is backup space
how do i do that
#freenode.fr
PK: https://live.gnome.org/Empathy/FAQ#IRC
Hello, absolute value of Anthony.
lol
like that
Yes, it is 12.10 Unity.
Har, PK that's clever.
|Anthony|: maybe dd?
|Anthony|: you can use dd, clonezilla, grsync in liveCD
anyone knows how to set the time a windows takes to fade back to the unity panel when you press "iconize" ?
Thank you. <tips hat>
Is there a command to delete folders with files still inside of them?
thesadmafioso  rm -r
thesadmafioso: rm -r
that might work if it was a simple dd if-/dev/sda of=/dev/sdb so i could get the mbr too. but the replacement hdd is smaller
Ah, so remove recursively?
Ok, I shall try that and then stop staring at this comptuer screen for the night. Thank you!
|Anthony|: use bs=1024   to speed it up a bit :)
ActionParsnip: but he said the replacement hdd is smaller
is it smaller?
You people are smart.
yes
although... the 2 os's on the original are smaller than the replacement
but the whole drive is larger
|Anthony|: "yes" is not a replacement to "thank you". ;)
|Anthony|, Personally I would resize the original with gparted to fit then clone it with clonezilla then install in the new one, This serves two purposes you have a new hd set up and the clone for backup.
I'm not running GNOME, so Terminal wouldn't accept the GNOME command.
|Anthony|: what wilee-nilee said
I repeat, I'm using Unity.
it still should work PK
Ain't working, linuxuz3r.
try typing term in application
finder
Are there other pre-installed IRC clients?
not that i know of
but you are already using one
Are there any good ones I may install (leaving ChatZilla)?
PK  what are you running?
irssi
Nah... I need a quicker access. I'm on my web browser.
run irssi inside screen on a server somewhere
gordonjcp  Not there on the dash.
irssi <3
PK: it wouldn't be on your local machine
well, it *could* be I suppose
you could install it
What are you guys running?
PK: irssi, inside screen
it's awesome
same here
I can't find it on the Dash.
PK: you'd need to install it
Oh Lord.
Okay.
PK: and as I said, ideally you'd install it on some hosted machine somewhere, run it in screen, and ssh to it
sudo apt-get install screen irssi
pk try searching for terminal on the dash
PK: watch this
unity feels slow. is this because i have a 128mb graphic?
I know terminal. Gosh.
PK: okay, I've now turned my desktop off, and I'm sitting on my PC in the van
PK: did you see me disconnect and reconnect? No? That's because I didn't - I just dropped the ssh connection on one machine, connected from another, and reattached screen
gordonjcp: what does screen do?
I don't really follow those "joined," and "left" messages.
linuxuz3r: it provides a virtual console that you can disconnect and reattach
gordonjcp: using what connection?
ssh?
Which one works on Ubuntu again? tar.bz or tar.gz?
yeah
linuxuz3r  you can even terminate terminal and log off, screen keeps running
pk both
ok
PK: tar -j... is bz2 and tar -z... is gz
pk: or install unp and use that to extract anything
pk:  unp filename
I messed aroudn with my shell a bit (to get zsh instead of bash) and now my prompt is [computername]% and no longer shows my account name.  is this normal with zsh or am i in  the wrong shell
Who are the reds here?
the reds?
sarutahiko: does zsh honour PS1 ?
I do not know what PS1 is
but it also doesn't show my path
sarutahiko: its the variableto define the bash prompt
sarutahiko: when you first run zsh it should run you through its setup...
jrib: yes I just completed that
sarutahiko: I think you could have chosen a prompt there :)
sarutahiko: try:  export PS1="\[\e]0;\u@\h: \w\a\]${debian_chroot:+($debian_chroot)}\u@\h:\w\$"
irssi downloaded and I've opened this with Archive Manager.  What next?
anybody?
PK: run:   irssi   in a terminal
john_doe_jr  tab completes, even the spaces
okay my sire.
john_doe_jr: use TAB to complete the name
PK are you on ubuntu? you dont install irssi from a tar.gz
MonkeyDust: they name of the file is Office 2007 Std
PK  sudo apt-get install screen irssi
MonkeyDust: it doesn't automatically change to this
john_doe_jr: or run:     cd Office\ 2007\ Std
ActionParsnip: now my prompt is "\[\e]0;\u@\h: \w\a\]\u@\h:\w$"
MonkeyDust  all right, the old sudo way.  Right on.
sarutahiko: here http://zshwiki.org/home/config/prompt (you can just edit PS1 if you want but there are some nice preset ones you can explore)
PK  the  fastest and easiest way
lolz PK you should have used terminal to run the empathy plugin
sarutahiko: then the PS1 is honoured. You can find guides to set the prompt as you desire
sarutahiko, ActionParsnip: the escapes are different in zsh, they use %
hi
Oh boy.
thank you
jrib: gotcha
* jrib learned that ActionParsnip is not a zsh user and is disappointed :(
Could you please explain this beginner (me) how to do that? @linuxuz3r.
jrib: bash does enough for me
ActionParsnip: just teasing you
jrib: I know :D
can i request some assistance? My mac mini is unable to boot a live usb installer, and the command to make a user installer from a mac result in an unreadable disc
sarutahiko: try:   PS1=$'%B%n @ %M%b %{\e[1;32m%}%~%{\e[0m%} $ '
sarutahiko: source http://www.linuxquestions.org/questions/linux-newbie-8/zsh-ps1-dollar-sign-in-the-beginning-why-858543/
ActionParsnip: that worked...thanks!!
open up dash type in : xterm and do sudo apt-get install irc-empathy-plugin
linuxuz3r:  What is the command for the Empathy plugin?
i dont know
Running irssi on the terminal. Cool stuff.
a
john_doe_jr: if you use TAB more, it makes things easier :)
a
salut
ififjdjid
salut
The Superbowl vs. The Election.
Eh, this is PK.
How to change my nickname?
On the terminal.
 /nick newnick
Cool stuff.
try
: /name
What does this "+i" mean?
PK: its very scriptable
Hmm.
+i is invisible i think
How do I disable these "joined" and "closed" stuff?
PK  now type /ignore #ubuntu +joins +quits +parts +modes +nicks
check the options
All right sir.
hi, i accidently deleted 'sed', how do i get it back? it wont let me remove it cause it has dependencies.
Hmm.
cant find a reinstall option
apt-get reinstall sed
E: Invalid operation reinstall
xsacha: sudo apt-get install --reinstall sed;
ah ok
try that
thanks
How do I go about joining some other IRC not related to Ubuntu?  Like we'd have to connect to some other network right?
no
PK: not necessarily
PK: there are channels for all sorts of things on freenode
PK  try ##
Hi!
For example, I wanna join some "fun" IRC not related to the Ubuntu network.
I am trying to make a multiboot usb drive, what options should I go out of partition types?
PK  then try ##fun (double #)
Okay.
##fun
PK, really, these questions should be asked on #freenode
Okay.
How do I change the channel? -.-
 /join #channel
/join #freenode
with 12.10 i no longer have the useful mailmox symbol on the upper right corner... why is that?
lista
Hi! Any ideas why gigabit LAN is slow while transfering files from Ubuntu 12.04 to a Windows 2008r2 Server using Windows File Sharing? Max speed about 25MB/s.
Works better with NFS, around 60MB/s
And even better from Windows 7 (on the same machine as ubuntu) to the server; 90-110MB/s
are there any ubuntu certified gamer desktops ?
nope
lemme send a pic
here, it is currently GUID and linux basic data partition: http://i.imgur.com/G254q.png
zastaph  the latest from ZaReason is a devil do all
hrm, one thing i'm not sure how to do is to see which flags a package was compiled with..
I suppose I should make it MBR Partition scheme
figured it might in the output of apt-cache show <package> but not seeing it
I wonder if I suppose what I should suppose~
MonkeyDust, seems US only
what software is there for a tv tuner?
I think the drivers are there
bazhang, thank you
where can i find the kernel headers on 12.10 ?
I have installed the new kernel and header file. now i want to remove the default old kernel and header file. But when i do "apt-get purge linux-header-<version> it just want to upgrade ... what can i do?
Wasn't there an issue with Ubuntu not controlling fans on laptops and they overhead?
designbybeck, well.... I have 3 laptops completly FANNINNNNNNNNNGGG,.... so I would say yes :P
uh
food1, try to remove it using synaptics
I thought i saw somewhere there was issues with ubuntu causing laptops to overheat aboudreault
ericus, http://paste.ubuntu.com/1324505/
and I have a friend who is new to ubuntu that is haven't that problme
designbybeck, Never had a problem, with at least 4 different laptops, it is not with all laptops,
food1 try synaptics
probably. here we use Dell laptops
he's on an Acer aspire
yeah I don't think I have had a problem with my Dells running hot
designbybeck, is the laptop relatively new? like less than a year old?
Does anyone know a BNC software that allows me to join multiple networks, with different nicknames in some networks? ZNC does not seem to do the job
Any new solutions to the freezing issue for laptops? version 12.10
ericus, I just setup different username/pass for each network. same things
fusk: irssi?
wols, ?
wols, irssi is not a BNC
fusk: tested RAM health?
aboudreault: of course it is
aboudreault, okay, but that would require several windows? I need a client for my phone
ActionParsnip, the machine is fine. After going through the forums etc. i've found it seems to be a commen issue.
fusk, A forum is not a cause and effect equaling common, it is for people to go with troubles the data is skewed.
aboudreault, do you have any good guide that you can link to? I'll be running it on a headless Ubuntu Server
ericus, I would have thought that on a mobile phone... it's simply status windows + channel windows.. so it doesn't care how many network you are. I might be wrong
waiting on his reply aboudreault i'm going to get him to check on this: http://askubuntu.com/questions/137747/acer-aspire-heats-up-in-ubuntu-10-10
But he did say he is running 12.10
ericus, This description This package provides kernel header files for version 3.4.0 on 32 bit x86 SMP. i am on 32bit?
food1 then x86 is correct
that's 32bit
hi all
Hi DereC
im bit stuck on ubuntu
machine is runnig without ui
mean no x server etc
connection is only thru ssh
now new hdd is added
is the machine headless DereC?
yes
then you won't have any GUI
trying to partition 3tb hdd on headlees machine
Unless you go for some RDP protocol
fdisk is not supporting more than 2tb
DereC, 3 terrabyte would be gpt
ericus, but install the amd64 bit kernel... I am not understanding why it should be 32 bit. See here the output of few command : http://paste.ubuntu.com/1324534/
wilee-nilee, yep, but gparted cant be run just with cmd
DereC: parted can
or?
hey guys, how do I disable xen/
wilee-nilee,  i'v been through all the forums to the distros i've tried, every ubuntu distros has this issue for many laptop users. don't think commen is so far fetched.
ericus, any idea?
defaultro_: uninstall it
food1, no, sorry man :(
wols, thats what im looking for
wols: worried that it might remove kernel too
And it seems to only happen for ubuntu, on fedora and fuduntu this does not happen.
aboudreault, are you satisfied with ZNC? Any guide that I can follow?
hello, which channel can I get help debugging a crash in unity/compiz 12.10?
ericus, yes I am, very easy to setup.
why doesn't my Pidgin allow me to use the SILC chat protocol?.. :-(
ericus, I just follow instruction on the site
and configured my options via the web interface
aboudreault, okay, thanks a lot! :)
in xchat how can i switch to dialog window via keyboard?
Im trying to install debug symbols for compiz but failes with broken dependency
arune: what dep?
 
compiz-core-dbgsym : Depends: compiz-core (= 1:0.9.8.4+bzr3407-0ubuntu1) but 1:0.9.8.4-0ubuntu3 is to be installed
(maybe I'd rather ask this in the Pidgin chatroom...)
I have added apt source: deb http://ddebs.ubuntu.com quantal main restricted universe multiverse
XiaolinDraconis, try in #xchat
arune: do you have updates to run or anything?
Erik_D: no
1:0.9.8.4+bzr3407-0ubuntu1 seems to point to a bazar revision
google gives that more people found that its not possible to install compiz debug symbols but no solution
Any ideas why gigabit LAN is slow while transfering files from Ubuntu 12.04 to a Windows 2008r2 Server using Windows File Sharing? Max speed about 25MB/s. With NFS on the server the speed is about 60MB/s
arune: No idea, sorry :/
And in Win 7 on the same machine to the server 90-110MB/s
fusk, I can appreciate your argument but it just a assumption. ;)
Erik_D: any clue if there is a better channel to get help at? #ubuntu-unity?
arune, #compiz perhaps
^
Ill try, thanks!
just testing irssi here.
wilee-nilee, true.
what is this guys -> title           Ubuntu 12.04.1 LTS, memtest86+
kernel of that is pointing to /boot/memtest86+.bin
defaultro_:  it runs memtest86
which is a memory tester among other things
i know someone just answered me, but i accidently switched channels
ok
it's memory check tool
i knew it, it was the same as the one for dos.
how can i switch to a dialog window via keyboard?
i'm trying to figure out which kernel to use since i want to use non-xen kernel
XiaolinDraconis:  the answer was ask in #xchat
XiaolinDraconis:  so go ask in #xchat
thats fucking beautiful considering i have no mouse
thanks asshole
XiaolinDraconis:  /join #xchat
Hi. I've just made an update and my ubuntu isn't starting anymore (it shows me just a gray screen). what can i do?
you should learn IRC commands before exploding.
i know how to /join
XiaolinDraconis: also, why on earth are you attempting to use xchat without a mouse?
i dont have one available atm
(one might ask why attempt to use xchat *at all*, but that's out of scope here)
haha good one
XiaolinDraconis, just type it in
cause its default in buntu
i know how to do that
XiaolinDraconis, lets move on
XiaolinDraconis: kill xchat, install irssi, and use the keyboard for everything
boom, fixed
thing is the only populated and helpful channel in all of freenode happens to be #ubuntu
can someone say a good video editor for linux?
hello, anyone familiar with nginx here? I am dying of a frozen situation of "400 Bad Request Request Header Or Cookie Too Large" error, for the past 5 days now I can't fix it, after many attempts. even #nginx channel couldn't assist. can you pls give a push ?
and is there one where you could edit text too?
aaro, openshot
gordonjcp, thanks gordan ill give that a go, i managed to open keyboard shortcuts for xchat and dont see an option for switching already open channels
XiaolinDraconis: try something like ctrl-left and right or something
thanks,bazhang!
XiaolinDraconis:  ctrl+pgup or ctrl+pgdown if you are using tree format
if tabs, try ctrl+left or ctrl+right
sorry for the attitude, im sure you can imagine having no mouse makes for a bad day
does it?
hey, guys, im having real trouble with mac being able to boot any usb drives... none of the guides work and are all out dated
its happened to me before.
i don't explode on people from it though.
XiaolinDraconis:  ^
* gordonjcp rummages around to find a mouse
useful tips are still useless
at some point I unplugged my mouse to plug something else in and never got around to reconnecting it
but, I'm using Unity, which is pretty good for keyboard shortcuts
i have been advised to switch to unbuntu what are the main benefits from switching from windows to unbuntu
gordonjcp, had this been windows i wouldnt have a problem navigating with a keyboard
XiaolinDraconis: because you're more familiar with it
XiaolinDraconis: had I been on Windows I wouldn't have been able to navigate it at all, with or without a mouse
hello every body - iam trying to create a USB windows XP installer - i use unetbootin - but its asking me for the kernel - i dont know what to do - any help  ????
Windows is just baffling and weirdly inconsistent
which is why i posted a question to #ubuntu, as all of you are far more familiar with this than most windows users are with windows
gaby:  did you download an ISO of Ubuntu first, and tell unetbootin to burn that ISO?
rather than using its built in download-and-install options
Main-User, i find the best benefit, ive never had malware or virus infect my system, and when searching for support i dont get a lot of garbage in results
this is what i installed  " theLordOfTime"   sudo apt-get install gparted
Hi, I'm using 12.10, and I'm having issues with frequent disconnects of my wireless connection.  Any time I seem to loose connectivity, I ping my router and get no response.  Turning wifi off and on again fixes it, but only temporarily.  Anyone experience this?
I'm on a macbook pro and am using the proprietary broadcom firmware
(b43)
TheLordOfTime :  here is what i used         http://askubuntu.com/questions/192096/which-software-should-i-use-on-ubuntu-to-create-a-windows-xp-liveusb
but i take it there is still a chance u can get infected with malware/virus issues with unbuntu but just not as common
hello every body - iam trying to create a USB windows XP installer - i use unetbootin - but its asking me for the kernel - i dont know what to do - any help  ????
Main-User: no, there aren't any
i think viruses on linuc are really uncomment, there is no target audience for hackers
Linkandzelda: not really true
Linkandzelda: there are vastly more Linux machines in the world, sitting there connected to the Internet, than there are Windows machines
Linkandzelda: most sane people don't connect Windows machines directly to an Internet connection, they go through some sort of firewall or router
Linkandzelda: guess what that runs?
is that due to how much ubuntu is used.  I have heard that there are some malware/viruses for ubuntu
gordonjcp: i'm fully aware that most of the world's servers runs linux, they they are vastly more protected than the average linux desktop user
Linkandzelda: and the vast majority of ADSL modems and wifi routers
Main-User, no. please have a read.
gordonjcp: on my servers I have full on protection, but on my desktops i dont even have a firewall or anti virus installed lol
Linkandzelda: "full on protection", like what?
good morning
Here's a crazy question, I shoved Lubuntu down this Compaq TC1000's windows compatible little throat. I'm thinking 10.04 is too much for it I want to go with 9.01. Is there an easy way to downgrade?
Linkandzelda: I stuck fail2ban on it because I got annoyed with Chinese skript kiddies hammering away at port 22, but that's about it
gordonjcp: well things like CSF, clamav, spam assassin etc.
OpenSorce: nope
OpenSorce, 9.10? its end of life and not supported
OpenSorce: that's unsupported now
hi
OpenSorce: what are the specs of the machine?
hehe chinese scriptkiddies meh
OpenSorce, There is no desktop release before 10.04 that is not end of life.
Linkandzelda: oh, are you handling mail for Windows machines?
i unbanned them after a week and they're still trying me
we dont they give up after a few hours ban
Transmeta Crusoe TC5800 proc, 256mb ram
evilbetty, wrong channel
:p
evilbetty: I want to patch fail2ban to respond with things that'll trigger the Great Firewall
gordonjcp: IMAP in general, as well as wen hosting and dns
web*
well it happens on ubuntu server ;)
Linkandzelda: right, but I take it clamav is for scanning mail for people on Windows?
I know I know, old and unsupported version but this thing is too slow on 10.04
OpenSorce: it's going to be slow on just about anything
evilbetty, this is NOT the random chat channel. please stop it
gordonjcp: I guess it scans mail and files as well
OpenSorce: there is absolutely no difference in speed between any of the versions of Ubuntu, assuming you run roughly the same UI
OpenSorce: you should try 12.04 Lubuntu
Bad advice, my proc is not supported past 10.04 :-)
Transmeta Crusoe TC5800 proc, 256mb ram
i'll make it ontopic tho, when i install fail2ban and reboot, my ubuntu server edition never comes up again, if i remove fail2ban from the startup services my ubuntu box doesn't die
OpenSorce: sounds like you might want to try some other distro then
happened 2x so i doubt its coincidence, and as its a VPS i lost all access to it
OpenSorce: you could get something like buildroot and roll your own embedded-ish environment for it
gordonjcp: who what where
Bah... been swearing by Ubuntu since I gave up making my own distros with LFS... I may try DSL
gogeta1: hm?
Is there a way to see all my processes running? Ubuntu is running very glitchy
OpenSorce: do what hua
and its not iptables blocking, its actually ubuntu not booting fully, but without real access i cannot see what happens
willdabeast: use top command or isntall htop?
gogeta1, LFS? Linux From Scratch? May be before your time :-)
OpenSorce: so its not ok
no
ps aux > textfile, and then take ur time to read the textfile?
OpenSorce: came in halfway in the convo
OpenSorce: so your trying to do a lfs ubuntu?
ah well, i got offtopic remarks, but noone does even the answer to respond on my ontopic issue :)
gogeta1, No worries, I was trying to downgrade from 10.04 on this tablet with Transmeta Crusoe TC5800 proc, 256mb ram
gogeta1, I've been assured that the earlier distros will not run any faster so I'll leave it alone
OpenSorce: may i suggest bodhi linux for that
i probably shouldnt be saying it in this channel, but instead of trying to make ubuntu work faster isn't it easier using debian?
it looks and feels like ubnutu but is faster
OpenSorce: well unity is a resoruse hog
Still runs 5 times faster than Windows did. Yeah I've been looking at bohi
lets get back on topic please
*bodhi
much admit, debian is blazing fast, sorry for this off topic remark though xD
gogeta1, Using Lubuntu 10.04 on it atm
OpenSorce: it uses e17 fast and nice
hi
but seriously since the topic was fail2ban when i came in did other ppl notice ubuntu server not booting fully anymore after installing fail2ban and leaving it in startup services?
12.04 that is
OpenSorce: they use here own softwhere composting rather then use slow cpu falllbacks 12.10 uses
if i remove fail2ban from startupservices after install and before reboot everything goes fine, but if not i loose the box completely
Just such a pain to put anything on this tablet. No removable media drives, will not boot from USB... Netboot worked after several attempts though :-)
OpenSorce: wile still being nearly as light as lxde
gogeta1, thats enough
OpenSorce: outch
I'm gonna see if they have a Netboot iso for Bodhi
is there an Atheros mini-PCI 802.11 G/N wifi card that is known to work with 12.xx
anyway have fun im sure i'll find a chan without ircgestapo
Ouch, bodhi doesn't even have a channel here that I can see...
OpenSorce: its based on ubuntu
squeezed, The is a certified wifi card wiki, but it does not have every one that will work.
there*
Well that's encouraging...
gogeta1, and its not supported here, thus offtopic. please take it to PM with OpenSorce
OpenSorce: its like a base install with a wm and a few basics
hey guys I have a dumb question: I know ls displays contant of directory, but what does ls -l do?
so I'm getting the weirdest behaviour. I booted the 12.10 live cd and selected try ubuntu without installing. and it gives me a flashing "_" after hanging for about a minute
OpenSorce, #bodhilinux
wilee-nilee, I was looking for 1st hand reports cause I used that wiki to pick an intel card, but it has regression bugs in 12.xx
bazhang, so sorry for the off-topic :-P
*content is what I meant
wilee-nilee, thanks :-)
squeezed, Ah well you will get spanked for polling, just a heads up.
I know ls displays content of directory, but what does ls -l do?
4244533000002525	 02/14 	114	 RALUCA DUDAS 	ADDRESS	 CITY 	state	 zip code	 ROMANIA
Evdb: -l is "long" listing - see 'man ls'
the vendor I bought from is willing to exchange for another card... so can I find something that works? ...or do I wait ands see if bugs several years old get fixed?
jrib yeats Thanks guys ;) What in general do the extra letters after a command do?
hello, how is the best method or tutorial to send e-mail in ubuntu for a dummie ?
Evdb: they're options.  They modify the behavior in some way usually
Evdb: it's like the "preferences" window in firefox except for the command line
jrib Thaaaanks ;)
jrib Ah k! Great :)
Is there any place where I can learn in-depth information about disk partitioning?
paladinn, sending a email is the same for all OS's basically.
I cannot login to my ubuntu anymore. After trying to login I get a blackscreen for 2seconds and then it goes back to the login prompt. I'm under a guest account now
adding a new user didnt work
what tool can i use to spike cpu? I'm testing something
as in, I get the same thing
py_can: how much free space do your partitions have?
defaultro_: system monitor is in dash
ActionParsnip: more than enough i'd say
how to check in the guest acc?
py_can: run:  df -h
ActionParsnip: 114 gb avi
any hardware related help channels here ?
thanx guys you've been a lot of help
py_can: do you have a separate patition for /home ?
funch, ##hardware
i don't have gui
ActionParsnip: i dont think so
note im under a guest acc atm
and my regular home dir is encrypted
anyone familiar with this error? I got it after building psensors to add the ATI support: (psensor:1945): Gtk-ERROR **: GTK+ 2.x symbols detected. Using GTK+ 2.x and GTK+ 3 in the same process is not supported
then it dumps core
py_can: i've not used encryptfs, maybe others can help
how does on list a diretory ?
I installed ndiswrapper and loaded a driver.  As a result, my system hangs on boot.  Is there anything i can do from the live cd to uninstall ndiswrapper?
fusk: ls
fusk: list a directory?  y[ou mean ls?
ActionParsnip: in my last session i accidentally removed gnome-panel.. then switched to ubuntu 2d and in that session i reinstalled gnome-panel because i lost my unity @ login prompt. from there reinstalled gnome-panel and fiddled with nvidia display settings which made both my screens black
then i went into tty1 and killed lightdm, restarted it. now i cant get into it anymore
ActionParsnip, thank you.
Anyone help with Ndiswrapper?
lahwran: you can't link both gtk2 and gtk3 libs into a binary (as for how it happened, hard to know without seeing how you modified psensors)
hi, i can run /sbin/ifconfig but i can not run ifconfig. where do i have to add the PATH?
Benkinooby: export PATH=$PATH:/sbin
ActionParsnip: will that be permanent?
trism: I didn't modify it, just did configure options
Benkinooby: you'll need to add it in ~/.bashrc      what is the output of:  lsb_release -sc
Benkinooby, if you put if in /etc/profile or so
ActionParsnip: precise ... i did a minimal setup with fluxbox - it's not a default setup. why?
svspl: thank you - i will follow ActionParsnip advice and add it to ,bashrc
ActionParsnip: is there a way to uninstall ndiswrapper from live cd?
damn guys none of my macs are booting the live CD, anything i can do? ;-;
torontoyes: sure, i'd use a wired connection. Or you can grab the debs online and install them
Benkinooby: I'd have thought it would be default
Guys what does the 'dpkg' command do?
Evdb: it installs software
wols what's the difference with apt-get
stress tool worked great!
Evdb: installs, removes and queries the packages
ActionParsnip: I had no problem  installing it,.. but after install of the driver with ndiswrapper - i, my system hangs on boot
Unity is slightly glitchy for me right now, anything I can do to make it smooth out?
Evdb: apt-get downloads software incl. dependencies and does conflict resolution then calls dpkg
wols: none of it works, it boots the disc and shows the menu, i select try it black screens or i select install and it black screens
ActionParsnip: thats why I booted with live cd to recover the system
*totally offtopic*: what properties you except from a chat client?
Evdb: dpkg does the installing work, apt-get does the dependancy matching and so forth
wols Hmm I don't understand it fully but I'm a real beginner :s ActionParsnip
aaro, #ubuntu-offtopic
sorry, didn't know  but thanks for that too :)
ActionParsnip: thought so too... but since my system is far aways from default you shouldn't mind it that much... after all it is solved now. how can i set the modded .bashrc to action?
hi guys.what can i do about this?   Unable to load X Server Display Configuration page: The NVIDIA X driver on bcuraboy:0.0 is not new enough to support the nvidia-settings Display Configuration page.
bcuraboy: dpkg -l |grep nvidia
as sudo?
Is there an irc channel for ubuntu cloud?
How do you create a file in etc/pm/sleep.d ? rightclicking and create doesn't seem to be an option
Unity is slightly glitchy for me right now, anything I can do to make it smooth out?
"Choose you language and and select "Try Ubuntu". This won't make any changes to your Mac." <- but nowhere does it mention that this gives me a black screen
wols, may i pm you?
ok
hi all, I've got a problem to get pidgin installed here...
software center keeps asking for a dvd, while I don't have one...
wols, http://pastebin.com/1iyaVJHE
bartart3d, so remove the DVD from the sources.list
I did
Linkandzelda: after using ndiswrapper with a driver for my wna3100 wireless adapter, My system hangs on boot.  I have booted into a live cd.  From Live cd, is there a way to disable the driver and uninstall ndiswraper
and apt-get update bartart3d
fusk touch /path/to/file
doesn't help
torontoyes: not sure why you are asking me, i wouldnt know, but if you can get into a terminal like single user mode you can do anything, i would presume
bartart3d, paste.ubuntu.com your sources.list
is there a unity specific channel ?
Linkandzelda: the recovery options I have don't allow write access..
Unity is slightly glitchy for me right now, anything I can do to make it smooth out?
thanks OerHeks
Hallo
torontoyes: i see, but what if you boot into single user mode from your hard disc and not the cd?
Linkandzelda: how do I do that?
at the moment. I am in live cd with access to the drive
1738 nicks? That's totally crazy man
torontoyes: thats something i dont know, as i never did it, but it involves adding some line to the bootup of grub, ive only done it once on a centos server
Linkandzelda: understood.. will try that and let you  know
Linkandzelda: thank you
wait a sec, I got it, thanks.. I removed the dvd's from the software sources, but there still was a line in sources.list, that's weird
willdabeast, Specificities are helpful. ;)
OerHeks, how do you edit that file, saving with leafpad doesn't work
what does the -e do in echo -en?
how can I make unity immediately recognize the changes I made with "gsettings set com.canonical.Unity.Panel systray-whitelist" command ?
fusk, outside your ~/home you need sudo to get priv. so ' sudo touch /path/to/file" and edit " gksudo gedit /path/to/file"
wilee-nilee, my man, whats up, well for example, the way you can scroll up and down on your mousewheel on unity and it does that smooth animation. It doesn't do that very successfully any more, meaning it seems like the framerate is low.
thank you
willdabeast, I'm not sure I can help I use gnome 3 myself, and am in W7 at the moment. ;)
nelson777br: you could try killing unity-panel-service, but I would just log out/back in myself
Hi there. I have a brand new Zoostorm laptop, it's a great machine except that for some reason WiFi is not working... I can't turn it on with the Fn-F11 Hotkey, and it isn't even registered in ifconfig. Help would be very appreciated.
This is the thread I posted to request support, if anyone wants to check it out: http://ubuntuforums.org/showthread.php?p=12331535#post12331535
I really don't understand what de 'e' does in 'echo -e'
man echo
wilee-nilee, mk well there's the problem, ubuntu just crashed due to the x server I believe. Are you very familiar with nvidia?
cellardoor, Try these two commands and see if anything shows  lspci | grep -i wireless
  lspci | grep Broadcom
willdabeast, Not really I have never had to mess with them.
wilee-nilee, thanks for responding. Nothing returned for either commands.
i'm trying to edit a file in etc/pm/sleep.d but gsudo gedit doesn't work.
oh cmon
fusk , gksudo
Is anyone very familiar with Nvidia X Server Settings?
BluesKaj, exactly, didn't work.
willdabeast, a bit. What's up?
http://manpages.ubuntu.com/manpages/precise/man1/echo.1.html   <------ Evdb
fusk, /etc/pm/sleep.d
opensorce, well two things, 1 is I just got logged off automatically with what seemed to be an xserver issue. 2, I am having problems with Unity, I did mess around with compiz and I hope it's not that.
wilee-nilee, you may be able to help with the second part of ^
bazhang what is meant with interpretation of backslash escapes?
BluesKaj, yes, that's where the file is stored.
willdabeast, using a driver you got from Nvidia's website or one from the repository?
willdabeast, I would say that messing with compiz can cause problems, ou can reset it to stock though.
willdabeast, did you create a nvidia-xconfig file ?
Opensorce - yea I have the correct driver
BluesKaj I did a while ago yes
willdabeast, I can't say if it is the root of the problem though.
wilee-nilee yea I know I reset unity in terminal, could that have been the issue?
willdabeast, What release is this 12.10
because at one point unity and the above panel didn't even show up
12.04
willdabeast, You want to run that command from a alt-f2 not the terminal.
wilee-nilee ahhh, so do you think that is the root of the problem? or at least for the unity issue?
willdabeast, as well there is compiz --replace to reset it.  Not sure as far as all the problems
wilee-nilee ok I think that should work, should both commands be done in alt f2? or does compiz not matter
willdabeast, I gave up on unity and compiz about a year ago.
i'm trying to edit a file in etc/pm/sleep.d but gksudo gedit doesn't work
wilee-nilee what are you using now? docky or something?
willdabeast, gnome 3 and cairo dock
fusk why not do sudo nano /etc/pm/sleep.d from a terminal?
willdabeast, the gnome-shell
wilee-nilee hmm I'd be willing to try that out, Unity still feels like it's in beta to me.
willdabeast, Honestly I use synapse to find apps usually and the cairo-dock for the stuff I open often.
wilee-nilee yea I do have synapse, It's just sitting there right now though haha, wouldn't mind using it for once.
OpenSorce, how does the options work, i tried typing ^o but it didn't save it.
wilee-nilee any place in particular to find gnome 3? I think at this point you already know how new I am to this stuff
hi guys.what can i do about this?   Unable to load X Server Display Configuration page: The NVIDIA X driver on bcuraboy:0.0 is not new enough to support the nvidia-settings Display Configuration page.
bcuraboy do you have the correct driver activated?
yes,i'm using the recommended from the system
willdabeast, If you want to install it, sudo apt-get install gnome-shell  you also get the gnome fallback with kit as well the pseudo gnome 2 desktop as a choice in the login drop down
when i go to additional drivers i've installed the recommended
bcuraboy: you have mixed packages it seems. which ubuntu are you running?
it*
12.04
willdabeast, Unity actually sits on top of gnome 3 so the shell is just a few more pckgs.
wilee-nilee well apparently I already have it *facepalm*
wilee-nilee haha yea I guess I'm good then, just need cairo and to get rid of the excess.
bcuraboy: tried:   sudo nvidia-xconfig
done it now.should i logout or reboot?
bcuraboy: i'd reboot, if you get no disaply then boot to root recovery mode and delete /etc/X11/xorg.conf
wilee-nilee any particular way I should remove unity and compiz? I feel like everything I try and get rid of on here is like removing an antivirus program on windows.
ok.just tell me if necessary,how to get in root recovery
Upgrading 12.04 to 12.10 and getting stuck on flashplugin-installer.  Killing job puts system into position where it supposedly requires 'dpkg --configure -a'. Any method available to prevent Ubuntu from trying to get flashplugin?
willdabeast, I would not remove them they are rather small, and doing this is just a problem waiting to happen with dependencies.
i'm trying to edit a file in etc/pm/sleep.d but gksudo gedit doesn't work
wilee-nilee ok well I guess I will just reset them then like you said, btw cairo is awesome great call.
willdabeast, I like the cairo-dock as far as docks go.
hello,
fusk, ^x and it will ask you to save
OpenSorce, didn't work
wilee-nilee so is there anyway to at least make unity not visible? I'd rather not have 2 docks
that means ctrl x  fusk..... ;-)
fusk yeah, that means press and hold ctrl and hit x one time
unity panel can autohide
someone help me, i always fail to install, with error E: Could not open lock file /var/lib/dpkg/lock - open(2: No such file or directory)
dr_willis,  that worked. thanks
dr_willis: help me
willdabeast, Try the gnome shell that is where I use the cairo-dock.
Does anyone know what this means?
fsck from util-linux 2.20.1
Password: _
wilee-nilee: help me
fusk, sorry man I thought you knew what ^ meant. My bad :-P
http://paste.ubuntu.com/1324848/
hayate:  with?
wilee-nilee ah so you mean at login just changing there, gotcha. Thanks bud :]
hayate, Sure, seek professional help. ;)
My system halts on boot with the following prompt
what is, for my  video driver "debugging symbols" ?
someone help me, i always fail to install, with error E: Could not open lock file /var/lib/dpkg/lock - open(2: No such file or directory) dr_willis wilee-nilee
OpenSorce, no problem :)
dr_willis: Any idea what this means on boot.  As my system hangs here http://paste.ubuntu.com/1324848/
c
torontoyes: do you use encryptfs
ActionParsnip: I don't think so
dr_willis wilee-nilee: E: Unable to lock the administration directory (/var/lib/dpk), are you root ?
dr_willis: thats the problem
hayate: and are you using sudo?
dr_willis: yes, even using root user, i can't install
ActionParsnip: Any ideas?  I got this message after using recovery to clean some files
is there a /var/lib/dpkg  ?
hayate, Personally I wont help you, your nick is never the same and I believe you are running backtrack and continually use this channel.
wilee-nilee: Do you what it means when the system hangs at this point? http://paste.ubuntu.com/1324848/
hey everyone! I'm having an issue I THINK with Unity. I was trying to get my NVIDIA thing to display my two monitors as separate X screens (rather than twinview) and now my UI is a bit weird. some of the chrome is coming up black and the alt+tab is not pretty
Ubuntu 12.04
animations are not working, etc.
torontoyes, AS a guess it looks like a fsck was run, is it asking for a password?
yes
wilee-nilee: I typed password, lol, but nothing
torontoyes, Ah, not sure really.
tadi petunjuknya wilee-nilee, no .. i'm not using backtrack
wilee-nilee: is there a way to skip this.. whatever this is?
what I mean is.. how do I see why this is coming up and stop whatever this is so that it skips it?
dr_willis: thanks, i would try that
wilee-nilee: is there a way to skip this in the boot process?
torontoyes, I would not know really I have not had this problem, I generally know what I have had to do, and I keep my OS's cloned and in good shape and don't mess with problems past the time it takes to reload a clone.
wilee-nilee: lol
Understood
Thanks anyway
sure, ;)
umm it looks like unity 3D stopped working, can anyone tell me how to enable unity 3d?
drewh, You have any back leading to this state?
anyone have any idea what to do if only guest account is enabled on new install?
mpavel, are you sure what is the evidence of this?
wilee-nilee: back leading to this state?
hi can someone help me? just installed 12.04 lts, and system freezes after 5 to 10 min. error is as follows acpi error: method parse/execution failed [\_SB.PCI0.VGA_.AF03]
it's the only account displayed at login screen
I changed some settings in my NVIDIA x service and now it appears to have stopped working
it was working fine up until now
wilee-nilee: switched to ctrl+alt+f1 to terminal tried logging in as defined user in setup, no luck, tried root, no luck
drewh, In other words have you done anything that has led you to not having the animations, like graphic drivers messing with compiz....etc
I was messing with compiz, but I've reverted that
mpavel, Is this a direct install or a remote?
I only changed some key bindings in compiz
I did turn some plugins on then off...
drewh, Compiz is known to not follow fixes always logout then back in or reboot.
wilee-nilee: direct install, but with problems
I've rebooted a number of times
hello
wilee-nilee: tried to install (lubuntu 12.10) several times, from USB & CD and no luck. then I booted from live CD and ran Boot Repair, which allowed me to FINALLY boot the system up (which I'm using now) but only from the guest account :(
mpavel, If it were me I would just install again trying to fix it will take longer probably, but I just go with time spent generally against fixing
mpavel, This a fairly new computer possibly using a UEFI bios as far as the boot problem.
wilee-nilee: yeah, but I already went through the install process 5 times :(( I might try something else like Linux Mint - it's my dad's old computer that I wanted to install something light
mpavel, Mint is ubuntu in drag basically, with way less support just a heads up.
how does ubuntu handle multiple monitors?
or rather "how well" ?
wilee-nilee: ok, thanks, I'm off, getting late and no more patience to solve this, thanks for your help and a good day/night ahead! :)
mpavel, YOu might run the bootscript so we can see whats there, the bootrepiar generates a bootinfo url
Linkandzelda: I'm running two monitors with little issue
?
wilee-nilee: I have the Boot Repair pastebin: http://paste.ubuntu.com/1324811/
drewh: little issue? means there is a small issue?
mpavel, Thanks hold on
Linkandzelda: I haven't had issues with it
How do I convert .mdf
simplepro: mdf2iso
mpavel, I would post that script on the ubuntu forums with boot repair in the header, the maker of that app is there daily and a handful of regulars that know this stuff as well, I see a few anomalies but this needs one who knows more. ;)
y thank u
what file do I edit in order to skip certain things in my boot process?
wilee-nilee: ok, thank you again for your help!
mpavel, If you do the forum make sure the script posted represents the set exactly.
setup*
wilee-nilee: ok, I'll make sure - if I retry setup I will be a different one for sure
hello
mpavel, cool, hope you get it working.
where does mdf2iso put its output
all right, so I'm pretty sure that somehow I'm stuck in unity 2d
how do I re-enable unity 3d?
hi all! :)
hi ekrem_2133e
I need to ask something about GRUB.
hi :)
Does anyone know how to integrate bitdefneder into nautilus on Ubuntu 12.04
I have a logitech c270h which has a resolution of upto 1280x720. I'm having trouble with it atm. cheese can't open it. camorama can but it doesn't get full resolution.
any thoughts on this?
hello, i have a problem adding new network connection within network manager applet, with broadband connection, with i try to apply, window box appeared with this error: Failed to add/activate connection,  (32) Not authorized to control networking.
MBR is installig on the first sector of HDD, right? Also GRUB is installing there too. I mena when we install Ubuntu with GRUB, it removes the MBR?
hello, i have a problem adding new network connection within network manager applet, with broadband connection, with i try to apply, window box appeared with this error: Failed to add/activate connection,  (32) Not authorized to control networking.  anyone can help me ?
lonewulf, use clamav instead of those 3rd party av
hello
jantony is clamav really better then bitdefender?
guntbert: can you help me ?
lonewulf, idk about better, but it is good. realize though that av protection can only protect against known viruses.
blackshirt: sadly no (at least at the moment)
guntbert: thanks, maybe some suggestions
:D
|Anthony| , I realize that I am also wondering whether or not I am just being over protective.
lonewulf, meh... i tried bitdefender tbh and it was not very helpful. clam was able to find things that that didn't
same is true when doing customer clean ups...
i've use mse, notron, bitdefender, avira or w/e that is. none were able to find things that clam did
not false positives mind you
|Anthony|, good point and as for your cheese problem, I had a difficult time trying to get my webcam working with it. I ran an upgrade to 12.04 and it works now.
wilee-nilee, do you know much about changing the icons on cairo? Essentially I wanted to just replace the program 'guake' with the terminal program but leaving the terminal icon there.
lonewulf, i'm already on 12.04
:/
willdabeast, I forget if I did. ;)
idk, it just wont go into full hd
|Anthony|, have you tried re installing cheese?
wilee-nilee haha alright, not that important thanks.
lonewulf, of course ;)
i'm having this weird issue after upgrading to 12.10 where xorg will go to 87% cpu on a core2duo 2ghz doing nothing
by nothing i mean, one terminal(9 tabs) and one system monitor is all that is launched
it jumps a bit, at 12% now, but was 87% when i joined. and gives a quite noticable lag.
|Anthony|, I am sorry I could not help, I am however enrolling in a computer class at my college and I will be focusing on Linux and programming, However right now my knowledge is limited.
Hello! I've upgraded to... Quantal with kernel version 3.2.0-18-generic, and now I can't mount FAT filesystems because NLS support isn't enabled in the kernel
wilee-nilee, have you tried cairo-dock 3.1?
"Codepage 437 is missing" it says
In dmesg
im at my wits end now, both my macs refuse to boot the live cd even with rEFIt installed
Rounin: you are not using the latest kernel for 12.04
Rounin: 3.2.0.30-32
Well, shouldn't it work with all kernels, iceroot?
Rounin: yes
How do I go about finding and installing  a C79 [GeForce 9100M G]  please?
Rounin: but its always good when facing bugs to install updates first
How do I go about finding and installing  a C79 [GeForce 9100M G] nvidia driver  please? is what I meant to say.
pangur:  the nvidia-current packatge/drivers dident work?
I had win7/ubuntu and now only have ubuntu.
* dr_willis isent sure what windows has to do with it...
nvidia-current tab
gives me links to non-free drivers
can anyone help me out with an issue I'm having with cloud-config in an ec2 instance? I'm trying to pass in an additional apt source and specifying a filename for it, but the file is never created. I can't figure out why.
and I think this used to work.
autojack: I guess #ubuntu-server will be better suited
When I had my windows installed, dr_willis, I used to be offered to activate nvidia driver/s.
hmm, I didn't know that existed. OK.
pangur:  the nvidia-current package in the repos installs the nvidia drivers here for me... i dont know what  links you are refering to.. or how windows would be affecting your linux drivers at all.
hi all, does anyone know if there is a working package for the ubuntu one indicator for 12.10?
http://askubuntu.com/questions/210400/how-to-install-ubuntu-one-indicator-in-12-10
hey, i'm trying to make a bootable usb on windows using the latest unetbootin... I've formatted my drive to fat32, the windows standard. It's not booting... What is windows doing wrong?
bennis:  the pendrivelinux web site has alterantives to unetbootin that may work for you
bennis: firts question: did you set up booting from USB? (in BIOS)?
bennis, have you activated the usb boot option for your computer?
gunbert, indeed i have
bennis, is the booting option above the hard disk option?
dr_willis, the purpose of this is to display to a nonprofit how linux can be made to look like windows
bennis, you have to move your usb booting option ahead of hard disk in the boot order.
hhhzzzarn yes, the bios is giving some "remove all disks then push any button to reboot" error
hhhzzzarn guntbert asked that same thing, i'm pretty sure
bennis: 2nd question: does it boot from the stick at all (with errors) ?
bennis, I am not familiar with that error.
sounds like the bios is not seeing the OS on the stick.
guntbert No, i'm getting a "remove all disks then push any button to reboot" error
test the stick in other pc's try alternative tools to unetbootin.
dr_willis yeah, but is it a format issue or do i just need a *nix box to do it properly? i assume the partition doesn't have the boot flag for some reason
bennis: that message comes at the end of a live CD/USB session
dr_willis i don't have admin priviledges on this machine
bennis:   you can image the iso file straight to the flash if you wanted to.
guntbert, couldn't tell you why i'm getting it then
bennis: at this point, you can try "universalusbinstaller" from pendrivelinux.org
what is the shortcut to exist fullscreen window mode again (from memory)? I am stuck :)
hhhzzzarn: i have no admin rights
i'll look into it later
hhhzzzarn: in what application?
bennis, I don't think you need admin rights since usbinstaller does not install itself
but he may to get teh bootloader written to the flash.
Hello.
guntbert, in xubuntu in general.
hhhzzzarn: make xubuntu non-fullscreen? sounds weird :)
I downloaded Ubuntu, installed it to my netbook, decided I wanted to go back to Windows and used Darik's Boot and Nuke to get rid of Ubuntu... And now Syslinux Insane Primary (MBR) partition won't allow me to boot from the SD card I have Windows on. I used GParted to get rid of all the partitions on my HDD but it did not work. Can anyone help?
http://www.keyxl.com/aaac887/409/Xfce-Window-Manager-keyboard-shortcuts.htm
guntbert, I click on the window options and choose fullscreen, now I don't see the option icon or the minimize, resize, close buttons.
you use a windows disk/usb/tools to reinstall the windows bootloader to the mbr Steelcased_Sambo
Hi. My speakers don't mute when I insert headphones, and alsamixer doesn't help... Heelp :)
hhhzzzarn: I see - does the list from dr_willis help? ^^^
dr_willis - How do I do that? I have a laptop, a netbook and an SD card. I am semi-competent at best.
quick question is there a way to gut ubuntu to connecto to a server that is using web deploy
guntbert, i am looking
It's possible for me to mute speaker in alsamixer, but I'm installing ubuntu on a friends computer, who is a complete computer retard, so I can't tell her to go into alsamixer everytime she needs to use headphones
Steelcased_Sambo:  people in #windows may be able to suggest some tools.
Thank you.
duntbert, yes it did. Thanks dr_willis, could search myself but I could not access my xubuntu menu
does anybody knows the right channel for bonding/vlan tagging doubts?
hhhzzzarn:  i just googled for 'xfce keyboard shortcuts' ;P
T3: try ##networking
thanks guntbert
Steelcased_Sambo, When you use boot and nuke you need to make a new partition table.
How do I do that?
So I should reinstall DBAN to the sd card and d-ban again?
Steelcased_Sambo, You can do that with gparted, but you are just installing windows right?
steelcased_sambo, you can make a new partition table from ubuntu live cd using gparted.
O.k... So put Unbut on SD card?
but you don't have to install ubuntu, just the partition table and empy space.
Can I remove all partitions and achieve the same effect?
I have found my Software Sources dialog, dr_willis
O.k.
Putting Ubuntu on the SD card.
hey people.sometimes when i click on something movable(opera speeddial, middleclick in evolution, others) and move it i hear a slight scratching noise.this is disturbing...has anyone heard of it/ can anyone help me with that?
Will report back when I'm done.
Steelcased_Sambo:  you need to reinstall the windows mbr to the mbr of the hard disk if you want it to boot windows
#windows is dead.
Steelcased_Sambo, Cool, I would look up the use of the word sambo it is quote offensive. as well.
quick question is there a way to get ubuntu to connect to to a server that is using web deploy because in windows you have to use webmatrix but i not longer want to use windows
wilee-nilee - In this reference, "Sambo" refers to the Russian martial art.
Also, "steel-cased" --- Russia's preference for steelcased ammunition over traditional brass case.
I.E. - Tougher sambo.
Tougher martial prowess.
Steelcased_Sambo, I hope so but there are other uses, that are related that are racist.
There.
hehe cool
hi all.
dr_willis - How do I do that from Linux?
.
Steelcased_Judo:  no idea. i use windows to handle/repair windows.. the boot-repair tool might be able to do it.
https://help.ubuntu.com/community/Boot-Repair
Steelcased_Judo, YOU still have the windows install and just can't boot to it?
Now that I have my nvidia driver installed, should I notice any difference from what I had with my opensource driver?
pangur:  faster eyecandy. and nvidia-setting tool lets you tweak things..
wilee-nilee - I don't have Windows installed.
ok thanks dr_w
dr_willis - I will try the boot repair tool. Thank you.
Steelcased_Judo, Cool, I was just going to suggest a open source bootloader if you did. ;)
i have a problem with ubuntu
if you dont have windows installed.. and you deleted linux/ubuntu... then what OS are you booting? ;P
i cant run the vb on  linux
dr_willis, I suspect he is getting a grub> and does not know of the out of the bios boot menu, besides maybe needing a partition table.
almatrix:  'the vb' meaning what?
visual baisc dot net
dr_willis - No OS. Gonna use Live Ubuntu.
dr_willis it mean visual basic dotnet
Steelcased_Judo:  so what exactly are you expectng these boot-repair tools to do?
dr_willis - From Ubuntu Live, I was hoping it would allow me to reinstall Windows.
dr_willis - It would repair or recreate the Windows MBR?
Should I use CairoDock w/wo OpenGl  ?
Steelcased_Judo:  you Might be able to make a sd card or usb you can boot/install from if you have a windows disk/iso..  You just said you had NO os.. so if the mbr is fixed theres no os to boot...
pangur, I use it with in the gnome skell
dr_willis - I DO have a Windows disk.
shell*
Hello all. I'm trying to run vpnc on a VPS running 10.04LTS I'm getting the following error. pastebin.com/xELJenS6 . I've had problems with getting the 'tun' to work and I've had this enabled by the VPS administrator. I'd be grateful for any help, thanks.
dr_willis - Or a Windows USB.
almatrix: that is so - I don't think monodevelop will suport VB.net
Does GL = Gnome Shell?
anyone help me , /var/lib/dpkg directory was missing .. and can't install anything
pangur, The gnome shell is the actual gnome 3 desktop.
aha so linux don't support it? guntbert
Heyy guys
hey jacob_p
I have 12.10 - so that is most likely to be gnome3, wilee-nilee ?
gnome2 died a few releases back. ;P
oh
anyone help me , /var/lib/dpkg directory was missing .. and can't install anything
pangur, If you down loaded ubuntu you have unity it is on top of gnome 3 as a plugin in compiz.
hey anyone here can tel me?
almatrix: please keep in mind that all .net languages are primarily a microsoft product, mono gives you a CLR, and FCL, but I don't know if there is a compiler for vb
It offers me two different cairos - one w opengl the other without.
wilee-nilee:  help me , /var/lib/dpkg directory was missing .. and can't install anything
I'm brand new to ubuntu, just installed it yesterday, and I've yet to be able to boot it, I keep getting a black screen at what I think is the login screen
almatrix: you can't really use Visual Basic in Linux
almatrix: you might get lucky with running it in Wine
blackshirt, What happens if you run a sudo apt-get update in the terminal first.
almatrix: frankly that strikes me as wtf-ery of the highest order though
i have tried wine but it's not works
Hello all. I'm trying to run vpnc on a VPS running 10.04LTS I'm getting the following error. pastebin.com/xELJenS6 . I've had problems with getting the 'tun' to work and I've had this enabled by the VPS administrator. I'd be grateful for any help, thanks.
it's failed to run
almatrix: maybe you should try a language that is supported natively across platforms, like Python
but i am studying vb.net
ok
Hello all. I'm trying to run vpnc on a VPS running 10.04LTS I'm getting the following error. pastebin.com/xELJenS6 . I've had problems with getting the 'tun' to work and I've had this enabled by the VPS administrator. I'd be grateful for any help, thanks.
omg just booted up Ubuntu finally on my Macbook Air, and it's super!
Is that dual-booting, Linkandzelda ?
Anyone here know how to fix the black screen issue?
i only got as far as getting a live USB to boot
ok thanks
it took me this long and ended up having to use the Plop bootloader cd
Jacob_P, When is this happening?
When I try booting
Jacob_P, From a live cd/usb or a install?
I've tried adding the nomodeset and acpi_osi= parameters in grub,
And this is using wubi
Jacob_P, YOU have already tried what I would suggest which is the nomodeset to get in to load graphic drivers.
Those parameters get me a bit farther, I see the ubuntu splash screen, but when I get to what I assume is the login screen, it goes black
Jacob_P, Grub is different in a wubi so I'm not sure that works.
Should I uninstall wubi then and attempt the usb option?
jacob_p: what computer are you installing on?
Jacob_P, Wubi is basically for trying out ubuntu in lieu of a partitoned install, you might want to check your hardware in general with ubuntu.
Its an HP pavilion g6 with an intel HD graphics driver
Jacob_P: with some graphic drivers, you can get gui in 12.10 version. There was a bug filed. There was a temporary solution. Search launchpad.
fault
Will research that now, thank you
Jacob_P: https://bugs.launchpad.net/ubuntu/+source/xorg-server/+bug/1069031
lol, how did ubottu know that :)
becauese I typed it :)
because
Oh right on, links are always awesome ahah
Not quite sure how I apply this patch?
I'm on a laptop running Ubuntu 12.04 (thor) and I have a headless server that runs Ubuntu 10.04 (odin). I can ssh to odin if I use its ip address (obtainable from my router's web interface), but if I try to ping odin from thor, I end up pinging myself. do I need to clear some kind of dns something or other?
invisime: Is Odin and Thor connected to the same router?
Diamondcite: yes. odin is connected via ethernet cable and thor is on the lan. but they're on the same subnet. (192.168.2.*)
do i need to restart crontab after making changes?
everywhere it says no but my changes aren't getting picked up
ec8or_: Any changes made to crontab should be instant, no restart
ec8or_: How did you change your crontab?
crontab -e
if i run it again my changes are there still
ec8or_: And you are sure you have the syntax right? (The command is correct, I wonder if cron is running)
and older entries still run so can't be anything too wrong in there
ec8or_: What kind of cron are you trying for?
http://pastebin.com/cjE6XyhM
there it is
just running a php script
the /cron one runs, but the /song/cron is never retrieved
checking the emails that are send it doesn't look like cron is even trying
added the mail contents to the pastebin
got a new line after the second line as well :)
ec8or_: I might be imagining, but you didn't tell it WHEN to run?
dr_willis - I used Gparted on Unbuntu lIVE to destroy all partitions... Do I create a new partition now on gparted?
Jacob_P: for now you have to use 12.04 :(
steelcased_judo: yes, new partition table :)
What partition file system does Windows run on?
Fats 32?
ntfs
modern windows run on ntfs
Steelcased_Judo: wundows  installer can partition
Diamondcite: what do you mean? doesn't * * * * * mean every minute?
Steelcased_Judo, NTFS and put a boot flag on it in gparted
don't create windows partitions using gparted, is my recommendation
dr_willis - When I try to use Windows installer the SysLinux MBR doesn't recognize it.
dr_willis, don't create windows using gparted.
wrong person
ec8or_: Hrm, sorry maybe I mis-read, but in that case, can't you use a cron.minutely?
Diamondcite: true, not sure why that would work better but might as well try
Steelcased_Judo: you need to have the windows setup disk reinstall the windows bootloader to the mbr
ec8or_: I am checking your cron line at the moment.. please stand by.
dr
hello do you know if jackd has low latency with soundblaster usb sb1090?
dr_willis - The Syslinux MBR won't let me! How do I do that?
dr_willis, can't you download only the windows repair part on a cd or usb?
ec8or_: have you stated WHERE the wget file should go?
i got some software center repositories disabled when i upgraded to 12.10, how to enable them back?
they do not appear on sources.list only on app software center
Diamondcite: yes it is a controller, works fine when loading in a browser. And either way you would think there would be a wget entry in the crontab mail even if it didn't load
syslinux  has nothing to do with it... and the lifehacker site had links to legal windows recovery isos at i
one time
anyone here use xubuntu? trying to confirm a memtest issue with the 12.10 amd64 iso... for me it always fails at ~43%.. remade the startup disk multiple times
ec8or_: Maybe you can have your wget log the output to see if it's running but maybe hitting an error for running too quickly?
ohdarn: memtest86+ type memtest?
ohdarn, I do
ohdarn, I do not have amd64, I have i386 xubuntu 12.10
Diamondcite: yes that memtest
ohdarn: Sure your ram itself is good?
Now says error: no such partition
hhhzzzarn: have u run the memtest from usb/cd before? I swear its borked
grub rescue>
Diamondcite: yeah will dig a bit deeper, thanks anyway for answering my initial question
ohdar, I have not
ohdarn: I have also had cases in the past where keyboard presses caused error at a VERY specific point
yes, I just switched the image to another computer, fails at 43% as well.. tried 12.04 and passes on both
ohdar, you can search online to see if others have the same problem
Steelcased_Judo, What windows release is this?
heya guys, i have an ubuntu server running in my home network, is there a way to make it so it cannot access the rest of my network?
Windows 7 Starter
Trying one last time
.If it doesn't work, I give up.
g0tcha: what would be the point of that?
just did, i think i found it: http://ubuntuforums.org/showthread.php?t=2070504 , which links to http://forum.canardpc.com/threads/72840-Ubuntu-12.10-build-Memtest-v4.20-fails-on-Sandy-Bridge
trying to install ubuntu server w/raid + lvm.  It's failing to install the bootloader on /dev/sda.  Any suggestions?  I do not have a dedicated /boot drive, as grub2 should support booting from raid+lvm...
gordonjcp, im trying to make it accessable from outside my house, so i want it to be isolated from the rest of my network
Steelcased_Judo, there is a out of the bios boot from menu you need to get there, mine is tapping f12 at powering on till you see it, you key access may be different.
SirScott: #ubuntu-server seems better suited for good answers :)
your*
guntbert: thanks :)
wilee-nilee - Thanky ou.
g0tcha: ah, you want a DMZ
g0tcha: that's a pretty complicated bunch of configuration
g0tcha: look at using a router running OpenWRT or similar
Thank you, gentlemen.
Sorry to have bothered youl
Wish me luck.
Hello. Is SuperMeatBoy 64-bit deb package broken? It's over 100 MBs larger than it should be.
good luck :)
it's cool Steelcased_Judo
at offset 0xc0 i want to grab 156 bytes in this file. how do I do that in the terminal?
sounds like a job for 'dd' conq
cong ;-)
I'll give it a try.
I was hoping for something safer.
How to list all users belonging to the specific group ?
alexfpms: getent group <groupname>
alexfpms: groups <groupname>
svspl, groups gives the users groups
yes I can see my mistake now, sorry
guntbert, thanks man
guntbert, when i add a user to the group how can i make the changes take place without reboot ?
usermod -G <group> <user> instead of `vigr`
alexfpms: no need to reboot, the user must only log out, and log in again
svspl: please warn people that that removes users from all their groups
guntbert, ok it simpler. But i'm curious if there some way to reload the changes without log out, log in ?
then usermod -G -a
svspl, thanks but i know how to add the user to the group
alexfpms: no, group membership is only applied at login, not during a session, that applies to all linux/UNIX OS
guntbert, thanks, it is more clear now
newgrp :)
(though it doesn't do what you want probably)
alexfpms: You're welcome
jrib, good try but it doesn't reload group members
how can one mount a truecrypt drive during boot time as early as possible
satwood, You trying to mount it open with the password?
Hey all. I was wondering if there is an easy way to open a .iso that is already packaged into a bootable vmware image.
So that I can get the contents.
wilee-nilee: yes, because i cant supply it at boot time, i want the truecrypt drive to come up by itself without manual intervention
Is the US mirror down or something?
satwood, Kinda defeats the use of it anyone could get in don't you think?
hi
wilee-nilee: yes, i don't konw how else to do automatically (without it asking) upon boot up.
satwood, With a quick look at the web I think you need a script to be run, I can't really help beyond that. I use truecrypt, but I just encrypted a file rather then a HD.
wilee-nilee: ok, i do have a init.d script, i am trying to see how to start this before any other scripts
satwood, Cool I can't really help sorry.
has anyone encountered the problem during fresh ubuntu 12.04 install the system freezes every time?
checksum is good, and no errors found on the diskc
during the install it freezes? or after a fresh install..
devart, You just getting a black screen maybe not an actual freeze.
freezes where exctly..
neh.
during the installation... after format, gets to approx 40% of the progress bar and freeze... Ive thought it takes a long time to get passed that portion of the install so i waiting a good hour and nothing happening with no keyboard activity (num- light not active)
i can type, where i am for timezone
and setup user
but then freeze
so just the installer hangs? not the whole OS?
dr_willis: i can run the live cd- but install crashes, crashes by just freezing... because of this encounter im using the 11.10 kubuntu
i think your definition of freezing is confuseing people...
dr_willis: IM NOT 100% sure.. but I think that a problem may have occured on my hard drive somehow after having Fedora 17 installed
the Installer just stops? or does the entire machine stop as well? can you still type.move mouse, and run apps after the imnstaller hangs>
can i sync a flash drive with ubuntu 1
if you repartione/formated the Fedora install its gone and cant really be affecting stuff.,
basketballstar, I think the sync has to be under the users files
hello
123
hi, i tried to install jenkins, but it has almost 150 dependencies, its just a war file, whats wrong here ?
hello, a marginally related question
456
where is a good place to ask about gnuplot issues?
i need to open tor-browser_ar
dr_willis: fedora released an update which would allow fedora to load partially, but before the splash(loading)screen would complete it would drop to terminal with errors, but no command line and frozen... no keyboard activity....... anyhow after this wouldnt correct i decided to format and install ubuntu 12 again and work around the unity-desktop  --- as per the ubuntu 12.04 install, I am able to load the cd, enter live cd if i
choose,  and start the installer...... the installed suggests the partitioning and formats then prepares for install.. during prepapre for install then prompts for location to get time zone, then username, and password etc...
it is open with gedit
devart:  sounds like the details of the issues are pointing to some common hardware issue.
i need open start-tor-browser
dr_willis: after all input is entered the installing progress bar will FREEZE, no mouse movement, no keyboard activity, light on the num-pad doesnt not function, ctrl+alt+delete no funct., and if i reboot my computer hangs on ram count until i shut down for a short duration
dr_willis: where you trying to tell me something with that ? because if so, i didnt get it
it is open with gedit
ineed to open it with shell
like .exe in windows
ControllerSYR:  if you mean you need to make the script executable . then you set the permissions/executable bit on it...
what is the user files
basketballstar, The files on the OS
wilee-nilee,
in that users account basketballstar
[twisti]:  somthing seems odd with your 'its just a war file' and the package descrition of it being some sort of 'server'  - but ive never used it..
i cant edit permissions
how do i move a flash drive there then
if the file is owned by your user you could...
its a server. comes as a war file. runs with just java installed, as far as i know. i suppose im going to have to install it manually if the package is this broken, im not installing 142 dependencies for something that runs completely standalone
well thanks for the help dr_willis
<3
Windows 7 has something called, "Stereo Mix" which allows recording of sound output (before speakers). Does Ubuntu have an equivalent to this?
how can I update a package?
raj, Beyond what is in the repo?
no, to the latest repo version
my current node.js version is 0.5.5
I want the latest 0.8.x
ok, yeah, theres definitely something wrong with this package, its just a server module that responds via http, this should not require x11 and sound drivers to be installed
raj, is this not offered in the release you are running, and are you sure this version is in the repo?
so is there any way i can get help with that or report a bug or something ? or am i just screwed and doomed to skip the package and do a manual install ?
raj,If it is the repo a standard update would be all you need.
is in*
how do you do that?
oh no, I don't have the package manger version
i just looked it up in synaptic
that is ollllddddd!
raj, In the terminal sudo apt-get update && sudo apt-get upgrade
Windows 7 has something called, "Stereo Mix" which allows recording of sound output (before speakers). Does Ubuntu have an equivalent to this? How can I record sound output?
[twisti]: what are you actually doing exactly?
wilee-nilee, I probably don't have the package manager version
since mine is even newer
nm
jrib: i wrote "sudo apt-get install jenkins"
which i expected to result in the download and installation of jenkins, not x11 and pulse
Razer_, audacity is an option! very good if you ask for my opinion
but i aborted when i saw the page filling list
[twisti]: try without installing recommends
hey friends, Is anybody experiencing white menus when you guys right click on the desktop, or on the little settings icon on the right top corner?
mmgc84: I have Audacity, but I can only record microphone input. I'm trying to figure out how to record the sound output, similar to "Stereo Mix" in Windows 7.
oh, recommends is another page, thats just the requireds
[twisti]: what?
suggested is a 2nd page of stuff
you can disable option to apt to not install recommended packages
or am i missunderstanding you ?
Razer_, you need to install pavucontrol
[twisti]: apt-get will install recommended packages by default, try passing --no-install-recommends (or whatever the option is; see apt-get's man page)
Razer_, then start recording in audacity, then open pavucontrol and you should see audacity listed in the recording tab. select the monitor of your soundcard as the source device
oh, 1 sec
still 50 different things
[twisti]: and?
kostkon: okay, will do. Thanks for the help. :)
Razer_, np
that seems a lot for something that usually comes as a single file
and i dont see why i would install something like x11-commons
[twisti]: well the dependencies look like a bunch of java packages
anybody?
sure
[twisti]: is x11-common still being installed when you pass --no-install-recommends?
pulling in some sort of gui sounds like.
yes
as well as when i use dr_willis' suggestion with -cli
im just reading up on it at   https://launchpad.net/ubuntu/quantal/+source/jenkins
sync either ubuntu 1 or dropbox to flashdrive for both windows and linux
I did  but no one answered it. I have a white menus on my top right corner panel and on the right click with the mouse. I dont know what happend, they were fine.
hemm, unity 12.04 cowsquad ?
unity 12.10
[twisti]: I guess you'd have to trace the dependencies yourself to realize why it's being pulled in, but I don't see what's the big deal about installing x11-common
cowsquad, i don't know what it is.. I don't have play with unity anymore
Hi. I'm intending to dual-boot win8 and Ubuntu 12.10, and I'd like to have my disk encrypted. My question though is first would this be possible and second if it is which encryption (BitLocker or the Ubuntu setup encryption) should I use?
what do you have blackshirt?
basketballstar, with a quick google I see this a portable dropbox for a usb. http://www.petenetlive.com/KB/Article/0000409.htm
cowsquad, xfce ....
xfce, is it better that unity?
jrib: im uneasy about something installing things that it clearly doesnt need, like x11 and sound drivers for a server module that runs automated builds
try the differnt desktops and decide for your self which one you like.
its not the end of the world, i just dont like it, because its so nonsensical
cowsquad, for me yes
[twisti]: it's likely just some capability of the software you don't use/don't know about that requires it
[twisti]: it could also just be something that the jre packages require for whatever reason.  I don't know
blackshirt, so that is xubuntu right?
[twisti]: is it pulling in the jre?
yes, and for some reason its pulling in BOTH (normal and headless)
kostkon: How would I go back to recording from the microphone?
cowsquad, exactly, not full xubuntu system, i build it from scratch
Razer_, just change the device from monitor to your mic for example, or any other input you want that is listed in the drop down menu.
[twisti]: do you already have headless installed?
Razer_, if you leave the recording source to monitor pulseaudio will remember your choice the next time you open audacity, so yeah, if you want to change it back, do it before closing audacity.
jrib: yes, but jre7, not 6
blackshirt, How do I extend a free space on my hard drive using disk utility?
of course, i would WANT it to run on 7 anyways
cowsquad, thats a different topic ... Maybe better using gparted
Does anyone have some experience with 'Deepin'? I am wondering whether to switch to that as opposed to synaptic and ubuntu software center.
okay, thank you blackshirt
kostkon: so, while recording with Audacity, I have to change it to "Monitor of...", and then it will automatically switch to recording output, and I change it back to the other item in the dropdown to make it record microphone again?
blackshirt, im about to try xubuntu desktop out :)
Razer_, yes, it works in real time, on-the-fly, don't worry, you can change devices any time you want during a recording
cowsquad, good lucks guys
kostkon: Okay, well, it's not recording mic anymore at all, even if I change it to the option that isn't "Monitor of..."
thank you :)
Razer_, hmmm
[twisti]: libjnr-posix-java seems to pull in x11-common, follow that if you want
not sure how you mean that
'follow that' ?
Does anyone have some experience with 'Deepin'? I am wondering whether to switch to that as opposed to synaptic and ubuntu software center.
kostkon: the only options are, "Built-in Audio Analog Stereo" and "Monitor of Built-in Audio Analog Stereo"
[twisti]: you can follow the dependency chain if you are still not sure why libjnr-posix-java should depend on x11-common
willdabeast, deepin ?
oh
ill have to give it some thought
willdabeast: Deepin seems to be it'sown distro
actionparsnip is that right?
willdabeast: http://www.linuxdeepin.com/   yes
there is a deepin software center for ubuntu
Razer_, hmm. for a start, check the volume level of your mic
cowsquad, if you have experienced with apt system, you can switch your desktp env easily
[twisti]: actually it's probably just default-jre when that gets pulled in
hi
actionparsnip well there's also a deepin software center, that's why I asked, some people seem to prefer it.
willdabeast: try it is all I can suggest, it won't be supported here
[twisti]: if you can satisfy the dependencies regarding the jre beforehand and not let apt try to pick a jre for you, you might be able to avoid x11-common
Razer_, you can do it in pavucontrol, just select the input devices tab
kostkon: Ahh, I found it. In the Input Devices tab, the Microphone was muted.
Razer_, :P
how would i do that ?
willdabeast: could ask in #linuxdeepin
id rather everything that wants java use 7 anyways
willdabeast, I would use the cli and apt-fast.
ActionParsnip, alright thanks.
[twisti]: well do you have openjdk-7-jre-headless installed?
Is the Xubuntu desktop or Ubuntu LXDE desktop lighter?
wilee-nilee, for what?
wilee-nilee: +1 for apt-fast :)
help me fix my wireless please
yes
ekaj: Lubuntu is slightly lighter
Than both of those?
wilee-nilee, apt-fast was not reliable way event it was more faster than standar way
Event
Even
willdabeast, For getting apps, it is faster, but if your looking for a gui you can try deepin.
fix my wireless please?
Hi guys
wilee-nilee ah alright thanks
blackshirt, apt=fast is reliable here.
xx: why not give some details rather than repeat the same pointless phrase
ActionParsnip: Lubuntu is lighter than LXDE and Xubuntu?
ActionParsnip, okay, well my laptop isnt detecting my wireless
ekaj: Lubuntu uses LXDE
xx: what wifi chip do you use?
wilee-nilee, i think apt-was not handle partial install correctly
apt-fast was not
Okay, I was asking because it has a Lubuntu minimal and an Ubuntu LXDE desktop choice
Another problem, there's a program I am uninstalling through ubuntu software center, and it seems to be stuck "applying changes" I've restarted the software center, no changes, any workaround?
blackshirt, faster not sure really, but I like that it downloads the code, I never do partial installs, so I'm not sure there.
ActionParsnip,  how can i know\?
ekaj: you can install lxde only if you want. If you want super light just install openbox and use it on it's own (no desktop) for absolute lightness :)
I was wanting a lightweight host to run VMs =p I was going to try the Ubuntu-server approach
xx: sudo lshw -C network     what is the product line for the wifi?
Thanks for your help though
ekaj: install server and you can manage the VMs using the VIC on another system
Has anyone here put XFCE on ubuntu?  How did it go, and are there any things I should watch out for?
jrib: was there a follow-up coming for that ?
anyone knows a good it channel
it for info tech
hello
ActionParsnip,  where can i copy the response for u ?
I am trying to install lubuntu on hp e-Vectra
hi bubblehouse
wabash: works well :)
cannot get past boot: as I don't know if there is a specific parameter I need
xx: its one line, just write it here
I tried generic IDE settings...
ActionParsnip: Nice! I figure you might be someone who did not like Gnome 3 all that much?
I cannot find a previous experience online thus far.. any nelp?
  *-network
       description: Wireless interface
       product: Broadcom Corporation
       vendor: Broadcom Corporation
       physical id: 0
[twisti]: no, just curious.  I'm not interested in tracing the dependencies involved with those jre packages.  But that's likely where all of those dependencies are coming from
       bus info: pci@0000:04:00.0
(00:36:13) ActionParsnip: xx: sudo lshw -C network     what is the product line for the wifi?      sound familiar?
no ideas? P3 processor
jrib: oh, i thought there was some easy way to make jre7 my default jre like you said
ActionParsnip: ?
the program is lxrad
bubblehouse: you may want to use Precise so you can use Lubuntu or Xubuntu to avoid the PAE kernel
ah.. I will look for that
ActionParsnip,   product: NetLink BCM57780 Gigabit Ethernet PCIe
       vendor: Broadcom Corporation
burn another CD!
xx: thats the wired connection. Ethernet is a wired technology
I'll let you know how it goes ActionParsnip. Thanks
xx: remember when I said the line above ^
ActionParsnip,    description: Ethernet interface
       product: NetLink BCM57780 Gigabit Ethernet PCIe
       vendor: Broadcom Corporation
oops
xx: " what is the product line for the wifi? "    remember that?
i keep pasting the wrong thing :/
* wilee-nilee hopes all in the US will vote on tuesday
ah, thanks jrib, didnt seem to work for jenkins, maybe its set specifically to jre6
xx: what is the output of:   lsb_release -sc
ActionParsnip,        product: Broadcom Corporation
[twisti]: it won't affect anything regarding dependencies (afaik), it will just make sure various symlinks point to the right version.  So java -> java7 for example
ActionParsnip,  the output of lsb_release -sc : lucid as in lucid lynx
ah, yeah, i guess it already did that for me before that
ty ActionParsnip
xx: you may want to clean install with Precise. Lucid desktop is EOL in April next year
eol?
xx: dead, no support and no updates
really?! i thought it was the stable version of ubuntu. what is Precise?
can anyone help me? I was installing this program and it has been stuck there for about 30 minutes now, not a big program. Any workaround?
how i know about my linux in terminal ( 64 or 32 )
ControllerSYR, uname -r
xx: Quantal is the current stable release, Precise is also stable and supported until 2017
xx: Precise is Ubuntu 12.04
it did not tell me what i need
ControllerSYR: uname -m
i need to know if my linux 64 or 32
ControllerSYR, if it says generic it's 32bit otherwise it's 64
ok
what is precise like compared to lucid?
xx: 2 years newer?
xx: it uses Unity as a replacement for Gnome-panel but it can be installed
xx: it has later versions of the packages that make up the OS
thanks
ciao
hi
kostkon, ??? generic ?
alexfpms, ??
kostkon, i have 64bit and uname -r gives me: 3.5.0-17-generic
alexfpms, you have 64bit cpu but the 32bit version of ubuntu
kostkon, but uname -m gives: x86_64
kostkon, no
alexfpms, right
alexfpms: -r   just gives the release, there are 32bit and 64bit versions of each release
kostkon,
ActionParsnip, exactly
alexfpms: -m   shows the machine which is the arch of the kernel :)
ActionParsnip: Do you ever have problems with xfce where say, you can't move a window with alt-F7 down or to the right?
ActionParsnip, ok unama -a to show all the info
wabash: not when I used it, I use LXDE now
alexfpms: true but if you want specific bits you can add switches :)
test
okay
ActionParsnip: How do you like that? Is it stripped down a bit compared to XFCE?
can i instal the updated vversion of ubuntu with installing updates?
ActionParsnip, ok what do uname -p ?
in 12.10 anyone had sound then lost it?
ActionParsnip, it gives processor
i have ubuntu on dual boot and im scared some files will be lost.
xx: you can upgrade from Lucid to Precise as you are upgrading to the next LTS
xx: yes. you can upgrade from 10.04 to 12.04 through the LTS upgrade
LTS?
xx: Long term support
xx, Back it up before upgrading, personally I would clone it to be safe.
wilee-nilee,  what are the risk that some of my files would be destroyed?
hot_wheelz: try:  killall pulseaudio; rm -r ~/.pulse*   wait 10 seconds then try sound
xx: you will have backups if your data is important
xx, It is not the risk here is it can you afford to have anything bad happen.
ActionParsnip: Can you do most nifty things in LDXE that you can with XFCE?
not really wilee-nilee
wabash: what do you need?
i suppose then ill upgrade some other time
i just really need to fix my wireless quickly